Chapter 17: Marital Magic.

31 December 2003.
Draco’s magic was acting up.
For the last week, he had experienced the exquisite joy of having his wife in bed with him at
night, and for the first time he felt the freedom to kiss her at his leisure. He still wasn’t
comfortable initiating much more than that, but Hermione herself had initiated more amorous
activities several days after she blew him for the first time, and Draco got to experience it
again. This time he lasted more than a few thrusts into her perfect mouth, and he was able to
locate her clit without any instruction from her.
He knew where this was leading, and he was thrilled. His magic was thrilled. Or it had been,
until something odd happened during the last few hours that made him start to feel agitated.
His magic, which had always felt like nudges and guidance, had turned insistent and
demanding.
Find her and fuck her. Find her and fuck her. Find her and fuck her.
On and on, over and over, Draco couldn’t seem to get it under control. It started as a whisper,
but it built with a slow crescendo until it felt like a drum beat echoing in his mind
relentlessly. And not only that, but he started to have an odd physical reaction too. He felt
taught, almost ill. He was feverish and sweating. The need to find her and finally have her
the whole way was becoming almost unbearable.
But they weren’t ready for it. He knew that. What he didn’t know was why the marital
magic had shifted so suddenly. Up until now the urges had always been avoidable and
separable from his own feelings. But this was so persistent that he was quickly losing his
grip.
To make matters worse, he couldn’t really enjoy Hermione today even if he wanted to. His
parents were hosting their New Year’s Eve party, and even Hermione had pitched in to help
prepare for it in a rare show of familial unity. The festivities started in the late afternoon and
ran well past midnight. As Hermione’s husband, he would be escorting her – she couldn’t
even shake hands with a male guest, so she planned to be on his arm all night – and he just
knew that having her in such close proximity was going to be torturous.
He was right. The navy gown his parents had given to her for this event hugged her breasts
and traced the flare of her hips. Her hair was swept up, exposing the length of her throat and
shoulders, and all evening Draco had been sneaking glances down the front of her dress to
the faintest hint of cleavage she was bearing. His fingers were itching to pull the bodice
down a few more inches so her tits would spring free, and he could explore them again.
Over the last few hours it had become an obsession that was bordering on madness. He had
barely spoken to a single person all night, so distracted was he by the neckline of his wife’s
gown.
“Lady Malfoy,” said the voice of an old warlock Draco thought was on the Wizengamot.
“Lord Darby,” Hermione murmured, as she inclined her head.
Draco was sweating.
“How is married life treating you, m’dear?”
Hermione tensed, and Draco tried not to groan.
“Lord Malfoy and I have had our differences, as I am sure you can imagine,” she said coldly.
At least she wasn’t saying that she despised him.
“Yes…” he murmured. “Yes, well… I must say, my dear, your speech at the Matching
Ceremony was rather striking.”
“And yet you voted in favor of the amendment in any event, did you not?”
“Well, as you see… you must understand… I spoke with Lord Wiltshire and…”
“Bah,” said Hermione dismissively. “My father-in-law had a single motive, as I’m sure you
must know. But his efforts were fruitless, and now he is stuck with me.”
Take her away and fuck her. Take her away and fuck her. Take her away and fuck her.
A bead of sweat trailed down Draco’s temple, and he took a shaky sip of champagne. He
didn’t mind discussing politics now and then, but he couldn't find it in himself to care when
his magic was telling him to take his wife to a spare room and ravage her.
“Well yes, that’s what I wanted to speak to you about m’dear,” said Lord Darby. “There are
murmurings that perhaps the Wizengamot was too hasty in its passage of the MLPP. I expect
some members could be persuaded to reconsider their positions in another few months.”
“You mean after their own grandchildren have been conceived?” said Hermione in a cold
voice.
“Ah. Yes, well, I’ll not deny that it’s a helpful fact. I expect another six or twelve months
and you may have the majority you would need to overturn it.”
Draco’s stomach sank a little at the thought of his marriage being annulled, and his magic
was starting to shout at him over the din of guests and champagne flutes.
Take her and fuck her. Put a baby inside of her. Now’s the time to secure your heir.
Draco completely lost the thread of the conversation as the reason for the change in his magic
suddenly crystalized: Hermione was fertile. She had gained enough weight after weeks of
very high calorie meals that her cycle had returned. She still wasn’t back to her full weight
yet, but apparently she had gained enough for that to reemerge. He wondered if she was
aware of it.
The moment he had the thought, his magic told him he was right. And then it flared as the
fantasies settled deep inside of him.
Plant your seed inside of her. Come inside of her over and over again and keep it there. Fill
her to the brim with it. Lock it between her legs so it never runs out.
Oh fuck, he was fully erect and wearing tailored trousers in the middle of a three hundred
person party. He couldn’t do this. He had to get out of there.
“I’m sorry,” he said, interrupting Hermione and Lord Darby, who were still talking about the
MLPP. “We have to go.”
He gripped Hermione’s hand and practically dragged her through the Malfoy ballroom.
“Draco, what on earth are you…?” she protested, as he flung open a side door and pulled her
down the corridor to a nearby parlor that was empty. He maneuvered her into the parlor and
then shut the door behind them, locking and silencing it as he pushed her against the door.
“I need you…” he groaned as he dipped his head and kissed her roughly. She sank against
the door a little, but didn’t turn him away and allowed her head to fall back as he started
suckling her neck.
“What’s gotten into you?” she breathed.
“You. The magic. I’m just… fuck, Hermione, I’m going mad…”
“What happened? What’s different?”
She sounded concerned, confused, and a bit dismayed. Her tone of voice managed to
penetrate the urgency in Draco’s brain as he remembered that she didn’t want him to be
magically compelled to desire her.
He gathered every ounce of self-control and broke away as he cupped her face with his hands
and stared down at her. Her eyes widened at the expression she saw.
“You’re fertile,” he whispered.
She blanched. “Already? But it’s only been a month since Azkaban… I was going to wait
until my period came back to track everything and…” she trailed off, looking slightly
panicked.
“I won’t do it, Hermione, I swear I won’t. I know you aren’t ready for that. But darling, I
feel like I’m on fire. Can I touch you in other places? I just… I have to.”
“Because of the magic,” she said in a small voice. She sounded disappointed, and Draco
shook his head firmly.
“No. I’ve wanted to fuck you since the first time I saw you in Azkaban.”
Her eyes widened at this, and he made himself continue. “The magic though… it’s
demanding I do it right now.”
“So it’s a timing thing, more than a desire thing?”
“Yes,” said Draco, because he didn’t know how else to explain it to her. “It’s making me
feverish because the magic senses you’re fertile. And Merlin, Hermione, the thought of it…
it’s driving me around the bend.”
Draco closed his eyes and forced himself to breathe as he placed his forehead against hers to
compose himself.
“The thought of sex you mean?” she asked in a small voice.
He opened his eyes and stared down at her. “Yes. But specifically the thought of filling you
with... you know. And the magic is making me think I could do it three or four times before
I’m fully spent.”
Hermione’s eyes widened at this.
Fuck a baby into her.
Great Salazar, but did he want to. And he knew he was a bastard for even considering it
because she had no interest in children, let alone children with him. But it was a notion that
had taken hold of him. He had to admit that this was one instance in which the magic really
might be thinking for him – because it wasn’t just sex he wanted right now, but reproductive
sex. He wanted her to be growing his baby in her belly at this very moment.
“Draco…” she said in a choked voice.
“I know,” he said. “I know, darling, and I said I won’t do it. But please… can I touch you in
other places? Can I make you feel good? It might help… burn some of this magic out of
me. It’s unbearable.”
She swallowed and seemed to hesitate for a moment, before nodding. “Yes. Of course, I’m
sorry I’m hesitating, I’m just… I don’t have contraceptives and…”
“Don’t apologize,” he said. “I should be the one apologizing. I swore to myself I wouldn’t
beg you or ask you for anything, but I didn’t know it would be like this and…”
She put a finger to his lips, and he quieted.
“I like it when you beg,” she said.
Something eased inside of him, as he dropped his face to her neck again. “Oh fuck… then
please, please darling… let me touch you… let me taste you… I’ll do anything… give you
anything…”
“Yes,” she murmured.
Draco needed no more invitation. The fact that he had lasted even this long was astonishing
as he reached up and pulled her dress down so her breasts sprang free.
“Fuck me, I’ve wanted to see these all night,” he groaned as he bent down and lavished
them. His hands fumbled with her zipper as he released it, and soon he was shoving the
whole damn dress off of her. It was beautiful, but there was far too much fabric, and it would
only get in the way of what he was craving.
Her knickers were small tonight, and she was without a bra, evidently opting to use the sewnin support from the dress itself. And this, Draco thought, was sheer perfection as his fingers
immediately moved down and pushed the scrap of fabric aside so he could see how wet she
was.
She is sodding for you. It’s her body calling for your seed.
And it was true. They had barely gotten started, and already she was wetter than she had
been the previous two times they did this. The consistency felt different too, and Draco
pushed his fingers into her to feel it.
She gasped a little, and then she said, “Can you get on your knees for me?”
Without hesitating Draco dropped to his knees, and now her cunt was at eye-level. He could
see her slick as he teased her knickers down, and he thought her legs might be shaking a
little.
“I want to taste it,” he said.
The words just slipped out, but he did. He had always wondered what it would be like, and
this was the perfect opportunity. Merlin knew when she would let his mouth get this close to
her again.
“Yes,” she breathed, as she leaned against the door and parted her legs even more for him.
Draco groaned as he placed a few kisses on her inner thigh and then tentatively reached out
with his tongue to give her center a lick, and immediately her hips bucked.
“Just like that…” he muttered.
He gripped her waist to help hold her up and then did it again, this time swirling his tongue a
little until he found that special bud. Hermione moaned, and Draco felt her knees shaking as
her fingers laced through his hair and then pulled his face in.
Message received, he thought as he began to lick and flick and suck in earnest, Hermione
quivering and making noises that Draco was sure would end him at any moment. She tasted
incredible, and her reaction to this was better than he could ever have imagined. She seemed
to love it, and Draco caught desperate words from her, broken between gasps and groans.
“Yes… God… please… I’m gonna…”
Draco’s magic, already unstable from her fertility, flared the moment she broke, and Draco
reacted on instinct.
He wrenched his mouth away and shoved two fingers inside of her, coating himself with her.
As he drew her orgasm out he made sure to gather as much of her wetness as he could before
quickly unbuttoning his trousers with his other hand and then slipping the hand with her slick
down into his pants and around his cock.
His magic sang, as it recognized his wife’s arousal. He barely noticed as Hermione herself
sank against the wall in front of him.
“I can… with my mouth if you want…” she said hesitantly.
Draco’s eyes were closed, and his head thrown back as he pumped.
“It wants your cunt,” he groaned. “I think the magic knows the lubrication is your…”
He only opened his eyes when he felt her tug at his wrist and pull his hand out, before
guiding it between her legs for another swipe.
“Then take it,” she whispered. “If this is helping, use it…”
“Oh fuck me,” he groaned, as he did what she said, and then coated himself again, sighing as
the magic seemed to settle at the feeling of it.
It was astonishing, really. The magic could tell it was hers and it was hers during that perfect
time of the month. Did it think he was inside of her? Draco couldn’t be certain about that,
but some of the feverishness seemed to be diminishing as he coated himself twice more. He
was covered in her, and it was perfection.
“Gods I can’t wait to get inside of you,” he sighed as he pumped.
He sensed her freeze a little, and he forced his eyes open to look at her. Her cheeks were
pink.
“I’d say I’m sorry, but it’s true,” he said, closing his eyes once more as he focused on the
wetness around him. “Fuck, I’m close…”
He grunted, and then felt the hot liquid spurting from him. On and on it went, and it felt like
his fever was finally breaking as he opened his eyes to stare down at the mess. Hermione
was staring at it too.
She licked her lips a bit awkwardly. “That is… quite a lot.”
Draco nearly collapsed onto the floor and flung his arm over his face, not even bothering to
tuck his cock away.
“I think that’s twice what I normally produce.”
“The magic then?” she asked, and this time she sounded more intrigued than dismayed.
“Must be,” said Draco. “The feverish feeling is gone, but I’m still very aware that you’re
fertile.”
“If I really am, you might be like this for a while longer. It wasn’t clear from the journals if
the family magic kicks on before ovulation or during. Technically I’m fertile for a couple
days before the egg actually drops.”
Draco groaned. “So this could get worse?”
“It’s possible,” she said, not without some sympathy.
“I’m going to go insane.”
She sighed. “We can do more of that if you want. To help you get through it.”
Draco moved his arm and finally looked at her. ‘You’re sure about that?”
“Yes,” she said. “I really appreciate that you’re not pushing for a full consummation yet, but
neither one of us was prepared for your magic being this severe during my fertile windows. I
can get some supplies that might help for the next one, but I have to go into the muggle world
to do it, and I need to be careful about it because it’s against the law. I’m starting back at
Hogwarts in a couple days, and I won’t have time to do it for this cycle.”
Draco waved her off. “Don’t worry about that. I’m just grateful you let me touch you at all.
I truly don’t want to pressure you, darling, and I know you aren’t ready for sex or children
yet.”
She gave him a thoughtful look at this but fell silent as Draco sat up and finally righted his
clothing and vanished the rather astonishing mess he had made on the floor. She stood and
began to dress too, and Draco spun her around to zip her up. It was strangely intimate, as he
trailed his finger up her spine first before dropping a kiss on her bare shoulder. She
shuddered just a bit.
“Shall we return?” he asked softly.
She nodded, but turned first and gave him a sweet kiss on the lips.
“That was very sexy, Draco. I really liked it.”
Warmth and pleasure flooded Draco one more time at her words, and he smiled broadly as he
reached up and stroked her cheek.
“I liked it too. You are exactly what I want.”
She flushed a pretty pink but smiled at this before grabbing his hand and tugging him through
the door to return to the party. As they reached the side door to the ballroom, his magic jolted
him again.
Fuck your heir into her tonight.
Draco tried not to groan.

Two days later
The magic was finally tapering off after reaching a nearly unbearable peak the previous
evening. According to Hermione this answered at least one question: the magic kicked on a
couple days before she ovulated and lasted until she had moved beyond that point in her
cycle.
Draco had truly thought he was dying by the end of it. The fever came back only a few hours
after they took care of it during the party, and then it reached a nearly unbearable pitch by the
end before receding. Draco was loath to admit that his father may have been right about the
family magic after all. If Draco had married Astoria the compulsions to do his duty at the
correct time became strong enough that it probably would have penetrated his occlumency
walls and enabled him to perform.
The fact that his magic was focused on Hermione, of course, made the experience all the
more torturous because he wanted nothing more than to spend three days buried between her
legs, filling her up over and over again. The magic practically demanded it, and on the final
day even using her arousal to cheat the magic didn’t work as well as they had hoped. It
seemed to sense that his wife was empty, and the magic punished him for it. And though
Draco came close to begging Hermione to let him do it several times, he refused to cave to
his baser instincts. He knew it was a test of his will and a commitment to building trust with
her. Besides, she was still offering up her body in a way that Draco could only have dreamed
of a few weeks prior.
That final day of what he came to think of as his heat was spent in a tangle of sheets and
sweat. It was a Friday, and Hermione was expected to spend most of the weekend at
Hogwarts to prepare for the students’ return. Draco was sure she wished to be planning her
lessons or organizing the library that day, but given the state of him she didn’t. Instead, she
allowed him to strip her naked and spend most of the day in bed with his hands and his
tongue exploring her every crevice. It felt shamefully decadent, but it was the only way to
keep the fever low enough to function. The moment she left him for any reason, it came
rushing back, and he was reduced to a quivering mess.
She gave him her body that day in every way that she could, and in exchange Draco did not
ask her to consummate, despite the magic practically screaming at him to do it.
They spoke little that day, other than with whispered praises and groans. But when Hermione
finally rolled out of his bed the following morning, the fever had passed. Draco felt like he
had learned some things about his wife that he had dreamed of knowing since their reunion.
He discovered and kissed every mole on her body. He reveled in the exquisite pleasure of
burying his face between her thighs and gripping her arse while he did it. He watched her
face scrunch whenever she orgasmed. He learned that she liked to be demanding in bed, but
she also seemed to melt when he took the reins from her. It was a give and take, a dance
between partners that felt surprisingly even in light of the fact that she held every bit of
power in Draco’s eyes.
As for Hermione, a full day spent naked in Draco’s bed in which he did not ask her for the
thing she could not give seemed to collapse the last of the walls around her. She no longer
looked at him warily or with reticence. Instead, he found her studying him, and there was a
softness to her that he had never sensed before. Draco discovered that beneath her prickly
exterior was something subdued, but truly beautiful. She was a woman, with every bit of
feminine strength and grace that had attracted men like him for centuries, but she kept it
hidden behind a strong exterior that she no longer tried to keep intact around Draco. With her
armor finally gone, he could see every part of her, and he thought it was a bit like looking
into the sun. She blinded him with her generosity, her wit, and her kindness. And Draco
tried to be worthy of it as he devoted himself to her pleasure and tried to make her feel as
beautiful as he believed her to be.
It didn’t come as any great shock when he watched her sleeping in his arms after the worst of
the fever had passed to discover that he was falling in love with her. It was the only
explanation for his mad behavior – his insistence upon marrying her, his efforts to woo her,
and now his willingness to fight his own magic to be with her on her terms and not his. The
moment Draco had the thought, he knew it must be true. And while under normal
circumstances he would be thrilled to be in love with his wife, in this particular instance the
thought absolutely terrified him: because Hermione was only his wife because of the law, and
Draco sensed the law would be crumbling before he knew it.
Draco didn’t want the law to go away, not anytime soon. The law had given him Hermione,
and at some point in the next few weeks it would give him the key to ridding himself of his
virginity forever. But perhaps it was because his wife was Hermione Granger, Draco knew
there was only one path forward.
He had to get the law repealed.
It wasn’t just because of the promise he made to her in Azkaban. It was because she was
Hermione, and she would rather burn the Wizengamot to ash than exist in a world with the
MLPP. And because Draco was falling in love with her, he took it upon himself to act against
his own self-interest in this matter.
That, more than anything, proved just how much he cared about her.
“Father,” he said, as he approached Lucius in his study the day the new Hogwarts term
began.
“What is it Draco?” asked Lucius shortly.
Lucius had spent the last couple of weeks brooding. His hostility toward Hermione had
become less overt. Narcissa even reported that he was a bit defensive of Hermione at the
New Year’s Eve party when certain Wizengamot members made snide comments about her.
But as far as Draco was aware, he still had not said a kind word to her face, and he only
seemed to emerge from his brooding to snip at her while she taunted him back.
Draco wanted a gesture – not just from him, but from his father as well – because he sensed it
was the only thing that would truly make her come around to his parents. And as Draco
thought back to the lists he created about her likes and dislikes, he knew his parents needed to
become something more than just tolerable to her if he stood a chance of their marriage
surviving the destruction of the MLPP.
“I need to ask you for a favor,” said Draco.
Lucius raised one eyebrow in question, but gestured for Draco to sit.
Draco lowered himself into the chair on the opposite side of his father’s desk and considered
how he should say this, but he knew his father would see right through him if he wasn’t blunt
about it. He sighed and steeled himself.
“I need you to help me get the MLPP repealed.”
Lucius was quiet for a long moment as he studied Draco. Finally he asked, “And why is
that? Do you not wish to be married to your wife any longer?”
“I want nothing more than to be married to her. But the law is wrong, Father, and you were a
major reason it came to be in the first place. Our family is the reason Hermione and so many
others are in this mess. We need to fix it.”
Lucius looked unimpressed. “The morality argument? Try again Draco.”
Draco pursed his lips. He wished his father could be convinced in this manner, but he should
have known better than to expect it. Lucius had, after all, helped bring a man to power who
would happily commit genocide to get what he wanted. Lucius had never been terribly
interested in morality.
Draco sighed and gave his father a serious look. “Fine, how about this then? I want
Hermione. I’m falling in love with her. And I think the MLPP is going to be repealed within
the next year regardless of what you or I do about it. In fact, I wouldn’t be surprised if
Shacklebolt is out of office by the time the next Matching Ceremony rolls around. But if the
MLPP is repealed then my marriage to Hermione will either be automatically annulled or
there will be a simple mechanism for her to divorce me. I don’t want her to do it. I want her
to stay married to me and continue the Malfoy line. If I – if you – help her repeal the MLPP,
it will prove to her that I’m serious about my commitments to her. It will make her
understand that I really do choose her, regardless of what some damn law has to say about it.
And maybe it will convince her to choose me back when the time comes.”
Lucius was silent for a long while as he absorbed this. His gray eyes – identical to Draco’s –
were piercing him, as though searching for some truth on his child’s face. Draco refused to
flinch.
“You haven’t consummated your marriage,” Lucius finally said. “I am on the small list of
people who would be immediately informed if you had.”
Draco frowned, a bit thrown off by this apparent non sequitur.
“No, but we have nearly eight weeks to do it. I’m working on it.”
“Let me say it another way: you’ve been married to her for over a month and have not…
succumbed to the marital magic.”
Draco felt his face turn crimson, but he refused to break eye contact with his father.
“No,” said Draco shortly.
“And why is that?” asked Lucius. “Does she have a fertility issue?”
Draco swallowed hard. “No, she doesn’t. Her natural bodily functions halted temporarily
while she was in Azkaban due to severe weight loss, but they have come back.”
Lucius’s eyes bored into him now. “So they have come back… and yet you still have not
consummated. Explain.”
“What business is it of yours?” asked Draco uncomfortably.
“I’m the Earl of Wiltshire. You are my son. The moment I am dead, you will take up my
mantle and Merlin-willing your eldest son will become the Viscount Malfoy. I am struggling
to understand how it is that she is not already pregnant or at least recovering from your best
efforts to put her in that state. The Malfoy family magic is strong in this respect, and until
recently I thought it was wholly unavoidable without breaking it altogether. It only took your
mother and me one month to conceive you, and I remember being absolutely ravenous for her
when the magic prompted it.”
Draco was quiet for a moment as he considered this. He really did not wish to give his father
a window into his sex life, but then again, he needed his father’s cooperation with the MLPP.
And if he was concerned that Draco’s marriage to Hermione had somehow damaged the
family magic, it could put any possibility of a relationship between them totally out of reach.
“It was absolute torture, if you must know,” he finally said. “I simply resisted it. Hermione
and I found a way to satisfy the magic enough so I wouldn’t go mad from it, but I still
suffered a great deal while it was happening.”
“Then why did you not simply take her?”
Draco sensed his father was testing him somehow, but the implication made him so angry he
couldn’t work out what the test could be. His jaw was clenched when he next spoke.
“Because it would have been rape if I had, Father. Her fertile window caught both of us off
guard, and she wasn’t prepared to consummate yet. She’s coming around to the idea, and we
have done some things together, but she’s not quite ready for that final step. And if you think
I’m going to rape any woman, let alone my wife – who again, is somebody I am actually
falling in love with – all because of some fucked up family magic then you’ve lost your damn
mind. I would rather be caught in that fever forever than touch her in a way that makes her
uncomfortable. I refuse to behave like an animal even if the family magic is telling me to rut
her until she’s breeding.”
Lucius studied him a moment longer. “I take it you want to, though?”
“Of course I fucking want to. I’ve wanted to for months – ever since she was arrested, in fact
– but she’s a woman. She’s my wife. Her comfort has to come first, not mine. And I…” he
trailed off, wondering if he was about to say too much.
“You what?” he prompted.
Draco was silent for a long moment. “I think she might be a virgin.”
Lucius’s eyebrows flew up in amazement. “You don’t know?”
“She’s never told me, no. But Potter once mentioned that Weasley was the only person who
ever got a second date from her, and I know she never went that far with him.”
Draco registered that this was the first time Lucius had looked truly surprised by the things
Draco was telling him. Then he looked thoughtful.
“A true virgin bride then,” he murmured. “I don’t think the Malfoys have had one of those in
a couple of centuries.”
Draco winced at the implications regarding his mother and grandmother.
“Yes well… we have a virgin groom too, if you must know,” he muttered.
Draco had no idea why he was confessing this to his father, other than the fact that it was the
first time he could recall ever speaking to his father about these sorts of things in detail.
Except for a single conversation in which Lucius described the mechanics of sex and the
contraceptive charm, along with a few unhelpful comments over the years about following
the family magic, they had never talked about it. Ever.
To Draco’s chagrin, Lucius’s face assumed a look of near-horror.
“Tell me you’re joking.”
“I’m not,” said Draco curtly, as his face burned.
“Draco, you were betrothed to Astoria for your entire life, and your mother and I were clear
that you could seek other alternatives if you found somebody better.”
Draco scowled. “And when, exactly, should I have lost my virginity father? Was it when I
was fourteen and fifteen years old and still practically a child? Or when I was sixteen and
trying to murder Dumbledore? Or seventeen when the Dark Lord was living in my home?
Or after the war when the witches could barely look at me because of what I had done? Or
when I had finally lost hope and thought I would have to be with Astoria, who never attracted
me in the slightest? Did you know that it’s physically impossible to feel sexual desire or
pleasure when you are occluding? And what do you think I’ve been doing since I was
sixteen years old to manage my life? When I jilted Astoria and met Hermione again, it pulled
me out of my occlumency haze, and I was shocked to discover that years of my life had
passed and my cock actually still functioned. So yes, I’m a virgin trying to woo my wife who
I’m pretty sure is another virgin. Believe it or not, that takes some time and warming up. I
truly have no idea what the fuck I’m doing, but I’m trying my best to make sure she’s pleased
and comfortable. That means I will ignore the family magic until she’s ready.”
Lucius was pale as he listened to Draco’s rant. Then he took a shuddering breath and his face
collapsed a bit, as though finally accepting something he was only now discovering was
entirely inevitable.
“You really do love her then,” he said quietly.
“I think so, yes. And if not yet, I’m sure I will very soon. She’s just… she’s everything,
Father. She makes me whole. She makes me feel. I’ve been trapped in my own head for
years. Occlumency is cold, you know. I can carry on conversations while I’m occluding but
I’m barely aware of what I’m saying or who I’m interacting with. It just pushes everything
away and leaves me numb. The last few months with Hermione have felt alive again, and I
want her to stay with me. I need her to Father.”
Lucius was staring off into space, but Draco was sure his father was listening to every word.
Finally he spoke.
“Draco, if I help you with this, I don’t think we can expect it to be repealed within the next
eight weeks. That’s not enough time to pass legislation outside of a closed session, and your
wife is correct that we used our one chance to do that when we passed the amendment. The
public will not accept it again.”
Draco nodded. “I know, Father.”
“That means you have to convince her to consummate this marriage. Neither your mother
nor I want you to go to Azkaban, and you will if you don’t get it done soon.”
Draco weighed his father’s words, wondering if he should admit to the vow, but he finally
decided to keep that to himself for a bit longer. Besides, it could give him some leverage.
“We’ve gotten close, Father. Neither of us want to go back to Azkaban. We know what’s at
stake.”
Lucius’s gaze pierced Draco’s, and finally he nodded once.
“Very well. In that case, this is what I am willing to do.”
Draco held his breath as he waited for his father’s verdict.
“I will help you and your wife repeal the MLPP in full, on two conditions. First, you stay out
of Azkaban by convincing her to consummate with you before the deadline. Second, you
agree to shadow me to prepare to take over the family seat.”
Draco blinked in surprise.
“The family seat?”
“On the Wizengamot, yes,” nodded Lucius. “I know you have little interest in politics, but
you know we have a hereditary seat on the Wizengamot, Draco. It can be filled by either one
of us. I would like to see you take it over from me as soon as you are able. Getting the
MLPP repealed would be an excellent way to learn about it, and I daresay your wife would
be more than happy to help you.”
Draco’s breath caught at this. In truth, he never had been that involved in politics because
Lucius was so controlling. Draco had not been interested in watching his father browbeat
and bribe his way to get what he wanted since he was a boy. Then again, Lucius had never
taken the time to really train Draco in it. He didn’t select Draco to be his proxy while he was
in Azkaban. Draco wondered if he could find more purpose in this aspect of his duty if he
was properly trained and had his wife by his side while he did it. For all of Hermione’s talk
about teaching the next generation of voters, he was sure that marriage to a Wizengamot
member would be compelling to her. If Draco could learn the ins and outs of it from Lucius
then he could take those lessons and build his own coalition. He could place a voting bloc at
Hermione’s feet to command as she wished.
He could help her change their world.
Draco stared at his father, who was looking back at him with something like approval on his
face as he watched Draco come to a decision.
Finally, Draco smiled and nodded once.
“I accept your conditions, Father. Please tell me how we should begin.”
Chapter 18: Liftoff.
9 January 2004.
“Sodding Dewey Decimal System,” muttered Hermione as Draco peeked his head around a
bookcase in the library.
He found his wife, nearly buried in a pile of old books, looking totally overwhelmed by the
task she had set for herself. Draco chuckled a little, and she whipped around at the noise to
glare at him.
“It’s not funny!”
“It’s hilarious, darling. The library was organized perfectly well before you started this new
Project.”
“It was not!” she insisted. “I couldn’t find a damn thing in it.”
She huffed, and blew a curl out of her face as she scowled at the enormous pile of books.
“Have you thought about asking for help?” he teased.
She glared at him. “I did ask for help, but the House Elves have been ordered not to help me
by a certain someone…”
“Well darling, you can always order them to ignore me. They have to answer to you as well.”
“I most certainly will not be giving them orders!”
“In that case, I’m afraid you’ll be stuck here for years,” said Draco seriously, but he couldn’t
help the smile that flitted across his face.
“Watch it or I’ll free them,” she threatened.
Draco grinned. “By all means. But I’m still not going to rescind my order.”
“And why is that?” she asked irritably.
Draco approached her and pulled her toward him.
“Because the longer it takes you to finish your Project, the longer you will stay married to
me.”
At this her eyes widened for a moment before narrowing again.
“Is that your angle then? You’re going to make me so busy I won’t divorce you if the MLPP
is repealed?”
“That’s one angle, certainly,” he said seriously. “I’d really like to convince you myself, but
I’m not above such underhanded tactics.”
A ghost of a smile crossed her face. “Well, you should know that I have promised O’s to
every student who helps me get the MLPP repealed. We’re doing a unit on civil disobedience
to start.”
Draco grinned at this before reaching up and tucking a curl behind her ear. “You’re enjoying
your classes then? You haven’t talked about it much, darling.”
At this, her face fell a little. “Actually… it’s not what I was hoping for.”
“Oh?” asked Draco in concern as he pulled the book she was holding out of her hand and
tugged her over to a nearby couch to sit. She sighed as she sank into him, and Draco’s magic
purred contentedly to have her in his arms. “Tell me about your first week.”
She was quiet for a moment, as though she was deciding what to say about it.
“They’re just… teenagers.”
Draco chuckled, and she turned and smacked him lightly on the arm.
“Shut it, I’m serious. I like children, but teenagers are just awful. I mean, I look at
Prudence’s little brother Edward– you know he’s in my seventh year class – and he’s a
Slytherin of course, but he bullies this one muggleborn Gryffindor girl relentlessly. Her
name is Annie Gray. I swear the two of them remind me of us. Edward is clearly infatuated
with Annie, but he doesn’t know how to deal with his feelings, so he’s just cruel to her. Then
she turns around and gives it right back. They actually drew wands and started to duel each
other on Wednesday before I could disarm them and give them both detention. It totally
derailed the class.”
Draco snorted at this. “I can talk to Edward if you wish. I’ve known him for most of his
life.”
Hermione sighed. “Don’t bother. I already pulled him aside and explained that if he fancies
Annie he needs to stop being such an idiot and just tell her. I’ve already drawn the obvious
parallels for him.”
Draco chuckled a little. “Well teenage boys are hopeless, darling. I certainly was. There
were a lot of reasons I was so cruel to you when we were younger, but I won’t deny that part
of it was a certain… fascination. That and a total inability to act upon it.”
“Well the war also got in the way,” she acknowledged. “In Edward’s case, he’s just being
immature and swayed by the sort of blood purity drivel I’m trying to stamp out.”
“Edward will come around."
“But Draco, teenagers.”
Draco laughed. “Does that mean this will be a one-term job for you?”
She sighed. “I don’t know. I had these grand ideas about inspiring the next generation and
molding model citizens, but I may have been a tad ambitious. I didn’t take into account how
difficult they could be.”
“You’re wonderful with Teddy though.”
“Yes, but he’s five, not fifteen. I’m starting to dread knowing him ten years from now.”
Draco smiled at this a little. “Well, it’s only been one week. Take the term to decide.”
“I will. I just want to enact change, Draco. I’ll admit the MLPP discouraged me, and that’s
why I ended up leaving the think tank and taking the job at Hogwarts instead.”
Draco stilled as he considered his next words. He had not yet told her about his plans with
Lucius.
“And I assume you plan to continue working to overturn the MLPP? At the New Year’s Eve
party it sounded like there could be momentum for it.”
“Yes, of course. Like I said, I hope to get my students involved, especially the seventh
years. It will affect them if we don’t do something about it soon. It will be a lot of work
though.”
Draco set back to study her. She looked so earnest, but also frustrated, and Draco thought he
knew why. Her attention was split.
“What if I told you I was going to help?” he said carefully.
Hermione looked intrigued by this. “Oh?”
Draco shrugged. “You know I don’t have anything else to do, not really. I did promise you I
would help you blow it up.”
“That’s true. You have no experience with it though,” she pointed out.
Draco smiled a little at this. “Perhaps not. But Father does.”
Hermione’s eyes widened. “Don’t tell me…”
Draco nodded slowly, and she gasped as she sat up and grabbed his hands.
“Really?” she asked. “Lucius is willing to help?”
“Yes,” he said. “And as part of it he plans on training me. He wants me to take over his seat
on the Wizengamot.”
Her jaw dropped at this, and Draco chuckled as he clasped her hands in his. “I told you
darling, I would help you. Father will show me what to do. Theo’s claiming his seat and will
be installed in a matter of weeks. He is working to ingratiate himself with his father’s old
friends while he waits. He and I have already discussed it, and we are going to do what we
can to bring some of the older, more conservative members into the twenty-first century with
us. Our family names will still command loyalty from certain parties, even if our views are
different from our fathers.”
“Draco…” she whispered, and Draco smiled.
“What do you say, darling? Would you like to command the Malfoy and Nott blocs?”
Her eyes were shining, as she started to smile slowly. To Draco’s delight she climbed onto
his lap and cupped his face in her hands.
“That would be beyond my wildest dreams,” she confessed. Draco smiled broadly at this.
“In that case, I would tell you to let me do the legwork on the Wizengamot while you give
Hogwarts an honest shot. If it’s not for you, there’s no need to stay, but I imagine it’s one of
those things that will get easier year after year. You may have trouble swaying some of the
seventh years with only a single term of instruction. But the younger the student, the more
moldable they are. Teenagers will always be awful to each other in some respects, but just
think… maybe in a few years there won’t be another Draco and Hermione or Edward and
Annie. Perhaps purebloods and muggleborns will be dating each other without putting up
such a fuss. Do it long enough, and there’s your population of model citizens, darling.”
“So what… you work internally at the Wizengamot while I work externally at Hogwarts?”
“If that’s what you want,” said Draco simply. “If you choose to leave Hogwarts and rejoin
the think tank I will fully support it. But your idea about influencing voters while they are
young has a lot of merit. I can’t think of anybody better suited for it. Besides, once I’m on
the Wizengamot there will be no lobbying required to get my vote or anybody else in my
bloc.”
“Even if your father disapproves?” she asked shrewdly.
Draco stared at her squarely. “What did I tell you about that? My wife comes first, always.
Besides, Father would have to be an idiot to believe that I would follow him and not you
once he has turned his seat over to me.”
“Why is he willing to give it up then?” she asked curiously.
Draco shrugged. “Father is coming around to you. He has spent more than twenty years
training me to think a particular way, and he failed. At this point, I think he’s more interested
in making sure the title is secure than forcing any particular legislation through the
Wizengamot again. Maybe he’s mellowing out. Or maybe he’s weary and wants to retire.
Maybe he just wants to see me do something he had always planned for me – and taking the
Wizengamot seat was always something he intended for me to do eventually. I think he’s
finding that when faced with you and me together, he needs to take what he can get. I agreed
to take the seat from him if he helped repeal the MLPP. We both think it will be excellent
practice.”
Draco considered telling Hermione the other thing his father demanded: consummation of
their marriage. But ultimately he decided it wasn’t necessary. He didn’t want her to
consummate before she was ready just to secure Lucius’s cooperation. Besides, their vow
guaranteed it that it would happen within the next several weeks.
Hermione exhaled and looked at him seriously. “Alright then. I’ll give Hogwarts an honest
shot, and I’ll let you do the political maneuvering for me. I’ll always have my finger in it,
but if I don’t have to actively lobby…”
“You won’t,” Draco assured her.
She gave him a swift smile. “Well then that gives me time to sort out teenage drama, doesn’t
it? Though I still want my students to learn about it.”
Draco leaned in and gave her a small kiss. “You are the best person to teach them all about
it,” he said.
She leaned in and deepened the kiss for a long moment before pulling back and studying him.
“I like this, Draco.”
“You like what?” he said with a small smile.
“Being on the same side as you. Playing to our strengths. Being a team.”
Draco smiled broadly at this. “I like it too, darling. The Malfoys have always been
formidable, and with you as part of the family… I think we can be unstoppable, truly.”
She gave him such a beautiful smile at this that Draco’s heart skipped. She leaned in and
kissed him slowly, deeply, as Draco pulled her close and allowed his hands to drift. When
they finally pulled apart, she was looking slightly dazed.
“Tell me,” he said quietly. “How long will it take you to organize the library?”
Her expression cleared, and she snorted a little at this question. “Years, I’d wager.”
“Well then,” he said, pulling her close so he was speaking in her ear. “Imagine how much
change we can accomplish in those years. Anything you want, darling. Say it, and I’ll try to
get it for you.”
“Draco Malfoy, are you trying to seduce me?” she said with a dark laugh.
“That depends. Is it working?”
“Mmmm, perhaps. You once asked me if I wanted a man who would burn the world for me.
I’ve thought about it quite a bit, and I think I would rather have a man who will build the
world I dream of instead.”

Later that evening
Draco descended the stairs to dinner and was surprised to find his father deep in negotiations
with Crookshanks. As he watched, Lucius pulled out a collar studded with rubies, and
Draco’s jaw dropped.
“You must be joking,” he said. “Crookshanks prefers emeralds, don’t you boy?”
Crookshanks cast one imperious eye over Draco and purred.
Lucius scowled. “The cat can be reasoned with, I know he can. He’s ruined my last pair of
shoes, and I caught him scratching the armchair in my study. It’s from the seventeenth
century Draco!”
Draco approached Crookshanks and gave him a pet before narrowing his eyes at his father.
“If I arrange this for you, then you will be polite to Hermione. Deal?”
Lucius snorted, but then his face fell as he stared at the cat.
“Fine,” he grumbled.
Draco held out his hand for the collar, and Lucius gave it to him as Draco crouched to stare
Crookshanks in the eye.
“Now then, what say we have an amendment to our original bargain? A collar in rubies and
a collar in sapphires,” and here he glanced at Lucius who nodded in confirmation, “in
exchange for a more cordial relationship with my father. He will also be kind to your
mistress going forward.”
Crookshanks narrowed his eyes as he considered this, and then purred. Lucius exhaled with
relief, and Draco gave him a scratch behind the ears.
“There’s a good boy. Now then. Rubies tonight since it’s new? Or emeralds since green is a
better color?”
Crookshanks nudged his nose against the new collar, and Draco chuckled as he changed it.
“Well your mistress will surely approve at any rate.”
He stood and turned to give his father a fierce look. “You will behave yourself or I’ll take the
new collars away and sic him on you myself.”
Lucius gulped, but nodded, and they made their way to the dining room where Narcissa and
Hermione were already seated.
“Good evening darling,” Draco said as he dropped a kiss on the top of Hermione’s head and
brushed the nape of her neck with his fingers. She shivered a bit, but smiled at him before
her expression froze as she stared at her cat.
“You cannot be serious,” she said.
“Serious about what?” asked Draco blithely.
“Another one?” she replied, gesturing to the collar.
Draco shrugged. “He has excellent taste, and you refuse to let me spoil you. I’m forced to
spoil him instead.”
Crookshanks gave a helpful purr at this, and Hermione rolled her eyes while Draco gave her
an innocent smile.
He waited until she was taking a sip of her wine before saying, “Besides, this one was from
my father.”
It had the desired effect as Hermione spit her wine out, directly into Lucius’s face. He
scowled as wine dripped from the end of his nose, and Draco snorted with laughter. Even
Narcissa was struggling not to smile.
“I’m sorry,” said Hermione. “What?”
“Father picked it out,” said Draco. “He’s trying to make amends. Right, Father?”
Lucius looked like he was smiling through a stomachache as he said, “Yes of course. That’s
right. I have been… too hasty in my objections to your marriage, Hermione.”
Hermione looked suspiciously between Lucius and Draco, and Draco gave her an
encouraging nod.
“Alright…” she said slowly. “I’ll admit I have no idea what has changed, but Draco did say
you were willing to help repeal the MLPP so I suppose I can give you a chance.”
“That’s all I ask,” said Lucius cordially. “And Draco is correct, I’m willing to push for a full
repeal.”
At this, Hermione and Lucius launched into the longest conversation that Draco had ever
heard exchanged between them, comparing thoughts about approach and who would be in
favor of a repeal and precisely how to go about it. Draco found himself more interested than
he ever had been in politics, likely because it was his wife doing much of the talking.
“Draco, we should start with Lord Flint, Lord Fawley, and Lord Selwyn. I assume Theo will
be voting with us, and he can get Lord Parkinson on board.”
Draco inclined his head.
“And Kingsley?” asked Hermione. “What about him?”
Lucius pursed his lips. “It will be delicate, but he can be managed.”
“I’d rather see him out of office,” said Hermione bluntly. “He’s had a decent run, but he’s too
beholden to the conservative bloc on the Wizengamot these days. It’s getting worse and
worse.”
Lucius’s eyes narrowed. “Who would you have then?”
“Maribelle Marchbanks.”
“A woman?” asked Lucius in surprise.
“Wasn’t she the one who ran the Matching Ceremony?” added Draco.
“Yes and yes,” said Hermione, looking at both of them in turn. “Yes, she’s a woman, and
don’t you think it’s time we had a female Minister again? And yes, she ran the Matching
Ceremony, but I have it on good authority that she volunteered to make sure it adhered to the
law and nobody was coerced. She didn’t vote for it in the first place, nor did she agree to the
amendment. Her voting record is middle-of-the-road. She’s not as progressive as one might
wish, but she also won’t alienate the conservative bloc.”
Lucius sat back, considering this for a moment.
“She’s not a bad choice,” he finally said. “Though getting a woman installed is going to be a
challenge.”
Hermione raised one eyebrow. “The muggles have done it before, and so have we for that
matter. Or have you forgotten Millicent Bagnold?”
Draco smirked at the irritated look on Lucius’s face.
“I’m simply saying that it will take some convincing.”
“Then let’s convince them,” said Hermione firmly. “She’s a perfect choice, and if there is
one person whose career needs to end over the MLPP it’s Kingsley.”
Lucius raised one eyebrow. “Very well. Draco?”
Draco inclined his head. “Your wish is my command, darling. I say we do it.”
Hermione looked inordinately pleased with herself and settled into her meal. It ended late,
and as she finally rose to leave the table she brushed Draco on the shoulder.
“Draco, could I speak to you privately?”
Intrigued, Draco nodded his agreement and rose to follow her. She led him into the room
they had been sharing for the last several weeks, and she finally turned to look at him with a
determined expression.
“I’m ready to consummate our marriage. If that’s alright with you.”
Draco blinked, both shocked and thrilled, and his magic roared to life at her words.
Make her yours. Give her everything. Complete your bond with her.
Draco just nodded dumbly.
She looked a bit nervous and was twisting the hem of her shirt in her fingers. “It’s just that
I’ve been thinking about it, and now that we know where I am in my cycle we can be pretty
sure that I won’t get pregnant, and it’s something we need to do soon anyway and I thought
before my next–”
Draco placed a finger on her lips, and she fell silent.
“I’m ready if you are,” he said simply. “And just so we’re on the same page, I should tell
you: I’m a virgin.”
Hermione looked relieved by this. “Oh thank God. I thought you might be, but I couldn’t be
certain. I am too.”
Draco smiled a little. “I’ll admit I suspected it and rather hoped you were.”
She quirked an eyebrow. “Don’t tell me you value chastity before marriage.”
Draco shook his head. “Not at all. But I would be lying if I said I didn’t care about being the
one to take it from you. I’m pretty sure I would despise any bloke who got there before I
did.”
This made her blush.
“Well since we’re both inexperienced…”
“We’ll do the best we can with it,” said Draco, trying to project a calmness he absolutely did
not feel, “but no pressure to make it perfect this time. We’ll have plenty of opportunities to
get better at it. Let’s ease into it, yes?”
Hermione finally relaxed at this, and Draco pulled her to him and started by kissing her.
“Like this,” he whispered as he kissed down the column of her throat. “I know you like
this…”
Hermione’s head fell back, and Draco took his time sucking on that spot where her neck met
her shoulder that always made her shudder. He tugged on the hem of her jumper, and she
raised her arms to let him pull it off of her before returning to her neck and moving to the
buttons of her shirt. Draco swiftly unfastened them and then pushed her shirt off to find her
breasts clad in a lacy bra. It was prettier than some of the others he had seen, and he groaned
as he realized she must have been planning this.
“You must know I love every encounter with your tits, darling. Every single one…”
He maneuvered her to his bed and pushed her back gently, before quickly stripping off his
own shirt and then hovering over her.
“Fuck, your curves are going to be the death of me…” he murmured as he buried his nose
between her breasts and licked.
Hermione gasped and arched a little, and Draco took the opportunity to reach under her to
unfasten her bra before slipping it off.
“I’ve been waiting for this…” he muttered. “I can’t tell you how many times I’ve thought
about this…”
“It might not be very good…” she warned.
“I don’t care,” he said as he popped one nipple in his mouth and sucked. “I’ll get you like
this first. Just in case I don’t last this first time…”
Hermione nodded her agreement with this, and Draco grinned as he sat back and stripped off
her trousers in a deft move. Merlin, but he couldn’t believe she was doing this now. Their
deadline was still weeks away, and it hadn’t gotten urgent yet. That meant she wanted it.
She wanted him. She wasn’t just doing it because she had to.
“Tell me darling, what inspired this?” he asked as he hooked his fingers through her knickers
and pulled them off so she was finally naked for him. He almost groaned to see her like this:
all soft and wet. Draco spread her legs and settled between her thighs as he started kissing up
to her core.
“You’ve given me everything,” she said a bit breathlessly. “I decided it was time…”
“And do you want this too?” he asked. He knew she must, but he wanted to hear her say it.
“Do you want this with me?”
“Yes,” she whispered. “Yes… I want you, Draco…”
Draco’s magic roared with approval at this, and he rewarded her confession by giving her flat
tongued lick over her cunt before finding her clit. He was becoming an expert at finding it
now and knew exactly what she wanted. The swirls with his tongue always drove her mad.
She was tugging on his hair and writhing against his face, and Draco pressed into her further
to give her the pressure he sensed she was craving.
“I’m close…” she gasped. “I’m gonna…”
“Come all over my face,” he said, and she groaned and then spasmed. Draco’s magic
hummed as she broke, and he felt that tiny gush of wetness release that told him he had
gotten her there. He raised his head to find her watching him with dark eyes, her chest
heaving. He reached up and flicked one nipple just because he could. It made her groan and
arch again, and Draco smiled to see it.
He stood for a moment and shoved his pants down, releasing his cock, which was as hard as
it had ever been. It was throbbing for her, and she eyed it cautiously.
“Do you think it will fit?” she asked a bit faintly.
Draco smiled slowly. “It’s going to be a perfect fit, I just know it.”
Hermione looked a bit nervous again, and Draco furrowed his brow.
“Are you sure, darling? We can wait a bit longer if you wish.”
Her eyes softened. “Thank you for offering, but I don’t want to wait. I just get anxious the
first time I ever do something.”
He smiled and moved over her.
“No need to be anxious about this. We’ll figure it out together.”
She nodded and exhaled. “Alright then.”
Draco leaned forward to kiss her deeply as he positioned himself at her entrance. He was in
disbelief that this was finally happening, and his heart was racing.
He pushed forward just a little, and they both gasped as he started to intrude. This might be
even better than oral sex, he decided. She was so wet, but so tight, and he could feel her
muscles clamping down on him.
“More…” she whispered.
Draco took a shuddering breath but nodded and pressed forward a bit more before dropping
his head to her shoulder. “Fuck, you feel incredible…” he murmured.
Hermione swallowed hard and nodded. “More then… please.”
Draco lifted his head to stare at her. He knew this next push would probably hurt, and sure
enough she seemed to be stealing herself.
“Breathe,” he said as he started making shallow movements before reaching between them
and rubbing on her clit again.
“Oh God…” she groaned, and her eyes rolled back in her head. Good. That was good. He
gritted his teeth as he continued to do it for a few more moments, trying his very best to
distract her from what was about to occur.
As she started to arch again, Draco thrust forward hard, and they both gasped at the same
time as she flinched.
He immediately stilled. “Alright?” he said tightly. He needed to move. He needed to. But
he knew that he had just hurt her, and he was determined to give her a moment.
“Yes,” she whispered. “Yes, I think I’m okay… I think I want…”
This was all the permission Draco needed to begin moving in earnest. Gods but she was
tight. He had never felt anything like this, and he knew he wasn’t going to last much longer.
“How close are you?” he gritted.
“Close…” she groaned. “So close, I…”
“Fuck,” he muttered. He started to count backwards from one hundred in his head to try to
distract himself from the feeling of having her all around him.
“Come for me darling…” he begged. “Please, I want to feel it…”
“I will… I am… I…”
Draco reached between them to press into her clit one more time as he took the nearest nipple
in his mouth, and moments later he felt her flutter all around him.
His magic soared.
She’s coming for you.
Merlin help him, but it was the most amazing sensation, and Draco no longer tried to hold
back. He never thought he would last long this first time, but he didn’t need to. He just
hoped that she would come first, and now she had. It was his turn as he thrust into her once
more, then twice, and then his balls tightened as he felt himself release inside of her.
Give her all of it. Keep it in her.
Draco pulled out and stared down in amazement as he watched his cum, tinged pink, start to
leak out of her. Instinctively he gathered it in his fingers and pushed it back in.
Yes, just like that.
Hermione looked at him in surprise, but he tried to play it off as though he was giving her
more by fingering her gently and rubbing her clit with his thumb.
“Do you have one more in you?” he asked, hoping she would believe that this was the reason
he was touching her right now and not because his magic was tingling at the thought of
keeping her full.
“I don’t know…” she breathed. “That was…”
“Not terrible?” he supplied, with another rub.
Her hips jerked a little, and he smirked down at her.
She huffed. “I was going to say quite good… I can’t believe you got me to come.”
Draco felt his head inflating at this, and she rolled her eyes at him but a small smile was
lingering about her mouth.
“Just imagine how good it will be after we practice a little,” he said.
She laughed lightly and then moved away from his hand, much to his disappointment.
She reached for her wand on the nightstand, and Draco put out a hand to stop her. “Don’t,”
he said. “Leave it.”
She looked at him askance. “It’s messy.”
“It’s really fucking hot,” he countered.
She turned crimson, but dipped her head and placed her wand back down on the nightstand.
“Alright, if you say so. But I will have to clean it off eventually.”
“Tomorrow,” he said. “Sleep just like that for me tonight.”
“You’re incorrigible,” she replied.
“And you’re wonderful. My beautiful wife. Merlin, I’m going to be hard again in fifteen
minutes…”
She laughed. “I’m a bit sore.”
He turned serious. “Shall I fetch a potion?”
She shook her head. “No. But I think I’ve had enough for tonight.”
Draco pouted, and she laughed. “Fine, fine… I’ll give you a few minutes to recover, and
then we can use my mouth. How does that sound?”
Draco sighed happily at this suggestion. “It sounds like I’m the luckiest bloke in the world.”
“I think I’m pretty lucky too,” she said seriously.
Draco smiled at her before pulling her on top of him and kissing her again.
Later on that night, after she had given him one her delightful blow jobs and fallen asleep in
his arms, Draco snuggled his very naked, very exhausted wife who still had remnants of him
drying on her inner thighs.
He had never been happier, he thought, not ever. It wasn’t just because his virginity had
finally expired. It was because she had taken it from him, and he had taken it from her. She
was perfect. They were perfect together. He hoped it would always be like this.
He hoped she felt the same way.
Chapter 19: Confrontations.
10 January 2004.
Draco woke the next morning to a pounding on his door.
“Wha–?” he asked groggily as he nudged Hermione awake too. She blinked owlishly.
“Master Draco, may Patsy come in?” squeaked the little elf.
Draco looked down and saw that he and Hermione were still naked. She yelped a little and
scrambled out of bed to pull some pajamas on, and she threw him his underwear from the
previous night, much to his amusement.
“Come in,” he finally called once they were at least partially covered, and the elf apparated in
with a CRACK!
“Mistress,” she said, looking at Hermione. “A healer is here asking for a health check,” said
Patsy nervously.
Hermione groaned and Draco scowled at this. Of course the Ministry had been informed that
they finally consummated. And of course they were now butting in to make sure they had
used no type of contraception.
“Darling…” he said.
“It’s fine,” she said curtly. “I don’t like it, but they’ve left me alone for the last month. It’s
not unexpected.”
Draco’s mouth thinned, but he nodded.
“Take your time getting dressed,” he said. “If they are in any rush to see you they can go
disturb some other couple while they wait.”
She flashed a grin at him and nodded firmly as she moved to the loo. He heard the shower
start a moment later.
“Patsy,” he said to the little elf, “go tell them we were asleep and have just been woken up.
We will be down when we are able, but they will need to wait.”
Patsy bobbed and left a moment later, while Draco heard the telltale splash that told him his
wife had just entered the shower.
He debated it with himself for a split second, but after the previous night he decided he could
no longer resist. He crept toward the bathroom and pushed it open to find Hermione’s naked
silhouette moving on the other side of the shower glass. His breath caught as he stared at her,
and he quickly discarded the underwear Hermione had thrown to him before approaching the
shower door and finally cracking it open.
“This shower is big enough for two people, you know.”
She didn’t appear surprised to see him, but just blushed a little and smiled. “Come on in,
then.”
Draco stepped in, the heat and scent of her shampoo immediately engulfing him, and he felt
himself hardening in an instant.
“Allow me,” he said softly as he pulled the washcloth from her hands and began to move it
over her body. She sighed happily and let him do it.
“You’re far too good at that,” she murmured.
“It is a husband’s greatest pleasure to serve his wife,” he said simply.
She raised an eyebrow at this and moved into his arms, giving him a lingering kiss.
“I’m afraid we don’t have the time this morning,” she said. “We have a guest waiting for us.”
“Fuck them,” said Draco easily. “They should be happy we’re finally banging. Isn’t that the
entire point?”
Hermione huffed a laugh, but seemed to concede because she let him touch her as the water
poured over both of them.
“Still sore?” he murmured, as he bent down to suckle her neck.
“Only a little…” she said. “I could probably…”
“Mmmm,” agreed Draco happily, and he led her to the large shower bench.
A long while later, after she straddled his lap and impaled herself on his cock any number of
times – just to ensure she stayed in control and didn’t overdo it of course – he reluctantly
moved her off of him and spent some lingering moments cleaning between her thighs.
“I suppose it’s time,” she sighed.
“If we must,” he agreed as he turned the water off and stepped out before handing her a
towel. “I must say though, I’m thrilled with this next stage of our relationship. Shagging
Hermione Granger… it’s a fucking dream come true.”
She laughed lightly at this as she took her time toweling off, dressing, and then drying her
hair.
It was nearly an hour after Patsy had first woken them up that Draco threaded his fingers
through hers and walked down to one of the front parlors where the healer was sitting
impatiently. They both came to a halt as they saw him.
Because it was a him. And that meant…
Draco exchanged a glance with Hermione, and he could see they were thinking precisely the
same thing. She just smirked a little and Draco bit his tongue to stay silent. He couldn’t
wait.
“Mrs. Malfoy,” said the healer irritably.
“It’s Lady Malfoy,” she corrected. “I’m a viscountess.”
The healer blinked and looked thrown off for a moment as Draco just smiled fondly at her.
He would never get tired of hearing her title because it meant she was his.
“Very well,” he said stiffly. “I’ve been waiting for over an hour.”
“Perhaps next time you will make an appointment,” she said sweetly. “As I’m sure our elf
told you, we were asleep when you arrived.”
The healer glowered at this, but seemed determined to move on.
“Fine,” he said curtly. “If you could come here for the blood test?”
“Of course,” said Hermione demurely as she approached him. The healer reached out a hand
and touched her arm for a split second before an enormous CRACK! sent him flying across
the room. He crumpled against the wall and looked at her askance.
“What on earth?” he demanded.
“Oh dear,” said Hermione with mock innocence. “I’m afraid I forgot all about the family
magic. No man but my husband can touch me, you know, not until I'm pregnant.”
Draco’s magic stirred at this.
Give her a baby and keep her here with you.
For once Draco didn’t try to shove the thought away because he was in full agreement.
“You… you…” the healer spluttered, but Hermione just gave him a sweet smile.
“I do apologize. It just slipped my mind, of course. You’re welcome to check my wand, but
I won’t be able to submit to a blood test for you. If the Ministry is really that worried about
it, they are welcome to send a woman next time, though truthfully I wouldn’t bother.”
“And why is that?” he demanded.
“Well first of all, I’ll never be tripped up by a health check. I’ve made that very clear to
every healer who has examined me since the MLPP went into effect. And secondly, I’m not
fertile at the moment. There’s nothing to prevent against.”
The healer’s face darkened.
“Not fertile because –”
“Oh honestly,” said Hermione, rolling her eyes. “Surely they teach you about fertile
windows? You know, the fact that women can only get pregnant a few days per cycle? Well
guess what. Today is not one of those days. Nor was last night, for that matter.”
“You’re preventing,” he declared. “You’re doing it intentionally!”
“Of course,” said Hermione smoothly.
“I’ll report you,” he hissed.
Draco started to step forward, but he stopped when he felt Hermione grip his arm gently.
“I hope you do,” she said seriously. “In fact, you should inform the Minister that I’ve been
teaching my students at Hogwarts all about the various legal ways to prevent pregnancy
under the MLPP. I’m thinking about writing about it in my next op-ed.”
The healer glowered at her, but Hermione just smirked as he rose to his feet and dusted off
his robes. “Minister Shacklebolt will be informed,” he said harshly.
“I certainly hope he is,” she said cordially. “Please give him my regards, won’t you?”
The healer turned and strode out without another word. A moment later they heard the front
door slam shut.
Draco turned to face her.
“You’re brilliant,” he breathed, as he pulled her to him and cupped her face.
She smiled a little. “It was rather satisfying, I must admit.”
He grinned. “I think you should write that op-ed, darling. It would be a public service to any
witches who haven’t become pregnant yet.”
“You know what? I think I’ll do that.”
“Then allow me to fetch you a quill and parchment,” he said. “You can get started before
Teddy and Aunt Andy arrive today.”
She smiled at this, and he strode to the study to grab supplies before hurrying back to her.
“Here you are,” he said with a flourish. “Father’s best parchment. Made from magical
willow bark. Also, a lap desk for your exclusive use.”
“You are all unbelievable,” she muttered as she settled next to Draco on a nearby sofa and
spread the parchment and other supplies on the small lap desk so she could write.
Draco read over her shoulder for a time before he began kissing it, eventually moving to her
neck as he did so.
“You are awfully distracting,” she muttered.
“Mmm, that means I’m doing it right,” he said.
“And when did you get like this?” she asked. “You’ve been ravenous.”
“Of course I’m ravenous,” he said. “And I got like this the moment you let me touch that
sweet cunt of yours for the first time.”
His words had the desired effect. She gasped a little and dropped her quill, as her skin heated
beneath his lips.
“I could spend the rest of my life naked with you, darling, and it would never be enough.”
“You’re mad,” she sighed, though she tilted her head to the side to give him better access as
he traced the line of her top with his fingers.
“I’m not mad, I’m smitten. There’s a difference.”
“I never pictured you the type to become smitten over a girl,” she said.
“Mmm, nor me. But then again, I’ve been starved for affection like this for years. Perhaps it
was inevitable once I met a witch worthy of it.”
“You say such pretty things,” she sighed.
“Only because I mean them,” he said, raising his mouth from her neck to look at her
seriously. “I mean every word. You do know that, right?”
She studied him for just a moment before dipping her head in acknowledgment of this.
Draco’s expression cleared. “Good. Don’t ever doubt it.”
He resumed his attentions, and she made an exasperated noise.
“Draco, I’m supposed to be writing.”
“The print deadline isn’t until eleven at night, remember? Plenty of time for a shag.”
“We’ve already had a shag today… and last night, in case you’re forgetting.”
“There’s time for another.”
“Draco…”
“Darling…”
She rolled her eyes, as she said, “Alright fine. Just one more shag…”
Thirty minutes later Hermione’s parchment was crumpled on the floor, underneath Draco’s
knee as he sank in front of her and ate her out on the sofa while she moaned for him.
That’s alright, he thought. She can write the op-ed tomorrow.

A few hours later
“AUNT MINNIE I HAVE A QUESTION!” came the shout of Teddy Lupin as he ran into the
entry gallery at top speed.
“Just a moment Teddy,” she said as she turned to wait for Andromeda.
“BUT IT’S IMPORTANT!” he cried.
“Inside voice,” she reminded him.
“BUT –”
“Inside voice,” she said again.
Teddy huffed and practically danced as he waited for Hermione to greet Andromeda before
finally turning back to him. Draco watched in amusement as Teddy’s patience quickly ran
out.
“Alright Teddy, what is your question?”
“Is Draco my cousin or my uncle? Because you’re my aunt right? But he’s my cousin too…
and now you’re married… and Gran said I had to ask you!”
He looked at her expectantly as Hermione threw a slightly irritated look at Andromeda who
just gave her a gesture of surrender.
“Perhaps he’s both?” she posed.
“No, you can only be one,” said Teddy. He seemed quite certain.
“Very well,” she said before turning to Draco. “Draco, are you Teddy’s cousin or uncle?”
“In the Black family tree, you will find that you can be both,” said Draco very seriously.
Andromeda’s eyes twinkled with amusement as Teddy frowned for a moment before his
expression cleared.
“That means we’re special!” he cried.
“Or inbred,” muttered Hermione under her voice. Draco glared at her.
“Erm, right. But you can call me whichever you want. Or you can swap off if you want,”
said Draco.
“What does ‘swap off’ mean?” asked Teddy curiously.
“It means taking turns,” said Hermione.
“Oh…” said Teddy, as he contemplated this. Then he furrowed his brow. “I married Victoire
yesterday. So are you her cousin now too?”
Draco cast a helpless look at Hermione, who gave him a small nod. “Erm, yes, I suppose so.
And… how did you marry her?”
“I just did!” he said. “And then I married my neighbor Caroline and Victoire married Louis!”
Draco cocked an eyebrow. “And who is Louis?”
“Her brother,” said Teddy seriously. “He’s a baby.”
“Ah,” replied Draco. “So I take it the Weasleys are like the Blacks then?"
Hermione smacked him lightly on the shoulder and he just grinned.
He could get used to this extended family thing.

11 January 2004
“Darling, are you sure you want to do this?” said Draco, as he stared up at the imposing grey
monstrosity that was Azkaban prison.
“Yes, I think it’s time.”
Draco’s jaw clenched, but he nodded once. “Very well.”
“And Draco, you cannot lose your temper.”
He scoffed. Between the two of them, Hermione was the one with the temper. Then again,
Draco had been known to lose it a time or two. Especially with him.
“You’re sure we need to visit the –”
“Yes,” she said. “I need to know where I stand with him before he’s out of prison. You know
Prudence is thinking of shagging him soon.”
It was true. Hermione had visited Prudence the previous afternoon and told her all about
Lucius’s support getting the MLPP repealed. It was enough to make Prudence give real
thought to giving Weasley what he wanted so that they could both get out of there.
“There’s no guarantee he will even consent to see us,” muttered Draco as they approached the
prison.
“Oh I think he’ll see us,” said Hermione. “Or me, at any rate.”
Draco gave her a sideways glance. “Darling… if I could make a request?”
She sighed. “What is it?”
“Don’t see him unless he agrees to let both of us be there.”
“And why not?”
“I want to hear what he has to say for himself,” said Draco. “And besides, I’d like to present
a united front.”
She chewed on her lip for a moment, but then nodded before raising the knocker for the
door. A moment later the window opened, and the familiar voice of Maywood floated
through.
“Both of you today?”
“Yes sir,” said Draco.
They heard the door being unbolted, and it opened to reveal the familiar waiting room.
“We’re both here to see Ronald Weasley,” said Hermione. “And if you could please tell
him… I will only visit if he consents to see Draco too.”
Maywood cocked an eyebrow at this, but nodded once. “Alright. I must say, this will make
for a lively afternoon if he agrees. I’ll be back in a moment.”
They both sat in the waiting room, watching the minutes tick by until Maywood returned.
Draco glanced at Hermione and noticed she appeared to be uncharacteristically nervous as
she jiggled her foot.
“It will be fine,” he said under his breath.
“Oh now you’re saying it will be fine?”
He sighed. “Because it will be. You’re strong enough for whatever he throws your way.
And if you don’t reconcile, then you are no worse off than you are today, right?”
“I suppose that’s true,” she said quietly.
“Then don’t worry about it. Do whatever you need to do.”
She swallowed hard but nodded, as Maywood came back into the room. “He’ll see you
both,” he said. “Give me just a moment while I call a replacement. I don’t want to miss
this.”
Hermione rolled her eyes a little, but Draco saw a small smile crack her veneer, and he
exhaled with relief. She would be fine. He would be fine. Nobody would have a wand, and
Weasley still couldn’t physically touch his wife. The very worst thing that could happen was
some minor muggle fighting between Weasley and Draco before Maywood would surely
intervene.
“Alright,” said Maywood as another guard entered the lobby and settled himself behind the
desk. “You know the drill. Wands stay here.”
Hermione and Draco both turned over their wands before following Maywood down the
hall. He led them into the same visitation room Draco had now been to a few times.
Weasley gave them both sullen looks as they entered. There was silence for a moment as
they took in each other’s appearances.
Weasley did not look well. His hair was too long and appeared a bit greasy. He wasn’t
nearly as thin as Hermione had gotten, but he clearly lost some weight. His eyes had dark
circles under them, and he slumped in his chair. He looked both defeated and resentful.
“Why are you here?” he finally ground out.
Hermione weighed his question for a moment. “Draco and Lucius will soon be working to
get the MLPP repealed in full. If that happens, I need to know where we stand.”
Draco thought he saw the faintest flash of interest cross Weasley’s face at this before it
disappeared.
“Why? You’ve made it pretty clear you choose the Death Eater,” he said.
“Yes,” she replied. “But you never really wanted me, Ron. We both know it.”
Draco blinked in surprise at this and studied Weasley’s reaction. Weasley just rolled his eyes.
“It wasn’t like there was a better option,” he muttered.
“Maybe not a year ago,” she conceded, “but now? Is there really not a better option now?”
He didn’t respond to this, but just stared moodily at the table.
“I think,” she said slowly, “that you owe your wife an apology. Not to mention me.”
His eyes flashed. “Don’t you think I’ve apologized to her over and over again?”
“Do you regret it then? Scheming with Lucius to come up with some mad plan to save me
from Draco?”
“You were my friend!” he exclaimed. “And I had some feelings for you… I mean I always
thought I did… can you really blame me for trying?”
“Yes!” she insisted. “Yes I can blame you! Because your feelings for me were lukewarm at
best! They were only there because I was the easy choice, the comfortable choice! But now
you’re with a woman who could actually love you, and you bollocksed it all up because you
think I can’t handle myself with Draco sodding Malfoy!”
An array of emotions flashed across Weasley’s face. “He’s a Death Eater,” he said, and
Draco thought he sounded almost desperate as he said it.
Hermione rolled her eyes. “No he’s not.”
“He is! He’s –”
“Wonderful to me,” she said quietly. Weasley blinked in surprise “He treats me like a
damned queen. He’s incredibly respectful. He fought his own family magic that was
compelling him to shag me so that we consummated our marriage on my terms and not his.
He grew up, Ronald. It’s time you did the same thing.”
Draco turned to look at her, affection for her threatening to make his persona crack.
“I don’t –” he started, but she cut him off.
“You cut a deal with Lucius. He is far more Death Eater than Draco ever was.”
Weasley’s jaw clamped shut at this, and there was silence for a long while.
Finally, Weasley broke it.
“I… regret what I did. And not just for the obvious reasons,” he said, gesturing around the
visitation room. “But you have to understand, I thought I was saving you from Azkaban and
marrying the git right in front of me. I cared about you. I still do. And I was willing to put
aside whatever… feelings I might have been developing for Prudence and choose you
instead.”
Draco sensed Hermione starting to waver, and he jumped in. He had never shared this with
Hermione, but Draco finally decided it was time.
“You told Shacklebolt you would do whatever it took to make sure Hermione consummated
within thirty days.”
Weasley’s expression hardened as he turned to glare at Draco.
“And?”
“And it sounded like you were willing to rape her to do it,” said Draco bluntly.
At this, Weasley blanched, and his jaw dropped in horror. “Of course I wouldn’t rape her!
That’s not what I meant… That’s not what Kingsley was saying… he…”
Hermione’s eyes were narrowed, as she held up a hand to stop him. “I get it,” she said.
“Perhaps it was a poor choice of words on your part… or maybe testosterone speaking? But
you need to understand that marital rape is precisely the sort of thing the MLPP encourages.
That’s what you would have had to do to get me to consummate a marriage with you. I
would never have done it on my own, so if you weren’t willing to rape me you would have
ended up in Azkaban anyway… only it would have happened a month later and after I hexed
you into oblivion for forcing a marriage behind my back.”
Weasley looked sick as he considered this, and then he seemed to deflate.
“Mione,” he said. “I’m sorry. I didn’t mean that, truly. I would never do that to you or to
anybody.”
She was quiet for a long while as she absorbed this, and then she finally nodded once. “Fine.
I believe it because you are still here and haven’t raped Prudence yet to get released.”
He looked hurt. “You don’t believe me because we’re friends?”
“I don’t know if we’re friends right now, Ron,” she said softly. “I honestly don’t know how
to come back from this. It was a huge betrayal, and it resulted in me marrying Draco before I
was ready to do it.”
Draco’s stomach clenched at this.
“But you would have married him eventually?” asked Weasley shrewdly.
Hermione hesitated, but then nodded a little. “Yes. Eventually.”
The knot in Draco’s stomach eased as he decided to take her at her word. She was telling
Weasley nothing less than the truth. Draco knew the amendment was the only reason she had
consented to marry him when she did. That didn’t mean she would have stayed in Azkaban
forever to avoid him.
“Why?” asked Weasley, looking both pained and bitter. “Why him? Why after
everything…”
Hermione gave a deep sigh. “Because he grew up. We all grew up, Ron. The war changed
us – you know it did – why couldn’t it change him too? Draco was – is – loyal to me. He
puts me before himself or his family. I’m not expected to just fix his problems or go out of
my own way to fit into his life. He has accommodated me over and over again so that I
wouldn’t have to be the one to do it. The MLPP is a terrible law, and he has done everything
he could do to make it as easy as possible on me.”
Draco felt his cheeks heating up at the praise.
“I would have accommodated you, Mione! You know that!”
“No you wouldn’t have,” she said, almost gently. “That’s not what we do, Ron. We bicker
and argue because we don’t bend for the other. We never have. And I’m not saying that’s
necessarily a bad thing, but it makes a poor basis for marriage. Draco though… he’s changed
a lot about his life over the past few months so that I can fit into it, and in doing so it means
that I’ve changed too.”
“How?” he asked miserably.
She looked pensive, and Draco started feeling a bit nervous again.
“He’s made me… more willing to seek compromise. He’s made me see that sometimes I
need to accept help. He has given me my self-confidence back. He makes me feel wanted,
beautiful, unstoppable. I’m not just a nagging know-it-all.”
Draco’s stomach eased again.
“You’re not a nagging know-it-all,” grumbled Weasley.
She rolled her eyes. “You have called me that so many times over the years the words have
almost lost their meaning. Draco though… never. Not once.”
They fell silent for a long while.
Finally, Weasley sighed deeply. “What do you want from me? I’ve apologized. I’ve gone to
fucking prison. I’m not sure what else I can do.”
Hermione sat back and studied him, lips pursed.
“Prudence would like reconciliation,” she said slowly.
“And you?” asked Weasley.
“Perhaps,” said Hermione. “Though I will need to see that you truly mean it when you say
you’re sorry. I need to know that you understand just how much this hurt me. The only
reason I would consider reconciling at all is because it backfired and convinced me to marry
the correct man. I’ll admit it cut through my own stubbornness on that front.”
At this, Draco felt himself start to smile, and he turned to grab her hand. He raised it to kiss
the back of it, and he relished the slightly discontented sound Weasley made as he did it.
“And how do I do that?” he gritted out.
“Own your mistakes with your family and make your mother understand that this was all on
you. Apologize to Draco as well. Treat Prudence with dignity going forward. Allow
yourself to have feelings for her and date her. Spoil her. Bend for her. Do all the things for
her you would never do for me.”
“And then?”
“And then… maybe… someday… we can have a group lunch where I won’t hex you.
There’s a long way to go before we’re to that point, though. And just in case you haven’t
figured it out, you should know that Harry helped Draco and me get married. He’s on my
side with this, as is Ginny. If you get out of Azkaban and start treating any of us poorly again
because of this mess that you helped create, then I’m going to consider our relationship
totally beyond repair. There are no more chances, Ronald.”
Weasley chewed on his lip for a long while, but finally nodded glumly, and Hermione and
Draco stood. Draco laced his fingers through Hermione’s and said, “Come along, my
darling. We should go.”
Weasley’s eyes bugged out slightly at the term of endearment, and he turned red again as he
watched them move toward the door. As they approached he called, “Malfoy.”
They both stopped, and Draco turned back to Weasley, with one eyebrow raised.
Weasley was silent for a time as he seemed to struggle with the words. “I’m… sorry. For
everything.”
Draco contemplated this weak apology. He didn’t particularly care what Weasley felt or
didn’t. They would never be close, not even if Hermione forgave him someday. Then again,
he had gotten the girl, and he was now working on his own plan to keep her after the MLPP
was gone. He knew Hermione well enough to know exactly how she would wish him to
behave.
“Thank you. And I’m sorry for treating you, Potter, and Hermione poorly as a child. There
was no excuse for my bullying. I do understand why you wished to ‘save’ her from me.
Now that I know her, I would honestly be inclined to do the same thing. Just know that
there’s nothing to save her from when it comes to me, not anymore. Even my parents have
come around. It’s impossible to hate her for too long, you know. It’s much easier to love
her.”
He sensed Hermione’s eyes widen at this, but he decided to stare at Weasley to catalog his
reaction instead of turning to her. As expected, Weasley went red and started to splutter a bit
in disbelief, but he said nothing coherent that Draco had to counteract.
Draco just nodded to himself and tugged on Hermione’s hand to lead her out of the room. As
soon as the door shut, he pulled her into a hug and felt her sink into him.
“Alright?” he asked softly.
She nodded into his chest, and he thought he felt a wet spot growing, but if she was crying
she was doing it silently. They stayed that way for a moment before she pulled back and
sniffed a little.
“That was hard.”
“I’m sure it was,” said Draco with as much sympathy as he could muster. Truthfully, he had
never understood what Hermione saw in the Weasel, but he supposed shared history counted
for something.
“I do feel better though… more settled,” she said. “And I don’t think he’s going to exit
Azkaban with guns blazing either. I was trying to head that off.”
“No, I think he’ll emerge with his tail between his legs,” agreed Draco.
“Do you think I gave in too easily? Or should I have been more forgiving?” she asked
pensively.
Draco reached down to cup her chin and tilted her face up toward his.
“The only person who can answer that is you, darling. It doesn’t matter how somebody else
would react to this – all that matters is that you do what is right for you. I know you two
have a long history together, and you went through a lot. Ending a friendship like that so
abruptly would be a shock, and if you don’t wish to do that, I certainly won’t criticize you for
it. I also think it’s fine to give it time, and if you two are never as close to one another as you
once were, that’s reasonable as well. It’s perfectly possible to be cordial with one another in
the future without being very close friends again.”
She furrowed her brow as she listened, nodding slowly.
“You’re right. I don’t know if I can cut him off forever because my history with Ron and
Harry was such a big part of my entire wizarding identity. But I also don’t think I’ll ever be
as close to him as I once was, nor to Molly if she ever bothers to apologize.”
“Perhaps not, but that’s not necessarily a bad thing. You’ve gained some new relationships
through this and rekindled old ones,” he reminded her. “Friendships are meant to evolve.
Sometimes that means a little distance is warranted.”
“That’s true,” she said, smiling a little. “Thank you for coming…. And for being the bigger
person.”
She blushed a little, and Draco leaned down and gave her a light kiss.
“I meant what I said. It’s far easier to love you than hate you.”
It wasn’t precisely the declaration Draco had been dreaming of, but he knew that would come
when the time was right. As it was, Draco caught a small smile on her face that lingered for
the rest of the day, and when they came together that evening it was with a renewed fervor.
He didn’t just love her, he was in love with her.
Eventually he would find a way to tell her.
Chapter 20: Oops.
14 January 2004.
Hermione had turned angry again.
Or perhaps angry wasn’t the correct word. Perhaps a better description would be moody,
irritated, and overly sensitive.
Admittedly, it took Draco a couple days to notice, since she was back at Hogwarts teaching
during the day. But there was no mistaking it when her muggle toothpaste failed to squeeze
out on the first try, and she vanished the entire thing in annoyance.
At first he thought it must be Weasley’s release from Azkaban. Prudence had finally agreed
to do the deed, and soon they were both out. The press gave them more fanfare than was
necessary, but Weasley had simply said “no comment” to every question thrown his way.
Draco had to begrudgingly admit that he seemed to be chastened, at least for now.
In any event, Hermione didn’t comment on it, so Draco wondered if it was really Weasley
after all.
“It’s fucking PMS,” she growled when he asked her what had gotten her knickers in a twist.
Draco, who was not precisely sure what this acronym stood for, merely nodded somberly and
tried to make comforting noises while sending a very confused Patsy out to acquire more
muggle toothpaste.
“She’s not your fucking servant, Draco,” snarled Hermione as she stomped into the room and
overheard this order.
Patsy was his servant, actually, but Draco did not feel it in his best interest to remind
Hermione of that fact just now. She looked ready to bite his head off.
Instead, he settled tentatively into bed, held his breath, and said a little prayer that both of his
bollocks would be intact by the following morning.
The next morning brought with it an even more surprising sight: Granger, turning weepy over
a photo album of Crookshanks while the cat in question looked on imperiously.
“He was just so… so… smart! ” she gasped, as tears streamed down her face.
“Darling,” said Draco cautiously, “he’s right there. And I’d wager the old chap is just as
smart as ever, aren’t you, Crooks?”
Crookshanks deigned to honor him with a brief purr at this compliment, and Hermione
sniffed hard then wiped her tears away.
“Oh it’s not Crookshanks, truly… I just feel terrible! I’m never going to make it through
class today!” she moaned.
Draco furrowed his brow. “If you’re getting ill…”
“I’m not ill!” she snapped.
Draco closed his mouth and surveyed his wife. She was prettier than ever, though her curls
were tangled and her nose a bit red from her tears. He truly had no notion about what was
happening.
He gathered every ounce of courage and tried again.
“Darling… I’m afraid I’m a bit out of my depths. Please tell me what’s wrong so I can fix
it.”
“It’s my bloody period!” she exclaimed. “And unless you can give me a hysterectomy I’m
stuck with it until menopause or…”
She trailed off and groaned as she sank back into bed.
The lightbulb in Draco’s brain mercifully went off.
Periods. Her period has returned.
Gathering everything he could ever remember from Pansy’s vague hints and complaints over
the years, Draco said, “Fear not. I will be right back.”
He ducked out of their room and called Patsy for a few supplies, and then returned moments
later with his offerings: a hot water bottle, a scented candle, and Belgian chocolate.
She looked at it and sniffed.
“Erm… do you prefer Swiss?” he asked tentatively. “That can be arranged, darling, we will
only need a moment to…”
He stopped talking as she grabbed the chocolate and took a bite, groaning in satisfaction.
The sound made his cock wake up.
Draco was momentarily overcome, and some distant part of his brain wondered where,
exactly, his Slytherin sense of self-preservation had gotten to. He placed his other gifts on
her nightstand as his hand drifted under the covers and moved across her breasts.
Her eyes shot open.
“You cannot be serious,” she said, through the chocolate.
Alarm bells should have gone off in Draco’s brain, but something inside of him was no doubt
broken. Instead of sensing danger, his brain was flooded with endorphins as he palmed those
luscious breasts that were now back to their full glory. His virginity was gone, he had made
his wife come on his hands and tongue and cock. He was now Very Sexually Experienced
and felt certain he knew precisely what she liked.
And she did like having her breasts played with. She made the most delicious little noises
whenever he did it. It was endlessly fascinating.
He tried again, and she smacked him on the hand.
“Excuse me,” she growled.
Draco’s brow furrowed in confusion.
“Darling, you love this… I love this…”
I love you, he added quietly to himself.
“I’m on my period.”
“So? How does that inhibit pleasurable activities?” he asked, as his hand drifted down to her
stomach.
She looked at him in confusion. “Well my breasts are more sensitive than usual for one
thing–”
“Ah, I was handling you too roughly then. My apologies dearest, I’ll be gentle.”
His fingers started to drift back up, and she slapped him on the hand again.
“I said no,” she stated firmly.
Draco blinked, all the endorphins evaporating on the spot. He removed his hand of course,
but now he was terribly confused. She hadn’t spurned one of his advances in weeks.
“Okay…” he said slowly, “but why?”
“Because I’m on my period!” she said, looking at him like he had three heads.
“And why is that a problem?” he insisted. “It’s just a little blood isn’t it? You bled our first
time together, it wasn’t that much.”
“Just a little…” she started, before closing her eyes as though asking for patience. Finally
she exhaled and looked up at him seriously. “For me? No. It’s not just a little blood, at least
not for the first couple of days. It is… well, a deluge might be a bit of an overstatement, but
it’s not that far from the truth.”
“A deluge,” he repeated, trying to wrap his mind around it.
“Yes, it’s quite rough, and it makes me feel like my ovaries are being ripped out. I know that
some people… are into that,” and she turned crimson at this, “but not me. I’m bloated,
peevish, bloody. And I have to wrangle smelly teenagers in approximately ninety minutes.
That is not something that turns me on.”
Draco sighed and nodded. “My apologies, darling. I had no notion.”
Her gaze softened. “It’s alright. It’s different for every woman. Mine is what you might call
fast and furious. It’s rough going for a few days, but it will be over soon.”
He nodded firmly. “Well then… the moment you are feeling up to it, do let me know. I
might be addicted…”
He leaned down and gave her a chocolatey kiss.
“Delicious,” he murmured, and she gave him a reluctant smile before it dropped from her
face, and she slumped back in bed.
“What is it, darling?” he asked.
“Teenagers. Why must it be teenagers?”
He chuckled a little. “Just go in there and boss them around like you do to me. Half the
blokes will be in love with you, and the other half terrified of you. And the witches will have
a perfect role model to emulate.”
Her eyes opened, and she smiled again.
“Alright, fine. But if they fuck with me for the rest of the week I'll probably end up hexing
them.”
“That’s the spirit, darling.”

24 January 2004
The worst of Hermione’s symptoms subsided within the first few days, and by the following
weekend she was back to shagging him again.
“Just another day or two bare, and then we’ll have to take certain precautions,” she said
seriously, as she guided him inside of her.
Draco didn’t know what these precautions were, nor did he care. He just knew that his daily
wanks while she was out of commission were a truly poor substitute for the feeling of her
mouth or cunt.
He was insatiable.
A lifetime of suppressing his sexuality had bubbled up over the past month, once Hermione
finally let him into her body. It was hard to believe that it had only started on Christmas, and
yet he felt he knew her intimately now.
He told himself that a healthy sex drive was a good thing, especially in light of the meetings
his father had lined up for the first couple of weeks of February. Lucius took the position that
nothing useful ever happened right after the holidays, and everyone needed a month to
recover from that much togetherness before business could get underway. The negotiations
to repeal the MLPP would therefore begin on the first business day of February, and Draco
would be with his father through the entire thing.
That meant Draco had a few more days of freedom before he would be crusading to overturn
the thing binding his wife to him – and he fully intended to get his fill of her while he did it.
Surely he could convince her that he was her other half. She would have no need to seek
another match once she was no longer obligated to be bound to him because Draco could
give her everything she wanted. He was the only wizard who knew her body so well. She
would never even be tempted to try it with somebody else.
That was his plan, at any rate. And it had the lovely side effect of giving him a perfect
specimen of a wife whose body and sounds positively enthralled him.
He thought he was making rather good progress too, because Hermione herself seemed to
have a healthy sex drive and continued to initiate now and then. Sometimes she took control,
and Draco loved it. Other times she wanted him to lead, and he brought her to completion
over and over again. It was a heady, powerful feeling to make a witch as assertive and strong
as Hermione Granger practically weep with need for him.
He wouldn’t have been surprised to discover his head no longer fit through the door to their
bedroom, so inflated was it whenever she begged.
It wasn’t until they were approaching the end of January that Hermione threw a slight
curveball into their sexual relationship, though it ended up being a brilliant thing indeed.
“What is that?” asked Draco, as she pulled out a small, flat, shiny packet and tossed it to him.
“It’s a condom,” she said.
“Pardon?” asked Draco.
She rolled her eyes. “I thought you read all about contraceptives!”
“I did,” he insisted. “But I’ve never seen one.”
She huffed. “I’ll show you in a minute. But you need to wear it for the next week or so if
you want to… you know.”
“Be inside of you?” asked Draco, watching her intently.
Hermione turned a little pink, but nodded. “Yes. I’ve been tracking my cycle now, and I’m
guessing I’m still a few days away from being fertile, but we shouldn’t risk it. Sperm lives
up to five days, you know.”
“And this foil thing will what… capture my seed?” he asked in confusion. He had no notion
of how this could possibly work.
She suppressed a laugh. “It’s not the foil, but the thing inside of it that does that. Go ahead
and open it.”
Feeling slightly foolish, Hermione showed Draco how to tear the packet open. Inside was a
round, whitish thing that was oddly soft and stretchy.
“Explain,” said Draco.
Hermione just gave him a coy smile and climbed toward him. “Tell you what,” she
breathed. “How about I put it on you this first time, yes?”
His breath hitched, as he looked at her golden eyes, darkening a bit. He nodded mutely, and
she kissed him before pulling back and sighing a little. “Always so good for me.”
Draco flushed at the praise. At times he felt ridiculous for just how much it affected him, but
he couldn’t help it. She could be so sarcastic and biting that hearing her tell him he was good
simply made his insides turn to honey. It was so warm and gratifying.
She settled into his lap and tugged his shirt off over his head before running her hands down
his chest. Before he knew it she was unbuckling his belt and unfastening his trousers. Draco
lifted his hips to help her, and his breathing grew shallow and she slid them off and then
palmed him.
“Let’s see him, shall we?” she asked with a bit of coyness that made his pulse scatter.
She pulled down his underwear and his cock sprang free, already weeping for her.
“He’s so pretty,” she sighed with contentment as she gripped it and softly stroked.
Fucking hell she was personifying his cock.
This was…
Draco closed his eyes and exhaled.
Self-control man.
This woman, this witch, continued to surprise him. He would never get enough of her, he
was absolutely certain of it.
She stroked him a few more times until she deemed him ready, and then she pulled out that…
condom she called it… and centered it on the top of his cock.
“You just roll it down like this,” she said, and to Draco’s surprise it unfurled itself to cover
his entire length in a sheath. “I did some research, and this one is thin. Hopefully you can
feel enough sensation through it. Also, you’re supposed to leave some room at the end,” she
added, now pinching it a little to position it correctly. “We have to leave space for your
release.”
Draco swallowed hard and nodded.
“And now you can come inside of me,” she said simply. “It’s not a perfect method of
contraception, but none are. This will let us enjoy each other even through my fertile
periods.”
Draco pulled her in to kiss her deeply. “You’re perfect, you know that?” he murmured.
She turned a little pink, but didn’t contradict him and just smiled knowingly.
“Well I should remind you that we are absolutely breaking the law this time, so you shouldn’t
say a word about it to anybody. Though why the Ministry of Magic thinks they can prevent
condoms from proliferating in the wizarding world is beyond me. They are widely available
at muggle shops. I simply paid in cash for these so it was untraceable. I assume they are
relying on most wizards being ignorant about the muggle world to stop it.”
“We can keep them in my dresser, and I won’t say a word,” said Draco. “That’s where I
stored the polyjuice when I married you. Nobody would look there.”
She gave him a relieved smile and leaned in to kiss him again before opening herself to him.
“Now then,” she said against his lips. “Make me come.”
“Yes ma’am,” agreed Draco as he pressed himself inside of her. It felt different, to be sure,
and it dulled the sensation for him quite a bit. But he was still here, shagging his wife, and it
was pleasurable enough. He could feel her heat and tightness through the odd device as he
began to move. He soon decided that he much preferred going bare to using a condom, but
he was still grateful for it and would not trade this invention for the world. This muggle
contraption was going to enable him to be intimate with his wife through her fertile period.
And the fact that he couldn't feel her quite as well meant that he lasted longer for her too. He
wrung an extra orgasm out of her before he reached his own end with it.
His last thought, as they both approached their final peak, was a keen appreciation for muggle
ingenuity.
Muggles really know what they are about.

27 January 2004
Draco’s second heat started much like the first.
Find her and fuck a baby into her. Find her and fuck a baby into her.
The urges turned insistent and then painful and finally feverish as he did his best to resist. He
told himself he was ready for it. The last one had taken them both by surprise, but Hermione
had started tracking her cycles as soon as the MLPP was first announced, and she gave Draco
advanced warning of when she thought her next fertile period would be. Sure enough, she
was correct within a day, and Draco marveled at his wife’s ability to predict such things.
Or he would have marveled at it if he hadn’t been so bloody uncomfortable.
Even knowing what was to come, both of them had forgotten a critical detail from the
previous fertile period: Hermione had been at the Manor with him through the entire thing.
This time, the onset of it began during the middle of the week, and Draco was forced to go
many hours without her while she was at Hogwarts teaching. The moment she stepped
through the floo each day, Draco practically hauled her into their room and devoured her.
She let him do it, and a combination of tricking the magic with her need and using condoms
so he could actually shag her this time helped slate Draco’s urges, at least when she was with
him.
The final day of it, however, was so bad that Draco was nearly burning with fever by the time
she arrived home.
“Thank Merlin you’re here,” he gasped. “Last time we spent the whole day in bed together,
remember?”
“Mmmm,” she hummed, because she couldn’t speak. Draco was pressing her against the
wall in the gallery, right next to the floo, his tongue shoved down her throat.
“Draco!” cried Narcissa’s sharp voice. “Take it upstairs!”
Draco’s mouth made a rather obscene sound as he came up for air and glared at his mother.
“We are heading there, Mother,” he insisted.
She raised one, skeptical eyebrow.
“Faster, please. Nobody wants to see it.”
Hermione’s face was crimson, but Draco was in no state to care. He grabbed her hand and
tugged, taking the stairs two at a time as he pulled her after him until they turned the corner
into the hallway with his room. Here, out of the sight of his mother, he pushed her against
the wall again and resumed what he was doing.
His hands were eager, his lips desperate, as he nipped and tugged and sucked down her neck
and toward her breasts.
“Please…” he groaned. “Please, Hermione…”
“Yes, but not here…”
“Room’s too far,” he said as he dropped to his knees in front of her and shoved her skirt up.
“Christ,” she muttered, but she didn’t resist further as she spread her legs and let Draco
disappear under it.
The scent of her made him lightheaded, and his magic surged as he shoved her knickers to
the side and buried his face into her.
She made desperate, keening sounds while Draco gripped her waist and pulled her down on
him harder, deeper. If only his tongue was twice as long to fit all the way inside of her.
The taste of her did little to help and simply stoked the fire inside of him. He knew there was
only one thing to do. He had to get inside of her. He had to get inside of her right now.
Hermione seemed to sense his frustration, because she was trembling, but her voice came out
firm.
“We have to get to your room,” she said. “Right now. Before we do this without any
protection.”
Who needs protection? his magic asked, but Draco didn’t dare to say it out loud. Even in his
haze he knew she was right. He wouldn’t cross that line with her. He wouldn’t.
She would let him do it with a condom on though, he knew that by now. The previous few
days had seen them burning through their supply, but she still had several left, enough to
make it through this fertile window. Then there was the promise of going bare for a couple
more weeks while she restocked.
Draco forced his face away from her, feeling like he was going to be ill as he moved back.
He swallowed back the bile and tried to wrestle with the magical fever taking hold as he
stood to grab her hand and pulled again.
“Come on then,” he said roughly.
He couldn’t say anything else. He started to run.
His room was at the end of the very long corridor on the second floor of the east gallery.
Most of the time it meant that he and Hermione had ample privacy, not to mention a lovely
view over the gardens and small Quidditch pitch. He had moved there after starting at
Hogwarts as a way to give himself some space from his parents. It had always served him
well until very recently. Now, however, it was so bloody far away from the damned floo on
the first floor that he found himself cursing it.
At long last, they made it, and he wrenched the door open.
“Out,” he barked at Crookshanks, who for once seemed to sense the seriousness of Draco’s
order and streaked out of the room, making his way down the same wretched hall before
disappearing around a corner.
Draco yanked Hermione through the door, shut it, and barely took the time to lock and
silence it before turning his attention to her clothes.
Her professional blouse and skirt – which were objectively lovely – were in the way of what
he wanted.
Without taking a moment to think about what he was doing, he reached down and ripped her
blouse open, as buttons went scattering across the floor.
“Draco!” she scolded, but her eyes were dark.
“It's fine,” he said, now sweating with the effort of maintaining what little control he still
had. “I’ll buy you a new one.”
The skirt, fortunately, had an elastic band, so this did not require ripping, and a sharp yank
pulled it down over her hips and arse, where it pooled on the floor.
Her undergarments were lovely today, prettier and lacier than usual, as though she was
certain he was going to see them. He forced himself to step back and look at her as he
quickly disrobed himself. She had made an effort for him, he was sure of it, and he knew he
should take the time to savor it. But the few seconds it took him to strip too was all the
attention he could give. He was too eager for her.
“Beautiful,” he said, as he cupped her breasts and then quickly unclasped her bra to let it fall
free. “But I need you. I feel like I'm about to die.”
Hermione gave him a look that clearly said, Stop being dramatic, but Draco felt like he was
telling her the truth. He was about to die if he couldn’t get inside of her in the next ten
seconds.
Mercifully she did not make him wait as she hooked her fingers inside her knickers and
pulled them down, while Draco scrambled to pull a condom out of the warded dresser. His
hands were shaking badly as he tore the packet open, and he moved back toward her to reach
between her legs for her wetness before coating himself with it. His magic settled ever so
slightly as he shoved the condom down on his cock and rolled it to the bottom with nowpracticed hands before turning to his wife.
“On the bed, legs open,” he said, and her eyes went wide, but she didn’t object.
She did as he asked, and Draco leaned down once more to ensure that she still had some
lubrication for herself before positioning himself at her entrance and pushing in.
His magic trilled, seeming to recognize both the want he had spread over himself and the
tightness of her channel. It seemed to think he was inside of her, barrier-free.
“Thank Merlin,” he gasped as he started to rock.
It was only now that his attention truly drifted to his wife beneath him. He had been feeling
feral, animalistic, and totally unable to focus on her.
It was abominable, and Draco determined that he would make it up to her.
“I’m sorry,” he said. “It was so much worse without you today and-“
She put her finger to his lips to cut him off.
“That’s alright. I rather like it when you manhandle me. It’s sexy.”
Relief bloomed inside of him. He hadn’t frightened her or made her uncomfortable, then.
“Still. Tell me what you want, darling. The magic is still potent, but this is taking the edge
off.”
“Make me come, Draco,” she said. “Maybe…”
“Maybe what?” he prompted.
“Maybe from behind? I’ve wanted to try it like that.”
She looked hesitant and shy, but Draco gripped her face so she would look at him.
“Hell yes,” he groaned. “I’ve fantasized about that so much.”
She smiled, and he pulled out for a moment before flipping her over on her stomach and
pulling her to her knees.
“Circe this is hot,” he muttered as he brushed her arse with his hand. “Arch your back for me
darling, let me see it…”
She did, and Draco groaned.
“Fucking perfect,” he muttered, as he found her entrance and pushed.
Oh Merlin, this was tighter than anything they had done before. And the angle gave him all
the leverage to go balls deep inside of her.
Fuck a baby into her just like this.
Draco didn’t even bother to tell the magic to stop, because he knew it was no use. Besides,
the part of him that was flooded with hormones and marital magic – in other words – nearly
every bit of him – actually agreed.
I want to fuck her and fill her just like this.
But he knew he couldn’t do it today. It would have to wait. Just a few more hours, and she
would be out of her fertile window, and he could give her what his magic so craved.
Instead, he thrust, hard and fast, and Hermione cried out as her chest sank to the bed. She
began to shake and it wasn’t long before he felt her break. His magic roared with triumph to
see his wife spread out before him like that, awash in her own pleasure.
Draco could have come too, but he resisted a moment longer. Something about the way she
had come so beautifully made him want to kiss her and cherish her and watch her do it again,
but this time he wanted to see her face.
He pulled out and flipped her over again before settling back on the bed and pulling her into
his lap. She seemed to sense what he wanted, because she draped her legs around him and
brushed his sweaty hair out of his face with her hands before leaning in to give him a deep
kiss and sinking down on his cock again. He hissed at the sensation, already so close to the
edge.
He wanted her to carry him over it.
“Ride me,” he grunted. “Use me. I want you to come for me one more time darling.”
Hermione gave him a truly decadent smirk as she accepted the control he was turning over to
her, and then she began to move, swirling her hips and then pulling her legs under her so she
could bounce up and down on him.
His jaw dropped, and he stared in her face. Her golden eyes were alive, warm, and Draco
thought something big was happening. He didn’t know why it was different this time, but
they seemed to be on the precipice of something. There was no hesitation, no shame as they
took everything they wanted from each other. Draco’s magic seemed to heat as it sensed
them both approaching the end.
She climaxed with a gasp, and the expression on her face was transcendent. It unraveled him,
and he was utterly at her mercy, this extraordinary witch who was his, at least for now.
Draco felt that telltale moment of release right before it happened, and he captured her lips as
he fell into it. His magic sang, and tiny lights seemed to burst before his eyes as he spurted
long and hot, the quantity enhanced thanks to the family magic.
Draco didn’t release her when he was done, but just held her close as they slumped into each
other. They stayed that way for a long while, Draco’s magic finally sated as the fever fell
away, and he softened inside of her.
Tell her what she means to you.
His magic was more of a whisper than a demand this time, and perhaps he was feeling
reckless because he decided to heed it. That was the thing that had changed between them
moments earlier. He was certain about how he felt. And this was the time to tell her, while
they were naked together, after she had just given him everything.
“Hermione,” he said, and he watched as her eyes opened to look at him. She was almost
delicate like this, absolutely perfect. “I’m in love with you darling. And I know you might
not feel the same way, but I need to tell you. Because this… us… it’s everything I want.”
She looked surprised, and then a little shy as she smiled slowly and gave him a soft kiss.
“I am… heading that way myself,” she said. “I’ll admit I’ve fought it, but I don’t think I can
anymore. It seems utterly mad, but I can’t help myself.”
Draco’s chest expanded, and he found himself beaming at her as he pulled her forward for
another deep, languid kiss. She was falling in love with him. She might not be quite as far as
he was, but she was surely just behind him. A few more weeks or months, and her feelings
would be there too. His wife would be his, not because of the marriage law but because she
loved him.
Draco was on an emotional high as she gave him one last sweet kiss and then started to move
away. He smiled at her, but then frowned in confusion as he watched her face change.
It went from happy to perplexed to terrified in a matter of seconds, and then her eyes dropped
to look between them.
She had finally pulled herself off of him, and it took Draco’s brain a full three seconds to
process the fact that something white was leaking out of her. Then he glanced down at his
now-soft cock, and the truth hit him like a bludger.
The condom was broken.
Chapter 21: A Very Big Decision.
A few hours later.
Draco was in bed, hands folded behind his head and staring at the ceiling as he contemplated
the events of the last few hours.
Within seconds of noticing the broken condom, Hermione practically launched herself off of
his lap and sprinted to the bathroom, where she took a long, hot shower. Draco assumed she
was washing herself thoroughly. Meanwhile he just sat there in a daze, his skin vibrating
slightly, as he tried to absorb what had just happened.
He didn’t know condoms could break. He was sure he had put it on correctly. It had still
been intact when she sat on his lap, he was almost positive. But somehow it did break, and
Draco hadn’t noticed. He was so wrapped up in his wife and the delicious confessions of
love and falling in love that his attention was entirely diverted.
How long had they been sitting there with his seed inside of her, lost in the bliss of each
other? Five minutes? Ten? Was that long enough for the sperm to swim up to parts
unknown and disappear inside of her, never to be flushed out by aggressive showering?
Draco couldn’t remember the answer to this, but he knew in his heart that five minutes was
plenty of time. Even if it wouldn’t be long enough for muggles, it would surely be long
enough for Malfoy sperm, enhanced by the family magic. He was certain that while she was
showering several hundred, if not thousands, of Malfoy sperm were already trying their
damndest to fertilize her egg.
And he also knew with certainty that it had worked. Perhaps it was his family magic fucking
preening or the fact that the urges had totally evaporated within minutes of completion or
maybe he was turning prophetic. Regardless of how he knew, he knew. He was certain.
Hermione, of course, was much less certain.
“I washed it all out,” she snapped. “I knew that could happen in theory, but I can’t believe
our luck… that sort of failure is not that common and…”
She closed her mouth at the look on his face.
“Anyway, we won’t know for a couple weeks.”
“Right,” he said, though Draco knew now.
“I can’t take a morning after pill. They might test me. But I’ll do some research on… other
methods. If it comes to that.”
Draco’s stomach turned at this. “Right.”
“Because that would be crazy. We aren’t ready for this. It was an accident for heaven’s
sake!”
“Right,” said Draco. Because what else could he say?
He knew what he wanted to say. He wanted to tell her that this was a dream come true for
him. He wanted to say that he needed a son for his title, and he wanted his son to also be
hers. He wanted to say that he loved her, and he already loved their little zygote who was
surely subdividing away as he started his slow journey to her uterus to find a nice squishy
place to implant himself for the next nine months.
But he couldn’t say any of that. She didn’t want a baby. She had made that very, very clear.
For the first time in months Draco started to occlude heavily. She gave him an odd look
when his face changed, but she didn’t ask so he didn’t offer an explanation. He needed to
feel that numbness again because he couldn’t stand the panic in her voice, the distaste.
After that brief exchange she left for her flat, claiming she needed to do some urgent research
in the muggle world. She even skipped dinner. He didn’t know if he would see her tonight.
Draco himself had eaten quickly and silently and then gone back to his room to brood. He
only lowered his walls halfway – just enough to have a rational conversation with himself,
not enough to really feel it.
He knew he couldn’t ask this of her. He knew she didn’t want it. It was her body, her
choice. He believed that, he really truly did. But Merlin, he wished he could have just a little
input on this issue without crossing any lines, and if he was being entirely honest with
himself he resented her a little bit for the fact that she didn’t even pause to talk to Draco
about keeping the baby before she ran off and started researching. Their entire relationship
had been at her pace. The marriage had been on her terms. The consummation had been her
idea. Draco had bent over backwards to earn her affection and trust. He was about to
embark on months of work to overturn a law he didn’t particularly want to overturn. All of it
– all of it – was for her, and he had done it her way.
This would be done her way too, which meant it probably wouldn’t be done at all. She
would find some way around the pregnancy that was about to take place. She would land
upon a muggle method she could use to terminate it, and then Draco would suffer through
however many more heats until the MLPP allowed them to get divorced and the family
magic would be broken. That was where they were headed, declarations of love or not.
But why did it have to be that way? Why couldn’t Draco have this one thing? He knew it
would be a huge burden for her in the short term. He knew she didn’t want it. But he did.
Could he not get his own way just this one time? She could give the baby to him and divorce
him once the MLPP was repealed and never have to bother herself with the child again if she
didn’t want to. Draco would adore their son. Draco already adored him. And Draco had all
the resources in the world to raise the boy as a single father. As long as Draco and Hermione
were married when the baby was born, Draco would have secured the legitimate heir he
needed for the title, even if their marriage fell apart soon after.
He would never have to seek another wife if she left him. He would never have to compare
another wife to the one he had lost.
Yes, Draco needed this. He needed their baby badly for so many reasons, but he couldn’t ask
her to give this to him. Because her choice trumped his wishes. He knew it. He even
believed it. But in that moment, he hated it.
Draco heard the door open, and he turned a dull eye toward Hermione, whose hair was
frizzed. She looked like she had been studying frantically, but she had an exultant look on
her face.
“I’ve got it,” she breathed. “I know just what to do if… you know.”
Draco said nothing, his walls already going up again. He settled for an eyebrow raise.
She frowned a little, but then seemed to brush it aside. “Yes. Well… there’s this muggle
medication I can take that will terminate it. It shouldn’t be detectable with magical testing, at
least I don’t think it would be… it will simulate a miscarriage.”
Draco struggled to lower his occlumency walls to ask the questions he needed to ask.
Because regardless of her decisions about this, she was still his wife and her safety and
security took precedence.
“Is it safe?” he asked.
“Extremely,” she said promptly.
“And you’re certain the Ministry can’t detect it?”
She hesitated.
“Hermione…” he prodded.
“I”m pretty sure,” she said, now sounding a little less confident. “Like I said, it should be
indistinguishable from a miscarriage.”
“Magical miscarriages are rather rare,” he said.
She swallowed. “Well I would take it as soon as I find out one way or the other. The
Ministry would never know that I was pregnant…”
“Unless they test you in the next two weeks,” he pointed out.
She scowled. “It won’t show up right away. I’m sure I can work around their schedule.”
“And if you’re wrong and they find out you’re pregnant, only for you to tell them you had a
miscarriage a few days later, then what?”
She threw her hands up in the air. “Then I’ve had a miscarriage! You said yourself they’re
rare for witches, but that doesn’t mean they never happen!”
“And you don’t think they would investigate it when it was you?”
“There would be no proof that I did anything wrong!”
“But what if they find something? Are you certain their tests won’t pick up on whatever
drug does this to you?”
Her jaw clenched. “I’m fairly certain.”
“How certain?”
“Maybe eighty percent.”
“And what happens if you are wrong, and they catch you terminating a magical pregnancy?”
He knew the answer to this already, having run across it in her notes a few months ago. But
he wanted to make her say it.
“Azkaban.”
“For how long?”
“Ten years,” she gritted out.
“Precisely,” he said. “That’s too risky for only eighty percent certainty.”
She threw the papers she had been holding on the bed and tossed her hands in the air in
exasperation.
“Then what is your solution? It’s not like you’re helping!”
A muscle in Draco’s jaw twitched. He wasn’t precisely sure what to say.
“I don’t have a good answer for you,” was the thing he settled on.
She glared. “Well unless you’re prepared to become a father, I suggest you help! We need to
find a way to get rid of it on the offchance I’m actually pregnant!”
“Him,” corrected Draco automatically, looking away from her.
“Pardon?” she asked.
“Him. You said it, but if you are pregnant then it’s a boy.”
He chanced a glance at her, and her face was turning pale.
“I need to think of it as an it,” she whispered.
Draco narrowed his eyes at her. “Why? It’s not like you to ignore facts. All of my sperm is
male until an heir’s blood is added to the wards. You know this.”
She was looking sickly and worried now.
“Because… because I can’t personify it! It’s not a person! It’s just some cells at most, and
we aren’t keeping it!”
“We aren’t keeping it,” he repeated dully, raising his walls again and turning away from her.
“Right.”
Perhaps she was right, and he needed to think of their boy as a bundle of cells too. Losing
cells wouldn’t be nearly as painful as losing a person. But Draco had already spent the last
few hours imagining a life he would never have. He was envisioning curly hair and tiny
fingers and a cupid’s bow mouth like Hermione’s.
He couldn’t conjure a picture of cells in his mind’s eye, even though he knew that was all
they had at the moment.
She was right that their boy wasn’t a person yet, not really. He would never become a
person. He would never develop thoughts and feelings and expressions and habits.
He hated that too.
“You know we can’t keep it,” she insisted. “It would be impossible.”
At this, something penetrated Draco’s occlumency haze, and he stared at her again, lowering
his walls ever so slightly to observe her. She looked anxious, wringing her hands, and she
had started to pace a little. He promised himself he would let her decide this. He would
resist the urge to get on his knees and beg her to keep it. He wouldn’t interfere unless she
was preparing to do something that could send her back to Azkaban – and he rather thought
this muggle drug suggestion of hers could do just that. But she had just stated something that
was factually incorrect: that it was impossible. It wasn’t impossible at all, and Draco decided
to press her on it.
“Why would it be impossible? You would be pregnant, have a baby, and then he’s here with
us. That seems entirely possible, given the things that happened earlier today.”
She had a slightly wild look about her now as her pacing became more frantic.
“It’s impossible because Kingsley would win! I’ve already married you, and now I might be
reproducing with you? I can’t do it! You know I can’t do it!”
Draco fell silent as he absorbed this. He knew how principled she was, and it was something
he had always admired about her. But right now, in this moment, he felt pity for her.
Couldn’t she see that the world wasn’t black and white? Didn’t she understand that not
everything was a win or loss? Couldn’t she ever accept a compromise when it came to this
sort of thing? And even if she was right and Kingsley won this time, why did it matter so
much? Why would she sacrifice something that could be so wonderful just to prove her
point?
Her pacing halted as she stared at him. “What?” she demanded. “What is it you want to
say?”
Draco furrowed his brow and looked down at his lap to collect his thoughts. He wanted to be
fair to her. He didn’t want her to make a decision she would truly regret. But it also
saddened him to hear that this might be the reason she would give up on a family with Draco.
“I think…” he said slowly, “that you are viewing this in absolutes. If you have a baby, then
Kingsley and the MLPP wins. But I wonder, why can’t you both win? Why does it have to
be zero sum? Why is his win your loss? And why in the bloody hell are you letting Kingsley
Shacklebolt have any influence whatsoever on your choice in this matter? The man has one
foot out of office already. In six months none of it is going to matter. And you are talking
about making a very large, very serious decision because of a man who will soon be stripped
of power anyway?”
Her eyes were huge as he spoke.
“But… but it will look bad,” she said weakly.
“And why’s that? Because I’m a Death Eater?”
Draco felt a stirring of resentment. He had played along with her publicity stunts. He had
allowed her to say terrible, awful things about him in the press. The entire time he told
himself that she didn’t really believe it. Her feelings for him might not be as strong as his
were for her, but she didn’t really, truly mean the things she wrote about him.
Now he wondered just how foolish he had been.
“I don’t… it’s not…” she trailed off weakly.
Draco gave a mirthless laugh. “No, really, I get it. I’m a big bad Death Eater. I always have
been, haven’t I? All the times I thought they were just words to craft the image you were
trying to maintain… I never objected to it. But now… well I understand it now. You would
rather risk ten years in Azkaban than have a child with me. You’re the Golden Girl. You
would never reproduce with a man like me, not ever. That’s the real problem here, isn’t it?”
Her lips were parted, and she looked like she wanted to object, but nothing came out.
“Right,” he said, deflating. “I need a little space. I’m going to go to Theo’s for a few days
while you think about it. Don’t worry, I won’t say anything to them.”
He stood and started to move out of the room.
“Draco!” she said. He turned around, his heart squeezing at her beautiful face. It was a
mixture of pain, anger, hesitation, and fear. “Draco, it’s my choice.”
He swallowed and nodded. “I know it is. And I love you, Hermione. I meant it when I told
you that earlier today. Regardless of what you choose, that will not change, and I will
support your decision one way or the other. If you choose to terminate, then all I ask is that
you be really fucking careful about the way you do it so you don’t hurt yourself or go to
Azkaban. I also hope you can be honest with yourself and with me about the reasons why
you’re doing it. And…” he hesitated for a moment.
She looked stricken, but she prompted him in a tiny voice, “And?”
“And if you choose to keep him, I don’t want him to become another one of your publicity
stunts. You can drag my name through the muck all you want, but you aren’t going to do that
to him. He is not going to be known as a miniature Death Eater before he’s even born, and I
won’t have you using him as leverage to get the MLPP repealed. If you choose to keep him,
I’m going to protect him from that because I know how shitty it feels, and I owe him that
much as his father.”
All the blood drained from her face at this, and Draco just gave her a grim nod.
“Right. Let me know what you decide to do.”

14 February 2004
Draco was staring moodily into the fireplace in his bedroom. It was frigid outside, with snow
falling in flurries. He hadn’t seen or heard from his wife in over two weeks, and he was
mentally preparing himself to go to Azkaban if she didn’t reappear soon.
They hadn’t shagged during the month of February yet, and as far he knew the Ministry was
unaware that Hermione was pregnant — or had been pregnant at one point. He had no idea if
she still was, and the clock was ticking.
He couldn’t bring himself to care.
After that day the condom broke he went to Theo’s and stayed for several days, claiming that
Hermione was just very busy, and he missed his old friends. It wasn’t the first time he had
crashed at their home for more than a few nights, and he tried to play off Hermione’s
absence. Perhaps he had been successful, or maybe his friends knew him even better than he
thought they did because they didn’t press him about it, for which he was grateful.
He had intended to stay until Hermione contacted him with her decision, but he couldn’t
bring himself to do it. Pansy was due at the end of March, and watching her waddle around
Nott Manor with her swollen belly and Theo’s eyes trailing softly after her had been too
painful. Every time she struggled to tie her shoes or placed a hand on her stomach from a
small kick, Draco’s heart broke just a little more.
He would never get that with Hermione. Regardless of her true reasons, she didn’t want a
baby, and she certainly didn’t want a baby with him.
Draco idly wondered why he had been fine with this until the condom broke, but he had no
good answers. Maybe it was a bit like their marriage: he never would have considered
Hermione Granger as a wife until the MLPP assigned her to him. And similarly, he never
really thought he would have a child with Hermione until the condom broke. The moment it
became a possibility though, he wanted it. He craved it.
But she didn’t want it, and that would be her answer. Draco would respect it. Of course he
would.
Draco returned to Malfoy Manor after four days, fully prepared to hear her tell him that it
was already done, only to discover that his wife was now missing. She had left two days
after Draco did and hadn’t communicated with any of them. Narcissa and even Lucius were
worried about it – though Lucius assured Draco that he had reached out to McGonagall, and
he had it on good authority that Hermione was still teaching. So she hadn’t been abducted,
she had simply run.
She had run from him.
She had run from him after he drew a line in the sand.
Draco thought he might be sick every time he thought about it.
Had he been too harsh with her? Had he said anything untrue? Had he made her remember
that he was a Death Eater and now her distaste for him had resurrected itself?
Draco didn’t know, but he couldn’t take it back. And truthfully, he didn’t want to take it
back. He loved her – he loved almost everything about her – but she could be brash and
headstrong and uncompromising at times. And Merlin, if some miracle occurred and she
actually agreed to keep their son, then Draco would stand between him and Hermione to keep
him from becoming another tool in her arsenal. He would not let his son be used, even if
Hermione was well-intentioned about it. Out of all the things he had said to her that day, this
was the one thing he would never be able to regret.
He wanted Hermione to want their baby – not for publicity or leverage – but because he was
theirs. Full stop.
During the last two weeks Draco had been forced to attend meeting after meeting with his
father to begin negotiations repealing the MLPP and ousting Shacklebolt from office.
Mercifully, Lucius seemed willing to let Draco observe silently for now. But Draco knew he
would have to participate sooner rather than later. He just didn’t know how to browbeat his
brain into it. He found it impossible to pay attention during their lengthy meetings and
constantly found his mind wandering to Hermione.
Had she taken a test yet?
Had she ordered those pills?
Had she confessed to any of her friends?
Did she hate Draco now?
His mind was filled with her and the choice she would be making soon. It made him
distracted, irritable, and generally terrible company.
And now it was Valentine’s Day, and she was still missing. Draco had considered writing her
a letter, but he didn’t know what to say except, I miss you, I love you, and everything I said to
you the last time we spoke still applies.
That was the crux of the issue, wasn’t it? He really wasn’t that sorry for the things he had
said to her. Perhaps his approach could have been better — Draco acknowledged that he had
been occluding heavily and may have managed it poorly in the moment — but the overall
message still remained true. He did love her. He would still love her if she terminated. He
wanted her to be very careful if she did it. And he didn’t want her to use their son if she
decided to keep him.
He couldn’t bring himself to apologize to her for that.
But apologies or not, she was still his wife. She was still the love of his life. And it was
fucking Valentine’s Day, and Draco would be a piss poor husband if he allowed it to pass
without any acknowledgment. Not knowing what else to do he sent her some flowers and her
favorite pastries from the elves with a short note.
I don’t know where you are, but I love you today and always. Please come home when you’re
ready darling. I’ll be here.
His owl had flown off with the package and returned several hours later empty-handed, so he
knew she received it. There was nothing more that he could do.
His thoughts were interrupted by Patsy, who appeared with a CRACK!
“Pardon me, Master, but this note was just delivered for you.”
Draco furrowed his brow and accepted it. Then his stomach dropped when he recognized
Hermione’s handwriting.
Meet me at 6 Hamilton Place, Mayfair at 7 p.m. It’s across the street from the Four Seasons.
We need to talk.
Draco’s heart was pounding as he stared at it, and he checked his watch. He needed to leave
in thirty minutes to be on time. Her note was short, terse, and had no declarations of love or
softness to it whatsoever. The missive we need to talk told him everything he needed to
know about what was coming.
Sighing, he finished his drink with a large gulp and welcomed the burn that went down his
throat. Then he rose and moved to the loo to start the shower. He wouldn’t be late.

30 Minutes Later
Draco pushed open the doors to 6 Hamilton Place and immediately wondered how many
muggles Hermione had to confund to manage this. The place was absolutely packed.
Evidently muggles celebrated Valentine’s Day just as ardently as wizards did because there
wasn’t a spare seat to be found.
He approached the hostess and asked for his wife, who directed him toward a small table in a
corner. It was surprisingly private given the number of people who were there, and Draco’s
stomach clenched harder when she looked up at him. Her eyes seemed to be rimmed red, as
though she had been crying not that long ago.
“Sit,” she said as the hostess moved away.
Draco sat. Immediately a waitress came over to take their drink orders, but Hermione just
shook her head, so Draco did too. He could already tell this wasn’t going to be celebratory.
The waitress looked disappointed, but said she would be back soon to take their orders.
The moment she was gone, Hermione seemed to steel herself and looked at him. “I need to
tell you something.”
Draco nodded, saying nothing.
“I’m pregnant.”
Draco nodded again. He already knew this. There was never any question in his mind about
it. The only slightly surprising news was that she was still pregnant. Draco tried to eye her
stomach across the table, but couldn’t get a good angle to see if she looked any different. It
sounded like the baby was still in there, though. She hadn’t done anything about it yet. He
tried not to allow his hopes to rise too much.
“You’re not… surprised?” she asked hesitantly.
“No?” said Draco, his confusion pulling his attention away from her stomach. “I knew you
were the moment it happened. The family magic is really strong in that respect.”
For some reason Hermione’s face fell at this. “Oh.”
They were quiet as they stared at their menus, and several minutes later the waitress came
over to take their orders.
This was turning into one of the most stilted dinners of Draco’s life.
“Have you… decided then?” he finally asked. It was best to get this over with.
Hermione was quiet for a long while.
“I actually have some questions for you.”
Draco looked at her in confusion. “Okay?” he said. He had no idea what was going on.
“Are you ready to be a father?”
Draco gave a mirthless laugh. “Of course not. Is anybody ever ready the first time?”
Hermione narrowed her eyes. “But you still want to be?”
Draco frowned. “I don’t want to sway any decision or –”
“Just answer me, please. Do you want it?”
“Yes,” said Draco simply. “Very much.”
“How much?”
“Enough that I would happily raise him myself if you wanted nothing to do with him.”
Hermione went pale at this suggestion.
“Why would I want nothing to do with him?”
Draco was perplexed. “Isn’t that what we’re discussing? Terminating him? Because you
don’t want him? You asked if I want him, and I do. You asked how much. I’m telling you
that I want him enough that I would raise him without you if that was your preference.”
Hermione closed her eyes as though praying for patience. “I’m really bollocksing this up.”
Draco prayed for his own brand of patience. It would do them no favors if they lost their
tempers with each other. He reached across the table and grabbed her hand.
“Hermione, just tell me what you’re thinking, darling. If I’m failing some sort of test I’d
really like to know before I say something I can’t take back.”
She deflated. “You’re not failing any test. I think… I think I failed the test.”
“What test?” he asked in confusion.
She shrugged. “I don’t know. The test of our relationship? Of my potential to be a good
mother? All of it?”
“I’m still not understanding.”
She made a frustrated sound. “I’m just… I’m scared, Draco! I like older kids… once they
start to talk, you know? Teddy was rough as a baby, and he’s the only practical experience I
have. What if I’m bad at it? What if I fuck him up? What if I don’t love him? You are
acting like you already love him, but honestly… I don’t! Not yet, at any rate. I don’t feel
any different except for a little queasy now and then, and it’s hard to believe he’s even in
there, let alone some tiny person I’m going to fall head over heels in love with in nine
months! I’m already a bad mum, and I’m a bad wife too,” she added sadly.
“You’re not,” he insisted, and despite her having obvious dismay his heart started to lift ever
so slightly. She was finally, finally talking to him about it.
“I am,” she said miserably. “I… well I owe you an apology. A huge one. I should never
have used you the way I did for publicity. It was cruel of me. Heartless.”
Draco squeezed her hand. “I invited it.”
“Perhaps, but I still shouldn’t have done it,” she insisted. “You have to know, I never would
have married you if I believed you were still a big bad Death Eater. Never. I would have
stayed in Azkaban or married Ron. I treated you horribly, Draco. I’m sorry. And also… that
really wasn’t why I was thinking of terminating. I thought I had our contraception under
control, so when the condom broke, I panicked. It’s easy to blame Kingsley and the MLPP
for every single thing that goes wrong in my life, but this time it really wasn’t because of that
stupid law. We didn’t have to have sex that day for the MLPP. I shagged you because I
wanted to. I knew I was fertile when I did it, and I knew condoms could fail. I did it
anyway, and that’s all there is to it. I’m sorry I made you believe that I would never have
kids with you because of your past. That’s not the case at all.”
Draco stared at her in amazement. He had not been expecting this at all.
“Hermione,” he said slowly, “it’s alright. Frankly, I earned some public shaming for what I
did to you all those years. I’m not angry about it. And I really wouldn’t blame you if you
didn’t want to have kids with me. It would probably be deserved.”
She was shaking her head hard, and now tears filled her eyes.
“It’s not deserved. But…”
“But what, darling?” he asked softly, his stomach twisting again.
“But the thing you said about using our son that way–” and Draco’s heart leapt because she
said our son, “ –you were right! It was the first thing I thought of when I considered keeping
him… using him to repeal the MLPP, just like I’ve used you. And when you pointed it out I
realized what a terrible, horrible mum I would be!”
Tears were streaming freely down her face, and she swiped at them impatiently. But Draco
now felt almost lightheaded with relief that she had finally articulated this to him. She was
afraid. She feared failure and coming up short. That had always been one of her greatest
fears, hadn’t it? But now that Draco knew her initial instinct to terminate was driven by her
own insecurities and not because of Draco , he had a better grasp of the things he needed to
say so she would stop spiraling.
“Hermione,” said Draco firmly, “look at me.”
She raised her eyes to his face. She looked utterly miserable.
“You wouldn’t be a terrible mum, not at all. You’re brilliant and brave and so bloody strong
minded. Hell, the little bugger would probably run roughshod all over me if I didn’t have
you there too.”
She gave a watery laugh at this.
“I mean it,” he insisted. “I get that it’s scary. You think I’m not scared of fucking him up?
There’s a title and money and that doesn’t even touch on the fact that I was a Death Eater!
He’s going to learn all about the shitty things I did someday, and I’ll have to watch whatever
respect he has for me die when he finds out. I already know it will happen, and I am going to
dread it every single day while I wait.”
She seemed to soften a little. “We’re both scared then,” she said.
“Bloody terrified,” agreed Draco.
“But…” she prompted.
“But, I think that we could raise an extraordinary person. I think we would love him, and
even if you don’t feel that way now, it will come in its own time. You love Teddy don’t
you?”
Hermione nodded.
“See?” said Draco, “You love him even though he’s not yours. You love him even though he
was a difficult baby. I obviously know very little about children, but one thing my mother
has said over the years has always stuck with me.”
“What’s that?” she asked curiously.
“That you can love the child and not the phase. Apparently I went through any number of
distasteful phases. My mother is not a baby person either. She’s never tried to hide it from
me. She has always told me that one of the happiest days of her life was the day I started
walking, and she no longer had to worry so much about all the dirt on the floor while I
crawled around.”
Hermione started to smile a little at this. “My mum said something similar,” she said quietly.
“She is a baby person. She likes slightly older kids too, but toddlers are not her thing. She
says they have all the willpower to be independent and none of the skills necessary to do it.”
Draco felt his optimism slowly coming back. “There you go, then. I can’t say which phases
I will and won’t like, but everything comes to an end eventually, right? Surely we can love
him even when he’s in a phase that drives us crazy.”
She nodded slowly and then got a cautious look on her face. “You know… I told my
parents. That’s where I’ve been the last week.”
Draco’s eyebrows flew up.
“Oh?” he asked nervously.
She nodded. “Both of them… well, they both really like you. I told them everything – the
things I’ve done to you in the papers, the way you fought your family magic for me, all of it.
Well… I suppose I haven't told them I’m actually pregnant yet — I took a test this morning
and thought you should be the first to know — but I did tell them everything else and that I
was trying to decide what to do about it if I was. They told me they would respect my
choice, but…”
“But?” he whispered.
“But they also pointed out that we are married, and you need a son for the title. And they
both thought you wanted a baby regardless of your duties. You gave them that impression
when you visited them before Christmas.”
Draco swallowed and nodded. “Yes,” he said a bit hoarsely. “I… it was a dream. Obviously
I never meant for it to happen this fast. I told myself I was fine with it never happening at all,
and truly darling I would have been. But… yes. I want him. I want you to be the mother of
my children. I think you would be extraordinary, and I love you. There isn’t anything I want
more than that.”
Her eyes had turned soft and she stared at him in the low light. “Then promise me
something,” she said.
“Anything,” said Draco instantly.
“Promise me that you’ll keep me in check. I know I have a tendency to get wrapped up in
my own ideas. I can be arrogant and inconsiderate of the way other people feel. If you ever
think I’m crossing a line with him or with you, please keep telling me. I think… I think I
need that. And in return, I promise not to run again. I just… I didn’t know if you were
coming back.”
She looked down at her plate, and Draco reached across the table to grip her hand again.
“Darling, I’m sorry. I wasn’t trying to leave you, not at all. I was just afraid I would be on
my knees begging you to keep him if I didn’t give us some space. I didn’t want to influence
your decision too much. I really, truly do not want you to do this all for me. I don’t want you
to regret it.”
She seemed to relax at this. “I can understand that,” she said. “And… thank you.”
Draco swallowed and then gathered his courage. He wanted to make sure he knew her
answer. He needed her to say it.
“So… does that mean you do want this? You want to have a baby with me?”
She met his eye and nodded slowly. Draco thought he was going to levitate from happiness.
“Truthfully, I’m ninety percent terrified and ten percent excited. But that’s a noticeable
improvement from a few days ago, so I think we’re trending in the right direction.”
Draco grinned broadly at this. “I love you enough to work with ten percent, darling.”
She finally gave him her brilliant smile. “Thank you Draco. We’ll do this together.”
Chapter 22: Little Star.
20 February 2004.
“Are you proposing full annulment as a matter of law or a path to divorce?” asked Lord
Fawley, as he frowned.
“Divorce,” said Draco firmly. “No fault, instituted by one spouse.”
“But wizards rarely get divorced,” pointed out Lord Selwyn. “Doesn’t that create poor
precedent? Are we saying that all married couples can have a no-fault divorce?”
“It can be limited to those who were married as part of the MLPP,” said Lucius smoothly.
“For everyone else the normal rules can still apply – requiring infidelity, violence, and so
forth.”
“But tying it to the MLPP creates its own problems, doesn’t it?” asked Lord Fawley. “Quite
a few marriages took place before the MLPP went into effect as a means of avoiding it. What
about all of those couples?”
“What about them?” asked Lucius, rolling his eyes. “They chose to get married outside of
the Ministry’s matching program. The only rules of the MLPP that apply to those couples are
those that apply to all couples – no contraception and so forth – the MLPP is otherwise
nongoverning for them.”
Lord Flint had a pensive look on his face. “If you want to repeal it Lucius, it would be far
simpler to do just that – enact a full repeal. The marriages that were performed through the
Matching Ceremony would be automatically annulled, would they not? They would never
have existed in the first place.”
Draco exchanged a look with his father across the table. It was staid and carefully blank, but
Draco knew they were thinking the same thing.
Don’t let them annul it.
It was actually an open question if an annulment would dissolve Draco's and Hermione’s
marriage, since theirs had taken place after the MLPP went into effect, and they had
technically opted to do it on their own. This was something their solicitors had scratched
their heads about, until Lucius, in a fit of frustration, demanded to know why he was paying
them seven hundred galleons an hour if they couldn’t even answer a simple, hypothetical
question.
But they couldn’t, and so the 'conservative position' – to use their words – was to assume that
any wholesale repeal of the MLPP would cause automatic annulment of all matched
marriages, including Draco’s with Hermione.
Draco was willing to get the MLPP overturned. He was not at all pleased by the notion that
his marriage might be annulled without any say so from either one of them. Lucius had been
less bothered by it, but he agreed to support the divorce route if that was what Draco wanted.
It was.
With a divorce, Hermione would have to actively do something. There would be a court date
and asset division and other things that would slow the process down. An annulment would
be automatic, for whatever date the Ministry selected.
It made Draco very nervous. Hermione had agreed to stay married to him at least until the
baby was born, and he was clinging to this.
“We can see how we feel after that, but I know you need a legitimate son. I won’t divorce
you before then, I promise.”
It was a promise Draco was depending upon because if their marriage was annulled, then
Hermione would have to remarry him before the baby was born – and that would then mean
they were stuck together forever unless they could divorce for those traditional reasons
Lucius had implied.
Draco, of course, was more than happy to be stuck with Hermione forever. He hoped that
over the next eight months he would be able to convince her of the same thing. But there was
no question that things would be easier, simpler if he could give his wife an option for
divorce that she could take whenever was most convenient instead of being at the mercy of
the Ministry’s schedule – meaning after their baby was born.
Draco was prepared to fight for it, and he was certain his father would too once he learned
Hermione was pregnant. He may not be personally invested in having Hermione Granger as
a daughter-in-law, but he was quite interested in grandchildren, if less overtly so than his
mother.
They still had not told either set of parents that Hermione was expecting. It still felt new and
early and odd. But according to Hermione, she was already five weeks and a bit pregnant,
and their son was the size of a poppy seed.
Draco’s mind was blown.
He swore to himself that they would tell his parents soon. Lucius would go to the mat for the
more complex divorce route as soon as he was informed. Draco was certain of it. But as it
was, the look Lucius gave Draco across the table said one thing.
Save it. We will raise this later.
“You may be right, Lord Flint,” said Lucius carefully. “It’s possible that a simple repeal
would automatically annul those marriages without any further administrative burden.
However, the Ministry’s solicitors and experts in magical marriage bonds would have to
investigate it. It’s possible that the magical bonds would not recognize a simple repeal. You
know magical divorces have an element of bond-breaking.”
The group hummed at this point and sat lost in thought.
“But you wish to give all the couples an out then?” asked Lord Fawley, frowning at Lucius.
“I’ll confess that it surprises me. I know that your personal circumstances were a bit…
strained. But you did champion this law Lucius, from the very beginning.”
Again Lucius and Draco exchanged a look. Draco was the one who spoke up.
“I’m actually quite satisfied with my marriage. I have no great desire to see it end. But one
must give their spouses what they wish, yes? Everybody knows my wife’s feelings on the
matter.”
Lord Flint raised a skeptical eyebrow. “So you want to stay married, but you are giving her
an out?”
Draco looked at him squarely. “Allow me to be the one to worry about the success of my
own marriage. She and I are adjusting rather well, as it happens. But she does feel strongly
about this, and I know you all can recognize what a catastrophe the MLPP has been. The
press has been horrible. The public is very displeased. It has eroded trust in Minister
Shacklebolt to an alarming degree.”
“About him,” said Lord Selwyn wryly. “What are we going to do about him? I don’t
disagree that this has been… less successful than we all hoped. But you know Kingsley. The
man has become absolutely entrenched, even more so than you, Lucius. He no longer has the
public’s support, and he is bringing the Wizengamot down along with him.”
Lucius’s nostrils flared a bit, but he wisely kept his mouth shut and looked at Draco.
“I think it’s time we vet some new possibilities for Minister,” said Draco lightly. “The
conservative bloc has a majority, but we will need to be careful about who we put forth to
take his place. The public has been alienated.”
“Who do you have in mind?” asked Lord Flint.
“We are still vetting possibilities,” said Lucius. “But we wanted to see if you had any ideas
and also gauge your interest in pursuing this in the first place. We will all need to be in
agreement.”
There was some murmuring of acquiescence to this.
“Excellent,” said Lucius. “Let’s all give it some thought and meet again in a couple weeks to
review possible candidates. I really think the Minister needs to go first and then the MLPP.
The repeal would be credited with the new Minister and a more tolerant Wizengamot if we do
it in that order.”
The wizards rose to shake hands and soon left the restaurant where they had been meeting.
On the way out, Lucius gripped Draco by the arm.
“They may not go for the divorce route, Draco,” said Lucius. “It’s far more administratively
burdensome.”
An uncomfortable sensation settled into Draco’s stomach.
“I know, Father, but I would like to try.”
Lucius pursed his lips, but nodded. “Fine. We will keep trying. But you should know that
there are always compromises that have to be made. Lord Flint’s suggestion of a simple
repeal is sensible. Surely you must understand that.”
Draco rolled his eyes. “I know that’s what you would prefer too… for now.”
“What’s that supposed to mean?” he demanded.
Draco huffed an exhale. “Nothing, Father. You’ll know very soon.”

27 February 2004
“Draco, you’ll be fine,” said Hermione in amusement.
“I’ve never eaten in a muggle household before,” he muttered.
She rolled her eyes. “Well let’s see. There are these things called 'kitchens' where you make
something called 'food' and you eat it on a piece of furniture called a 'table' while generally
having something called a 'conversation' at the same time. When we put it all together we
call it supper.”
He scowled at her, but she just grinned and nudged him with her hip.
“Besides,” she added, “Mum and Dad and I are on better terms than the last time you saw
them. And you are bringing Mum flowers. That’s always been the fastest way to her heart.”
“It’s just that the last time I was here they tried to slam a door in my face and-”
“Mum says she was slamming the door in Harry’s face, actually. Come on, don’t be a baby.”
Draco paused at the turn of phrase and then turned to grin at her. “Alright darling, one baby
is enough for now.”
She smiled a little and approached the same house Draco had visited a couple months prior
and rang the doorbell. A minute later Mrs. Granger opened it, wearing an attractive kneelength dress and holding a dish towel.
“Hermione! Draco! Come on in,” she said, ushering them into the sitting room. Draco was
momentarily stunned. He knew Hermione had been visiting them rather frequently over the
previous two months – not to mention the weeks-long stay when they had been on the outs
with each other – but the difference in Draco’s reception now versus two months ago was
startling.
“Helen, these are for you,” said Draco, handing her a bouquet of daffodils. “They are from
the Manor gardens. We have patches of them that are charmed to bloom year-round.”
Helen’s face relaxed into a smile at this. “Well that’s lovely, thank you, Draco. Come this
way, I’ll get a vase.”
She led them past a sitting room and something that looked like a nice office, toward a dining
area in the back of the home. As they entered, an elderly women rose from a chair, using a
cane to assist.
“Gran!” came Hermione’s surprised voice. “Goodness, I didn’t…”
She shot a look at Draco, and he quirked an eyebrow to try to say, It’s up to you.
She cleared her throat and looked at Draco.
“Draco, this is my grandmother, Isabella Granger. Gran, this is my husband, Lord Draco
Malfoy.”
Isabella gave Draco a look that was so reminiscent of Dumbledore’s piercing gaze that he
gulped before remembering his manners and stepping toward her.
“Mrs. Granger, it’s a pleasure,” he said, raising her hand and bowing over it.
She narrowed a beady eye and surveyed him. “Hmmm. So it’s true then? You’ve married a
Lord?”
Hermione cleared her throat. “Erm, yes. Yes I have.”
Isabella’s eyes were still fixed on Draco. “Well he’s nice enough to look at, I’ll grant you
that much. Wiltshire though? Mostly farmland. A famous henge or two, it’s true, but what
else is there, really?”
“Yes, Stonehenge is quite famous, Gran,” said Hermione dryly, and Draco got the impression
she was struggling not to roll her eyes. Then she looked at Draco. “She does know I’m a
witch,” she added.
“Oh thank Merlin,” Draco breathed in relief.
All of the Grangers grinned at this.
“My mother has always favored London or the Lake District for a bit of nature,” chimed in
David, walking forward to shake Draco’s hand. “You’ll have to forgive her for casting
aspersions on your family’s seat.”
Draco smiled broadly at this. “Cast away. I happen to agree.”
“You’ll do then,” declared Isabella. “Now come sit over here and explain this nonsense
about a marriage law, eh? And my granddaughter went to prison? Well she wouldn’t be the
first one in the family, though it’s been a few generations. I think the last time it happened
was over some gambling debts. Or perhaps a duel at sunrise to defend a lady’s honor, and the
idiots involved got caught. The family history has never been entirely clear on this point.”
“Ignore her,” mouthed Hermione as they settled around the table.
Watching Isabella Granger was like looking fifty years into the future. She was obviously
very fond of Hermione, though it had been quite some time since they had caught up. Based
on a few nuggets she dropped, however, Draco sensed that Hermione may have seen her gran
on occasion, even when the relationship with her parents was very strained. She was funny
and sharp, always quick with a retort. She and Hermione debated the finer points of the
MLPP after Hermione brought her up to speed, and Draco was rather impressed by the
questions she asked and her wit.
“Well you must get this Shacklebolt fellow out of office, my dear,” she declared, “though I’d
say there’s a silver lining to all this.”
She nodded toward Draco, who felt his cheeks turning a bit pink, but Hermione gave him a
teasing smile.
“Yes, Draco has been a rather nice surprise. It turns out we suit quite well.”
“In that case, you’ll stay married to him once this mad law is repealed, yes?” she asked.
Now it was Hermione’s turn to go pink, and she cast a furtive look at Draco. “We are talking
about it, Gran. There is still some time, but…”
“But nothing, my dear. The boy is obviously smitten, and he’s a Viscount and a wizard.
You’re never going to do better than that.”
Draco, who had said very little, wasn’t precisely sure how Isabella knew he was smitten. Did
he have a sloppy look on his face? Was he staring at his wife? He couldn’t be certain, but
the older woman had clearly read him like a book within minutes of meeting him.
“You may be right, Gran,” said Hermione in a conciliatory tone. “Besides… there may be
some other reasons.”
Draco stared at her intently. He hadn’t been certain if Hermione would still want to go
through with this after seeing her grandmother, but he saw her gathering her courage and
warmth spread through him.
“And what reasons are those?” asked Isabella with a very knowing glint in her eye as she
started to smile slowly.
Hermione flushed pink. “I’m… we’re… expecting.”
Hermione’s mother burst into tears, and David started patting her on the back, while giving
Draco a wry, but pleased, look. Isabella beamed.
“I’m due in October,” Hermione added. “It’s very early still, but miscarriages are quite rare
for wizards so we wanted to go ahead and tell you. It’s a boy.”
“You know already?” asked Isabella in surprise.
Draco cleared his throat. “Erm, yes. My family has some marital magic that guarantees a
boy first to preserve the title. We have to add a drop of his blood to the estate’s grounds after
he is born to break that part of the magic. Until we do, all of our children will be boys.”
Isabella’s eyes lit. “Fascinating. Well that’s quite useful then, isn’t it? My father was very
disappointed to have a girl first, though he came around once my little brother was born.”
She rolled her eyes at this, and Draco smiled a bit awkwardly. “Yes, well, the spells are quite
old. The Malfoys were never interested in risking it.”
“Have you discussed names?” asked Helen eagerly. “I’ve always loved William. It's so
classic. Matthew is also lovely and–”
“Actually, he’ll be named after a constellation or star,” said Hermione, cutting her mother off.
Draco blinked in surprise and stared at Hermione in slight disbelief.
“You would… do that?” he asked softly.
She gave him a little smile and rolled her eyes. “Obviously, Draco. I know our son’s title
will come from the Malfoys, but I rather like the Blacks you know.”
“Explain,” demanded Isabella, looking intently between them.
Draco felt a little choked up as he said, “Well it’s just… my mother’s family – the Blacks – is
a very old one too. Nearly all of them are named after constellations or stars. The tradition is
hundreds of years old.”
“Draco, eh?” she asked curiously.
Draco nodded. “Yes, my parents observed it, even though I’m a Malfoy. I was the first
wizard in my generation of Blacks. Actually, I’m the only wizard in my generation of
Blacks, though of course my parents didn’t know that would be the case when they named
me. But yes, Draco is the dragon constellation.”
“What are some other names then?” asked David curiously.
Hermione started listing a few off. “Well Draco, obviously, but also Sirius, Regulus, Orion,
Pollux, Arcturus, Cygnus, Alphard…”
“Gracious,” muttered Helen. “That’s quite different from William, isn’t it?”
“Yes, but there are many options,” said Hermione. “In fact, I’m quite keen on–”
“Don’t say it,” cut in Draco, who was still absorbing the fact that she would follow this
tradition for him.
“You don’t know what I was going to say!” she insisted.
“Of course I do, darling.”
She huffed, and Draco thought he saw Isabella’s eyes gleaming in amusement.
“Fine then, what?”
“You’re going to say 'Leo.' But the Gryffindor lion reference is far too obvious, so I’ll have
to veto that.”
She turned pink and harumphed, as the others laughed.
“Well you both have plenty of time to decide,” said David.
“And we’ll have to brush up on our astronomy,” said Isabella. “The names are unusual, but
it’s a very charming tradition.”
“Perhaps you can just call him your little star for now,” said Helen, smiling at them both.
Draco heard Hermione’s breath catch next to him, and he felt oddly emotional as he gripped
her hand under the table.
"I love that," Hermione confessed
David raised his glass, and Helen and Isabella joined him moments later.
“Well then... to our Little Star Malfoy!” he declared.
“To Little Star Malfoy!” they repeated.
Draco felt his eyes prick.

The Next Evening
Draco was staring off into space, happily ruminating on the very satisfying romp with his
wife from that morning.
She had been surprisingly enthusiastic. After assuring Draco that (i) sex while pregnant was
perfectly safe and (ii) it wasn’t like she could get pregnant again, Draco unceremoniously
threw away the box of condoms and then laid back while Hermione rode him bare.
It was a fantastic ride too, he thought, a bit dreamily. Tits bouncing, head thrown back, and
all Draco had to do was grip her hips while she took care of both of them.
After their fight and weeks spent apart, it was the first time they had been together like that,
having taken a couple weeks to warm up again. But they did it and fulfilled February’s
sexual quota for the Ministry in just the nick of time, though as Hermione pointed out, it was
a leap year so they could have pushed it one more day if they really wanted to.
Because yes, they still had to have sex once a month until a pregnancy was confirmed with
the Ministry. And Hermione had successfully scared away the healers who had been so
persistent, so nobody had checked on her in the month of February to learn that she was in a
delicate condition.
“It’s none of their business whether I’m pregnant or not, and I don’t plan on telling them,”
she declared.
Draco, for one, certainly didn’t mind. He was in full agreement that the healers who worked
with the Ministry were not to be trusted with his wife and baby. The moment the world knew
about it, her pregnancy would surely become front-page news, and neither one of them were
particularly looking forward to it. In fact, the more they talked about it the more they wanted
to keep the entire thing locked down for as long as possible. They were in agreement now
that Little Star would not be used for the MLPP repeal in any respect, and the easiest way to
avoid it was to keep the news quiet.
Besides, Draco was more than happy to maintain the fiction of monthly couplings until the
evidence of Hermione’s condition was incontrovertible.
While they were waiting for the end of February to roll around, they had spent the last couple
of weeks in deep negotiations with each other about certain aspects of their son’s life.
Hermione’s announcement about his name from the previous night had been a surprise to
Draco, but that was because they simply hadn’t gotten to the topic of names just yet, other
than agreeing that his surname would be "Malfoy." The other things they needed to agree on
were more urgent so that, to use Hermione’s words, they could “present a united front to
potentially hostile parties.”
Their son would be raised in Malfoy Manor because he would be titled eventually. This
meant – for all practical purposes – that Draco would have primary custody if Hermione
chose to divorce him. Hermione clearly struggled with this idea, and Draco hoped it would
be another reason to convince her to stay too. But she couldn’t argue with the fact that there
were traditions and duties and expectations when one was in line for a title like their son’s, so
she had eventually agreed that he would be raised there and assume the Malfoy surname
regardless of what she chose to do with their marriage.
The early years, they decided, would be spent mostly at home. With the Notts and Potters
having children close in age, there would be opportunities for socialization, and Draco would
serve as a stay-at-home father, along with elf help when he was needed at the Ministry.
Hermione would continue to work at Hogwarts or elsewhere. She would take a customary
leave right after the birth, but would then return to work.
Later, they agreed that their son would go to a muggle primary school before Hogwarts for
socialization with larger groups of children and exposure to the muggle world. With budget
being no object and the ability to confund their way onto any class rolls they desired, they
agreed that Hermione would be the one to research educational options and would give Draco
a short list, from which they could mutually select a school.
This had led to a fascinating conversation about the way they were both raised. Draco had
lessons in the Manor with private tutors when he was young. Hermione had gone to a local
parish school near her parents’ home. They were determined that their son would have the
benefit of both, and Hermione agreed to supplement muggle school with tutors during school
breaks. He would continue to learn about the magical world that way, along with the
etiquette and deportment that would be expected of him due to his role.
And then there was the last thing: the pregnancy itself. This, Hermione informed him, would
be done her way and only her way since his entire contribution amounted to less than thirty
minutes of fucking.
Draco could not exactly refute that, but he still knew that her decisions in this matter would
likely result in a fight with those “potentially hostile parties.” So no, Draco decided not to
think about it and instead occupied his mind with memories of those beautiful tits bouncing
in perfect rhythm while Hermione performed sexy calisthenics on top of his cock.
He was a lucky bloke, indeed.
“Draco,” came his father’s voice, as Draco snapped out of his daydream.
“Wha?” he asked a bit hazily.
“You’ve been staring off into space for the last five minutes. I said it’s time for us to go in
for dinner.”
“Oh. Right,” said Draco distractedly as he drained the last vestiges of his drink and followed
his father to the dining room.
He found his wife and mother already seated, Hermione sipping on something that looked
like a vodka tonic, but that he knew was just carbonated water and lime. She had become
obsessed with sour things over the previous week, and Draco ordered the elves to start
offering lemons and limes at every meal that included Hermione. His parents had been
looking at the small plates of citrus with confusion, but Draco simply said that he had taken a
liking to them and began putting them in his own drinks with regularity to throw off
suspicion.
His wife and mother nodded at them as they lowered themselves into their chairs. A few
minutes later the elves arrived with dinner. It was steak night once again, and Draco smiled
at his wife as her plate was handed to her.
But then his smile slid off his face when he noticed her expression.
She looked green as she stared down at it and swallowed hard.
“Hermione?” he asked in confusion.
“I…” she started, and then shook her head hard and scooted back from the table abruptly to
flee. Draco and Lucius automatically stood too and exchanged bewildered glances with each
other before Draco came to his senses and followed her.
He found her leaning against the wall just outside the dining room, her eyes closed as she
took deep, steadying breaths.
“Hermione, what’s wrong?” he demanded.
“It's the steak. I just… I can’t.”
“You can’t eat steak?”
“No! Just the thought of red meat makes me want to…” she mimed wretching, and Draco’s
eyebrows flew up.
“Oh! Because of the baby? Pansy had some trouble with certain foods early on too.”
Hermione just nodded.
“Well what do you want instead?”
She thought about it for a few seconds and then said, “Sushi. With a lot of wasabi.”
“Hermione, you aren’t supposed to eat–”
He cut himself off at her fierce glare.
“I want sushi from that little place around the corner from my old flat, Draco. And a
choconut Sunday for dessert.”
Draco raised two hands in defeat. “Fine. What kind of sushi?”
Hermione placed her order and slid to the floor while she waited. Draco took the floo to her
old flat and quickly found the little place she had told him about. It looked a bit seedy to
Draco’s practiced eye, but she insisted their sushi was divine. He wasn’t about to argue with
her in her condition.
Order in hand for his wife and a few generic selections for everyone else, Draco was back at
the Manor within twenty minutes, grabbing Hermione and pulling her back into the dining
room.
“Patsy,” he called, as his father was raising a bite of steak to his mouth, “please remove the
steak.”
Lucius protested as Patsy cleared everything away, including plucking the fork out of
Lucius’s grip. Lucius scowled at Draco.
“What is the meaning of this?” he demanded.
“Change of plans,” said Draco airily, dropping a plastic bag of takeaway sushi into the middle
of the table and passing out trays to his parents and wife. Hermione sighed with relief while
his parents looked at it askance.
“What on earth is this?” asked Narcissa as she wrinkled her nose.
“Sushi,” said Draco.
“But what is it?” she insisted.
“Fish and rice and a few other things. It’s quite good.”
Draco handed out some chopsticks, and Lucius looked at them in confusion. “What am I
supposed to do with these?”
“Merlin,” muttered Draco, who lifted his hands to show his father how to hold them.
“They’re utensils.”
Narcissa was frowning. “We should be using fish forks, surely.”
“And it doesn’t explain why I’m eating this… fish thing…. In the first place,” said Lucius
grumpily.
Hermione had just placed a large piece of sushi in her mouth, as Draco caught her eye. She
gave him a shrug that he interpreted as, up to you.
“Hermione is pregnant,” he said.
Narcissa gasped, and Lucius inhaled a few pieces of rice and then promptly began to choke.
Hermione clapped her hand over her mouth, trying and failing not to laugh as Draco thumped
him hard on the back.
“Yes, as I was saying,” said Draco, “Hermione is pregnant and the steak made her feel
queasy. She asked for sushi.”
“And a choconut Sunday,” she reminded him.
“Yes, and that too,” he agreed. “But I think the elves can manage that.”
She gave him a small smile and returned to her sushi. The amount of wasabi she was adding
made Draco wince slightly.
“A baby…” breathed Narcissa, all concern about sushi and fish forks vanishing. “Oh, that is
lovely! When are you due? Have you been to see a healer?”
Hermione swallowed a bite and said, “I’m due early October. And no, I haven’t been to see
my doctor yet. I have an appointment in a couple weeks. They want me to be at least eight
weeks along before they see me.”
There was a tense silence, and then Lucius finally broke it.
“Doctor?”
Draco closed his eyes and prayed. He just knew this was coming.
“Yes,” said Hermione breezily. “My doctor and midwife who will be monitoring my
pregnancy.”
“But he’s magical,” said Narcissa. “Surely you must be using St. Mungo’s?”
Hermione raised one eyebrow. “Muggles have babies too. I’m sure you must have noticed,
seeing as how they outnumber us a hundred to one. There’s no reason whatsoever to go to St.
Mungo’s, especially not when they are obligated to report my pregnancy to the Ministry of
Magic.”
Both of his parents froze at this. “Why wouldn’t you report it to the Ministry of Magic?”
demanded Lucius.
Hermione rolled her eyes. “Because it’s none of their damned business, that’s why. I’m sure
they’ll figure it out at some point, but I want them to have nothing to do with it.”
“But muggles…” said Narcissa, wringing her hands. “What if they don’t–”
Hermione rolled her eyes. “Narcissa, literally every single muggleborn witch or wizard is
born in the muggle world. Most of them are born in muggle hospitals. None of our parents
are magical, remember? None of them know about St. Mungo’s. That means that muggle
doctors and midwives handle plenty of magical pregnancies without any ill effect. Besides,
St. Mungo’s doesn’t do scans. I’m quite keen to see the baby.”
“See the baby?” repeated Lucius.
Hermione nodded. “Yes, they can take pictures that show how he’s growing in there.”
“Don’t tell me they put a camera up–” started Lucius, but then he cut himself off with a glare
from Narcissa.
“No,” said Hermione in amusement. “They don’t. It’s something on the outside of the belly.
It’s not invasive, and it doesn’t hurt at all.”
Lucius looked gobsmacked.
“I just don’t know…” said Narcissa worriedly.
Hermione sighed. “It’s my choice, as you very well know. But I can assure you, it will be
fine.”
Narcissa pursed her lips but fell silent. Lucius, however, was not done.
“It’s not proper for my grandson to be born in a muggle hospital.”
Hermione rolled her eyes.
“Why not? He’ll be attending muggle school too. We might as well start him off the right
way.”
Lucius’s jaw dropped. “Muggle school? Draco, surely you haven’t agreed to–”
“I have,” said Draco, cutting off Lucius. “He will be well educated in muggle primary school
and will have tutors during breaks for the magical side of things before Hogwarts. Drop it,
Father.”
“But St. Mungo’s–” he started again.
“Draco gets no say in that, I’m afraid,” chimed Hermione. “Little Star might be fifty percent
him, but I’m the one doing all the work.”
Lucius opened his mouth to protest, but Narcissa held up a hand, as she stared at Hermione
with large eyes. “Little Star?” she asked hesitantly.
Hermione gave her a soft smile. “That’s what we’ve been calling him. We haven’t chosen a
name yet, but it will be celestial to honor the Blacks.”
At this, Narcissa started to beam. Lucius opened his mouth and said, “But the muggles–” and
was cut off again by Narcissa kicking him under the table.
“Forget the muggles, Lucius,” she said, straightening up. “I’m sure Hermione knows what
she is talking about. I never considered it before, but there are quite a lot of muggleborns
aren’t there? They are all born in muggle hospitals and surely go to muggle schools before
Hogwarts. Anyway, I’m quite keen to see these pictures of Little Star, aren’t you?”
Draco felt slightly lightheaded with relief as Lucius scowled into his sushi, muttering words
that sounded much like, ‘duty,’ and ‘tradition,’ and ‘madness.’ But with Narcissa on board,
Draco knew he was officially overruled.
Narcissa abandoned her chopsticks and called for fish forks for the table. Then she raised a
slice of sushi toward Hermione in much the same way the Grangers had toasted them the
night before.
“Little Star Malfoy. Oh I can’t wait to meet him!”
Chapter 23: Fruit Cocktail.
Hermione’s first trimester had been fascinating to Draco. At ten weeks pregnant, she had
only been actually pregnant for eight weeks, due to some dating anomaly Draco still did not
fully understand.
During those eight weeks any number of interesting things had occurred.
Hermione’s cravings for sour, salty, and spicy things had not abated, especially when it came
to sushi. Draco had become a regular at the little shop by her flat, though most days he only
brought home something for her. She continued to have such a severe aversion to red meat
that nobody in the family could eat it because just the smell of it would make her stomach
turn. Pasta, chicken, and fish were fine though, and Draco told the elves to put those things
in the dinner rotation more often.
Her nausea was persistent, but was not debilitating. She proudly announced that she had not
actually thrown up yet, though Draco found her crouched in front of the toilet nearly every
day when she experienced a precarious moment.
“I’m not going to vomit, I’m not,” she insisted with gritted teeth. “It will pass eventually.
It’s just a few more weeks...”
Draco wasn’t sure if she was trying to convince him or herself. With few other remedies for
it, she drank peppermint tea and sucked on sour candies to the point that even her parents felt
the need to comment.
“Don’t forget you’re more susceptible to cavities while you’re pregnant,” warned her
mother. “It’s all the hormones. I’ve had new mums show up in my office with cavities after
having no teeth issues for decades.” Hermione just gave her mother a tight smile and popped
another candy in her mouth.
She became tired, in much the same way as Pansy did, falling asleep at the oddest times and
strangest places. She had always been a bit of a restless sleeper, but now she was sleeping
like the dead except for the few times she woke up in the middle of the night to relieve
herself. She could fall back asleep in a moment though, so deep was her exhaustion.
“Well I’m literally growing a person here, I don’t know what you expect,” she snapped, when
Draco asked her how on earth she could sleep ten or more hours per day and still feel tired.
Her stomach was still relatively flat, and it was hard to believe that Little Star was in there
somewhere, but Draco knew that he was. His own marital magic had dramatically calmed
down, having finally achieved the thing it sought from his wife. And while her stomach still
looked normal, her breasts were positively enormous, so much so that she had to replace
every bra in her dresser.
Draco was a huge fan of this development.
More than anything else, the thing that fascinated Draco the most was the week-by-week
update that Hermione would drop in casual conversation.
“I’m eight weeks today! Little Star is the size of a raspberry. He has eyes, a nose, and
apparently he’s moving around in there.”
“Today is nine weeks! He’s the size of a cherry, and he’s growing ears.”
And that morning she gave him the news that he was the size of a kumquat and had fingers,
toes, and even lips forming.
“What’s a kumquat?”
“It’s a citrus thing. It’s about the size of a prune.”
This was massively larger than the poppyseed where Little Star had begun, and Draco could
scarcely believe that so much was happening.
Hermione’s first “visit” to her doctor was really nothing more than a quick check to confirm
that yes, she was pregnant, and yes she would need a midwife. Hermione, being the type to
have done her research, insisted on having her “dating scan” at ten weeks, which was the
earliest she could get it. She was certain their son would be advanced in all things, including
in this, and she saw no need to wait any longer to see him. So that was how Draco found
himself in a muggle waiting room for something called an “ultrasound.”
He was skeptical, to say the least, but Hermione assured him it was entirely normal, and he
would even get to see the baby today.
He was dressed in his muggle best for the occasion: his three piece custom suit with a silk
tie. He nervously flattened his hair on his head while he waited for Hermione to arrive, and
he couldn’t help but wonder if he might be slightly overdressed. The muggles with the
clipboards all seemed to be wearing something that reminded him of pajamas. Still, he
would be meeting his son in a way, and Draco was a big believer in first impressions.
Hermione was running a little late, though he supposed she might have gotten held up on her
way there. She was coming all the way from Hogwarts for it, having explained to him that
she had little choice in the matter. The ultrasound appointment had limited space, and a
Wednesday morning was the first available option.
Draco sat up as the door opened, and his wife walked through it, then his jaw dropped as he
saw the trail of people coming in behind her.
They were her students.
Hermione cast an amused look at his suit, while Draco looked at her students in confusion.
“Erm, what are they all doing here?” he asked her in a whisper, as he pulled her in for a peck
on the cheek. Behind Hermione, he could hear some girls tittering at him.
“Oh, this is one of my sixth year classes. I thought this could be very educational for them.”
Draco raised one eyebrow. “Educational?”
“Of course,” said blithely. “It touches on quite a few things we’ve discussed in class: human
anatomy, technology, sex education, and what happens when terrible laws like the MLPP are
passed. I thought we could make a field trip out of it!”
The twenty or so students just shrugged at Draco behind her and then found seats in the
waiting room that was now completely full of teenagers.
“You’ve told them then?” he asked under his breath.
Hermione gave him a pointed look. “They all signed a magically binding nondisclosure
agreement. It’s similar to what I put into place for the D.A. in fifth year. They won’t be able
to breathe a word.”
Draco blinked in surprise and wondered if magic like that was strictly legal when performed
on minors, but instead of questioning her about it he just nodded. He was married to
Hermione Granger, and she could manage her pregnancy however she liked.
Still, it was a bit awkward when Hermione’s name was called out and Draco plus twenty
teens all rose at once and crammed themselves into a very small and dimly lit room.
“Erm… we normally only permit the mother and the father or a support partner–” started the
nervous muggle who was manning a machine that looked like something out of a muggle
space film Hermione had made him watch recently.
“Confundus,” said Hermione calmly, as she pointed her wand at the woman.
“Oh yes,” she said vacantly. “Let’s have a look, shall we? Now if you could disrobe so we
could do a transvaginal ultrasound and–”
“Confundus,” said Hermione again.
“We can just do a regular scan on your belly today. It’s a bit early, but baby Malfoy should
be large enough for it.”
“Thank you,” said Hermione cordially.
“Should you really be confunding the woman who is going to be using that machine on you
and Little Star?” hissed Draco in disbelief.
“Honestly, Draco, it will be fine. I’ve told you a hundred times it’s really nothing more than a
giant camera. There’s nothing to worry about!”
Draco harumphed, but dropped it, trusting she knew what she was doing. That trust flew out
the window, however, as the woman in charge of the machine leaned forward and lifted his
wife’s jumper and then unbuttoned and rolled down her jeans so that her midriff and navel
were exposed.
Draco heard one of those blasted teenagers whistle from the corner, and he spun around and
glared at him. The kid was runty and rather spotted.
“I went to Azkaban for the unforgiveables you know,” he said in a dangerous voice. “Keep
your eyes off my wife!”
“It’s not my fault she’s all… you know!” he said, waving a hand toward Hermione’s midriff.
Hermione just rolled her eyes and scolded Draco. “Honestly, stop being such a caveman.
You’re the one who impregnated me.”
A chorus of “Ewws!” followed this announcement, though Draco heard a couple of girls
dissolve into giggles behind him.
He huffed and turned back around to find the woman squeezing something that looked like
clear jelly on Herrmione’s stomach.
“Here we go!” she said excitedly, and Draco did his best to block out all the students around
them as the woman placed a sort of muggle wand on Hermione’s stomach. Immediately
something black and white and grainy lit up on the screen.
“Whoa…” murmured a few students, and Draco was sure their eyes were as wide as his. It
looked like a roundish, hollow cavity, except…
“There’s the baby,” said the woman, pointing to something that didn’t look very much like a
baby in Draco’s opinion.
“It looks like an alien!” one of the students whisper-shouted, and Draco turned to glare at
them. He heard Hermione suppress a laugh.
“We’ll try to get some measurements,” said the woman, and she started clicking buttons and
drawing lines across the small form, while making notes. “Crown to rump, 65 millimeters,
which is perfect…” she started.
“Rump?” asked a male voice behind him.
“That means his arse!” answered one of the students.
“Yes, thank you,” admonished Hermione.
Draco grumbled as the woman continued to take measurements and make notes. He tugged
on his collar, which was sticking to his skin with sweat. This room was far too small for the
number of people inside of it, and the equipment seemed to be throwing off heat of its own.
Then Draco’s world tilted on its axis when the woman said, “Let’s listen to the baby’s
heartbeat, shall we?”
She flipped a switch, and suddenly a rapid thump, thump, thump, thump started to echo
through the room. Draco wasn’t the only one who gasped. Hermione looked transformed,
and even the students appeared stunned by what they were hearing.
“Is it supposed to be that fast?” asked Draco, both amazed and terrified that something was
very wrong. It was rapid, far faster than his heart would ever be, even during exercise.
“Oh yes, baby’s clocking in at 170 beats per minute. That’s perfect.”
Draco realized his mouth was hanging open, and he closed it with a snap. Then he closed his
eyes too and memorized the sound.
Thump, thump, thump, thump
Even more than the picture on the screen, this was proof that Little Star was alive and well
inside of Hermione. Draco found himself beaming and made a mental note to pull out the
pensieve and revisit this memory.
At long last the woman hit a few buttons on that large camera, and Draco heard an odd sound
as a black and white photo came sputtering out of yet another plastic device. She presented it
to Hermione, who looked at it with tears in her eyes.
“Oh just look at him!” she said, holding the picture up for Draco.
He grabbed it, staring at the thing that really did look more like an alien than a baby. A label
had been added with an arrow pointing to the blob with some text next to it that said “BSBY.”
“I think she meant to type ‘BABY,’ but you know the S and the A are next to each other,”
said Hermione with a fond smile. “I did confund her twice.”
“Who does he look like Professor G?” asked one of the students.
“A ten-week fetus, Samantha. Though I have been assured that he will have blonde hair
eventually.”
“I think we should start calling him Blob,” said Draco, studying the picture a bit more and
turning it upside down. Maybe it would look more like a baby that way.
“Don’t you dare,” she declared, snatching it back. “Now then, if you could please wait with
my students in the waiting room, I have a regular appointment in just a few minutes. It
shouldn’t take long. Oh I am so excited to show Mum and Narcissa his first picture!”
His first picture.
Merlin, but that was a strange thought. And yes, he might be more Blob than Baby at the
moment, but Draco supposed that was alright. A few weeks ago he didn’t even exist.
Later on that night, after Draco had threatened a few of the male students he overheard
talking about his wife’s “sexy tits” and Hermione herself had escorted them all back to
Hogwarts, Draco found Hermione in one of the sitting rooms with his mother. They were
oohing and aahing over the photo from the scan that day.
Draco leaned against the doorframe, reluctant to interrupt them, but he couldn’t help the
small smile that crossed his face as Hermione waxed poetic about it.
“His measurements are just perfect! And they even let us listen to his heartbeat! It was
exactly 170 beats per minute, and it was just the most magical thing! Everything is going
exactly as planned. See? Here’s his first picture!”
“Oh he’s beautiful!” gushed Narcissa, as she stared at the photo of the grainy blob. “And you
said there would be more?”
“Yes, you and Mum should come with us to my twenty-week scan. That’s the big one where
they look at everything. He’ll look like a proper baby then!”
“He’s a proper baby now. Very posh, isn’t he? He’s lounging around in there like a Malfoy
who already knows he owns the place. Merlin, just look at him…”
They continued on in this vein for some time, and Draco found himself smiling softly. He
couldn’t remember the last time he heard his wife or his mother this enthusiastic about
anything. He idly wondered where Hermione fell on the fear to excitement scale now.
Surely she’s at least twenty-five percent excited.
As Lucius moved into the room and peered down at the photo curiously, Draco suppressed a
small laugh.
“Well he has the Malfoy head and nose, that’s for certain,” was Lucius’s final word on the
matter, after turning the photo in a full circle to make sure he wasn’t missing something.
When Lucius moved away, Hermione looked up at Draco and winked. He just grinned back
and gave her a small toast with his drink.
Good show today, Little Star. It was lovely to meet you.

31 March 2004
“I wish I could skip class today,” came Hermione’s voice, which had dropped to something
like a purr.
Draco opened his eyes to find his wife’s heated gaze on him. He looked blearily around and
realized the sun was barely starting to come over the horizon.
“It’s early darling.”
“Mmmm, but I woke up and caught a break this morning. I’m feeling better than I have the
last few days. We should take advantage…”
Her finger trailed down his chest, and Draco fought to shake the sleep off of him.
Hermione’s sex drive had been like a pendulum, swinging from incredibly eager to
nonexistent depending on how she felt. But even eager, she hadn’t approached him quite like
this.
“And it’s time for your weekly report,” she added. “Little Star is the size of a lime, and he’s
starting to grow a penis.”
Draco snorted at this. “Good boy.”
Hermione rolled her eyes, but she looked amused. “Yes, I’m sure the ladies will be pleased
in twenty years if he takes after his father in this respect.”
At that, her hand trailed down his stomach and cupped him. Draco inhaled.
“Can I play with him this morning?” she asked innocently. “I’m feeling a bit randy.”
Draco’s brain was going blank at the look on her face, as he just nodded. “Anything,” he said
a bit hoarsely.
“Anything?”
“Anything at all.”
Hermione’s eyes lit, and before Draco knew it she had thrown the covers off of them, and
was pointing her wand at him.
“What are you–” he started in confusion, but she muttered a spell and ropes flew out to tie his
hands together against the headboard. He knew his eyes were huge, and he felt the blood
rush south as she quirked an eyebrow at him.
“Does anything include this?”
“Fuck yes,” he breathed.
Hermione smiled sweetly at him, and then waved her wand again to vanish his clothes. She
licked her lips as she looked down at him. “Oh my, this does excite you…”
“Minx,” he muttered, but he couldn’t help the grin that crossed his face as he realized he was
being tied up by Hermione Granger so she could have her wicked way with him. Fuck, if this
sort of thing had happened at school, he probably would have become a legend. But they
were older now, married, and somehow that made it even better.
“I’m probably supposed to ask you for a safe word,” she said seriously. “I read about it in a
book.”
Draco rolled his eyes with amusement. “I don’t care about fucking safe words. Suck me,
ride me, slap me around a little… I don’t care.”
“Draco,” she admonished.
“Fine,” he huffed. “My safe word can be ‘starlight.’ But I’ll only use it if I think you’re
endangering Little Star with your… enthusiasm.”
“He’s perfectly safe in there and very well protected,” said Hermione.
“Good,” said Draco, his eyes fluttering closed as Hermione’s lips closed around him. Gods,
he would never get used to this, it was one of his favorite sensations. She gave excellent
blow jobs – deep and wet. Draco pointedly refused to consider just how much practice she
might have gotten before their marriage and instead decided to simply enjoy it. She was
licking, sucking, and Draco already found himself straining at the ropes, wishing he could
lace his fingers through her hair.
After several long minutes she moved off with a wet pop and Draco opened his eyes to find
her stripping. As usual his eyes went right to her breasts. They were larger than ever,
swollen by her pregnancy.
“I wish I could photograph you just like this,” he confessed, as she reached down and grasped
them. “Fuck that’s hot…”
“Do you like that then?” she asked as she straddled him and hovered just over his cock. “Do
you like knowing that you’re the reason they look like this? I couldn’t stay away from you
and became reckless with our birth control, and now here I am, pregnant with ridiculous
boobs all because of you.”
“Yes,” he breathed. “Yes, I think about it all the time.”
“And you like it?”
“I love it. I love it so much. I want all of your babies to be mine…” She smiled and swirled
her hips around his tip, and he gasped. “Please, darling, don’t be cruel…”
“You said anything.”
“I know I did, but I didn’t think you would be such a tease…”
“Maybe I like making you come undone… I have to make sure you stay interested, even
when I become huge.”
He heard the slightest waver in her voice at this, and he looked at her seriously. “Hermione,
do you know what I’ve been thinking about whenever I wank recently?”
She stilled and shook her head.
“My newest fantasy is fucking you in your third trimester. You’ll have to top me like this or
get on your knees for it because you’re going to look like some sort of fertility goddess with
our son making your belly too big for other positions. I’ve already looked it up, you know. I
think about it all the time. That phase is going to be far too brief for me, and I want to
remember every second of it.”
Her face softened. “How do you always know what to say?”
“I don’t. I’m just telling you the truth. Knowing that my son is inside of you is ridiculously
sexy. It turns me on in ways I never imagined. It’s just like you said… I did that to you, and
I love the fact that I did that to you. With every change of your body I’m reminded of it, and
it makes me want to fuck you harder.”
Her eyes darkened, and Draco licked his lips.
“You want a hard fucking, then?”
“Please, darling,” he groaned.
“You know I like it when you beg.”
“I’ll be so good, please. Just ride me, fuck me, let me feel you like this…”
“You are my best boy, it’s true,” she said as she finally sank down on his cock, and Draco’s
eyes rolled back at the sensation.
She began to move. She bounced and ground and swirled and pounded. She took breaks to
let Draco lick her nipples, only to make him gasp when she seated herself on top of him
again. He was entirely hers like this. Whatever she wanted from him, she could have. He
would never want to be with another woman, would never even fantasize about another
woman. Because this one owned every part of him.
She made Draco hold back until she came twice, and when he finally released himself into
her, he was sweaty, sated, and he had never loved her more.
“Hermione,” he murmured, as she released his bindings and sank back down on his chest.
“Hmmm?”
“The decision is going to be yours. But in case I haven’t made myself perfectly clear, I want
to make sure you know that I really want to stay married to you after the MLPP is gone.”
She lifted her head and gave him a shy smile.
“I’m thinking about it, Draco. I promise.”
Draco closed his eyes and allowed himself to drift for a few more minutes, imagining not just
one pregnancy, but two or three. There would be milestones and birthdays and anniversaries
and holidays. He wanted all of it. He wanted her.
“Thank you, darling. I’m going to hold you to it.”

A Few Hours Later
“DRACO I NEED YOU TO GET YOUR ARSE TO ST. MUNGO’S RIGHT NOW!”
Pansy’s patronus, which was in the shape of a poodle, ceased screeching at him, and Draco
looked around at the others in the meeting with him as it dissolved. He was with several of
the more moderate members of the Wizengamot, floating the idea of Kingsley Shacklebolt’s
ousting. He had just been about to propose considering a witch to be the next Minister – the
identity of his wife’s chosen witch would come at a later meeting – when Pansy’s patronus
interrupted them.
“Is everything alright?” asked Lord Grant, who was staring right where the patronus had just
been.
“The patronus belongs to Lord Nott’s wife,” said Draco, frowning. “And she is…” his eyes
widened as he realized what this could be.
“What? She’s what?” asked Lord Patil.
“She’s pregnant and due any day.”
All the men in the room – because now that he was married to Hermione, Draco was more
aware than ever that the Wizengamot was composed almost entirely of men – grinned at this.
“Well you had better move along. I’m sure Lord Nott could use some moral support.”
“Sorry about this,” said Draco apologetically.
“Not at all!” said Lord Grant jovially. “We need more children, don’t we? Please, go to St.
Mungo’s, and we can reconvene later.”
Draco rose and shook hands with everyone, giving his father a pointed look to make sure he
stayed behind just in case the discussions continued without him. He turned and apparated
on the spot, appearing a moment later in the lobby of St. Mungo’s. He approached the
welcome witch cautiously.
“Erm, Pansy Nott just summoned me and said I should get here immediately,” he said.
The witch – a matronly type with gray frizz – placed a pair of spectacles on her nose and ran
her finger down a list.
“Yes, Pansy Nott, maternity ward, fifth floor. You’ll want to take the lift on your right.
There is a separate waiting room there, and you’ll need to stay there until somebody calls you
back. I’ll let them know you’ve arrived.”
Draco nodded and thanked her before heading to the lift and making his way to the fifth
floor. When he exited he did a double take. The main lobby of St. Mungo’s had always felt a
bit run down. It was always in need of funds, and some of the seat cushions and battered end
tables in the waiting room had a reparo charm cast on them one too many times.
The maternity ward, however, looked like something out of a glossy magazine. The entire
space was decked out in calming tones that reminded Draco of the seaside. There was a
water feature tumbling down one wall, over a mosaic that glittered underneath it. The
soothing sounds of water trickled before it magically disappeared into the floor. There were
large photographs of babies smiling at the camera, their rolls dimpling as they laughed.
Draco belatedly remembered that as part of the MLPP, the Ministry had approved an infusion
of funds for maternity care into St. Mungo’s. Apparently they spent quite a bit of it here.
Draco gave it a wry look, wondering if the rooms for actual medical care were this nice.
He was pulled out of his thoughts as he noticed Theo, who was pacing back and forth and
looking like he wanted to vomit.
Theo’s head shot up as Draco stepped forward.
“Is everything alright?” Draco asked cautiously.
“She’s in labor!” Theo said, wringing his hands. “And she kicked me out!”
“What do you mean, she kicked you out?”
“Exactly what it sounds like! She told me to find you to go play billiards or something while
she just handles it, but I obviously objected so then she went over my head to the Healer, and
now…”
Theo threw his hands in the air and resumed pacing.
“Why doesn’t she want you in there?”
“I don’t know! She says I’m stressing her out! But I was only asking the Healer questions,
you know, just to make sure everything was happening properly, and then she had a
contraction and it just…”
He waved his hand vaguely in the air.
“Well do you want to go play billiards?”
Draco was truly out of his depths with this.
“No! I want to be there when she pushes!”
“And when is that going to be?”
“I don’t know, do I? She’s only five centimeters…”
“What is five centimeters?”
Theo looked at him like he was dense. “Her cervix? You know, the thing that opens so the
baby can come out?”
Draco swallowed hard. He had not made it that far in his reading yet. “Erm, no, I’m not
really aware…”
“Well how do you think the baby stays in there for nine months? It’s sort of like this, you
know, and then it grows…”
At this, Theo made a fist that he slowly opened into a circle. Draco stared at it in
bemusement. He had never really thought of this before, but he supposed it made sense.
There must be something holding the baby back or else it would just fall out, wouldn’t it?
“Alright, so this… cervix … is opening then?”
“Yes, Pansy’s cervix is opening. They keep sticking their fingers up there to check, and she
says it hurts worse than a doxy bite. She’s at a five, and they say she has to get to a ten…”
Draco was shifting awkwardly as he realized precisely where this cervix must be located. It
must be up there – way up there. Merlin, he had only gone up there with Pansy one time
before they both decided it was far too strange.
“You know, I’m really not sure if I’m comfortable talking about Pany’s cervix,” said Draco,
turning a bit pink.
Theo just shot him a knowing look. Draco had finally told Theo, Pansy, and Blaise about
Little Star the previous week.
“You’ll be worried about Hermione’s cervix soon enough.”
“Please do not talk about my wife’s cervix,” said Draco, frowning.
Theo rolled his eyes. “At least we aren’t talking about postpartum breast engorgement when
the milk comes in.”
“Wait, they get bigger?” asked Draco with wide eyes. His breath caught as he tried to
imagine it.
Theo pinched the bridge of his nose as he said, “Merlin, I can’t believe Pansy sent me you.
Even Blaise would be better than this…”
Draco scoffed. “I’ll have you know I have plenty of reading material. I am simply keeping
up with it as Hermione’s pregnancy progresses. She’s only eleven weeks today. We have a
lime, not a watermelon.”
“Well my little watermelon will be pushed out as soon as Pansy’s at a ten.”
Draco sighed and sank down into one of the chairs. Theo mimicked him, looking stressed.
“How long do you reckon then?”
“Hard to say,” said Theo. “She was sitting at a two for weeks…”
“Wait, she’s just been walking around with it open?” asked Draco in horror.
“Yes! Merlin, you’re clueless…”
Draco tried his best not to be offended. After all, Theo was facing impending fatherhood.
No doubt he was a bit stressed. He grasped for something, anything that might be helpful.
“Look, how about I get you sushi?”
Theo shot him a confused look, and Draco just shrugged. “I know a place. Maybe it will
help pass the time.”
Theo just gave him an overwhelmed look and put his head in his hands with a groan. Draco
rose and clapped him on the shoulder.
“Hang in there, mate, I’ll be right back.

Very Late That Night and The Next Morning
Camelia Theodora Nott was born at 11:42 P.M., weighing 3.6 kg and screaming like a
banshee. Her father, Theodore Tiberius Nott, consumed four helpings of sushi and six cups
of coffee while waiting for her mother, Pansy Parkinson Nott, to move from a five to a ten.
When she finally reached ‘Level Ten,’ a term coined by Blaise who showed up an hour after
Draco did, Pansy pushed for only twenty-seven minutes to get Camelia out. Theo claimed
that Pansy broke his hand during her pushing, and it would never be the same. He told Draco
that his injured hand was the reason he didn’t cut the cord.
The truth was that the Healer on duty noticed Theo’s hands shaking from caffeine and
decided that he shouldn’t hold scissors near any important bits.
By the time Pansy reached Level Ten, the waiting room at the St. Mungo’s maternity ward
included Pansy’s mother, Narcissa Malfoy, Blaise Zabini, Ginny Potter, Draco Malfoy, and
Hermione Granger. Around midnight a triumphant Theo emerged to announce that Camelia
was born healthy and strong, having scored an admirable nine out of ten on her WAPGAR –
the wizarding version of an APGAR. Draco glanced at Hermione when Theo provided this
last statistic, and he couldn't help but notice a competitive glint in her eye.
Little Star had better score ten out of ten or Hermione will have something to say about it, he
thought with a chuckle.
Upon hearing the news that Pansy was resting and would not be accepting visitors until her
glamors were in place the following morning, everyone went home to sleep before returning
the next day to meet Cami, as Theo was calling her.
When the tiny bundle of pink was passed to Draco, he experienced a small moment of panic.
But thankfully he was seated on a couch in Pansy’s recovery room, and his mother placed the
baby in his arms, telling him not to move an inch. Draco held perfectly still.
He looked at Cami, noting the very red face, the closed eyes, and the Parkinson upturned
nose. She looked a bit squished in his opinion, but then she yawned, and something inside of
him melted.
“You’ll be her godfather, right mate?” asked Theo, lowering himself onto the couch beside
him and slipping one finger into his daughter’s hand. It closed tightly around Theo’s finger
and tugged it close. Theo had never looked more lovestruck.
“It would be an honor,” said Draco, both surprised and touched. This wasn’t something he
and Hermione had even started to discuss, though he was certain Hermione would insist upon
Potter for that role.
Theo just grinned and then sighed down at his daughter, a truly dopey expression on his face.
“Thanks. I’m already exhausted, but this dad thing is brilliant. You’re going to love it.”
Draco knew he would. He already loved being a godfather, and he loved Little Star more
than anything.
“Your watermelon is perfect,” he said, “and I can’t wait to meet mine in a few months.”
Chapter 24: Baby Bumps and Molly Wobbling.
21 April 2004.
Hermione’s baby bump seemed to appear overnight. At fourteen weeks exactly, he caught
her staring at herself in the mirror, examining her profile with her shirt lifted. She was
rubbing a hand over her stomach.
“Can you see it?” she asked, as she stared at it.
Draco approached her from behind and ran his own hand over it. It was hardening a little,
and as she tried to suck her stomach in, the small bump remained.
“We have an apricot today,” she said. “I suppose he’s big enough that my stomach finally
popped.”
“Fuck that’s sexy,” breathed Draco, in awe. He was immediately and rather uncomfortably
aware just how difficult the next – he did some mental maths – twenty-six weeks were going
to be for him.
“I think you have a bit of a breeding kink,” she said with a laugh.
“It’s the family magic,” he said automatically.
“Is it?” she pressed. “I thought you said it had quieted down.”
“Hmmm,” he murmured, kissing her neck and dipping one hand down into her pants as his
other covered hers on top of her bump. “Perhaps you’re right. But you’re pregnant darling –
pregnant with my baby. I’m still getting used to it. It’s unbelievably hot. And it’s starting to
look real now isn’t it?”
“I suppose,” she agreed. “This is supposed to be the best trimester, you know. My nausea is
gone and my energy has come back. But I’m not so huge that I feel like a whale.”
Draco huffed a laugh as she turned and slipped her arms over his shoulder.
“Draco,” she said, and he was surprised to hear a note of nervousness in her voice.
“Hmmm?” he asked distractedly as he moved his hand that was in her pants to grip her arse
instead. He was utterly obsessed. It was absurd.
“Can I ask you for something?”
“Anything,” he said instantly.
“I know it’s a bit last minute, but Minerva approved some time off next week while the
students are finishing up some independent projects for my class. I was thinking we could
take a babymoon.”
He pulled back and studied her curiously. “A babymoon?”
“Yes, it’s something muggles do on occasion. It’s a sort of last hurrah trip for the parents
before the baby is born. We never took a honeymoon, you know, and everyone says to take
the babymoon during the second trimester. I thought this could be a good time to do it before
I’m busy with exams for the students and you’re busy with the MLPP repeal.”
Draco relaxed into a smile. “You’re right we didn’t take a honeymoon, did we? I’ll need to
reschedule some meetings next week, but I’m sure I can be free for a babymoon. Do you
know where you want to go?”
“Maybe the Amalfi coast? I’ve always wanted to see it.”
“That’s one of the easiest places you could have picked,” said Draco, with a smile. “Just tell
me the days you want to be there, and I’ll plan everything. Blaise actually has a villa in
Positano if that’s acceptable? It’s been years since I’ve visited, but I’m sure he would let us
use it. He only goes there in the winter.”
Hermione beamed, and Draco felt a leap of pleasure at this. She wanted to vacation with
him. She wanted to take a trip like a normal couple about to become parents. Surely, surely
she was warming up to the idea of staying married to him.
“Thank you,” she said, reaching up for a kiss. “That sounds ideal. I was thinking we could
leave on Saturday and stay through next Wednesday.”
“I’ll get the portkeys arranged when I’m at the Ministry this afternoon,” promised Draco,
“and I’ll contact Blaise before I leave.”
She gave him a pleased smile and one more kiss before pulling away. “What’s on your
agenda today?” she asked as she began to get dressed.
“Father and I are officially putting forth Maribelle Marchbanks to replace Kingsley. We have
a meeting with those in our voting bloc this morning, and if they agree then we will approach
her about it – though Father says he’s already floated it by her, and she’s very interested.”
Hermione made a pleased noise at this. “I hope they listen to you.”
“I think they will,” said Draco seriously. “She’s a good choice. I was reviewing her voting
record, and you’re right that she was very anti-MLPP, but she’s otherwise fairly middle-ofthe-road.”
Hermione nodded, with a satisfied look on her face. “Do let me know what they say.”
“Of course, I’ll have plenty to report tonight.”
She leaned in for one more peck before giving him a swift smile and hurrying out of their
room. Draco allowed his eyes to pass across her abdomen one last time, before he turned
away with a bit of a shudder.
A breeding kink.
Merlin, but did he ever have one of those. He hadn’t known there was a name for this utter
fascination and obsession with his pregnant wife, but there was little question Hermione was
right about it. She had never looked more beautiful, growing round and luscious with his
child. Her hair was silkier. Her skin glowed. And now that she was through her first
trimester she was feeling better, and her energy had miraculously returned. She reminded
him of a Renaissance painting with her voluptuous curves that drove him utterly mad. If he
could freeze her in time just like this – or perhaps a bit rounder still – he knew he would do it
in a heartbeat. He couldn’t seem to get enough.
It was so sexy that it inspired a truly glorious wank once he was in the shower and preparing
for his day. He struggled to put thoughts of her aside, but he knew he would need to do it to
focus on the meeting he had scheduled that morning, which he was sure would run into the
afternoon. It was the same crowd he had met with several times before – Lord Fawley, Lord
Flint, and Lord Selwyn – plus Theo and Pansy’s father Lord Parkinson. Draco knew that
Theo was already on board, but the others would surely be stunned by the suggestion of a
woman.
Every other candidate they had floated thus far had been men. Lucius and Draco had let
them do it for the last few meetings, because according to Lucius the first suggestions never
seemed to stick. To Draco’s slight surprise his father had been right about this, and the initial
candidates were vetted and soundly rejected after little consideration. But in the last meeting
one of the names had been brought up again, and this, Lucius said, meant they were ready to
begin compromising.
Maribelle Marchbanks would be a compromise candidate – and not just because she was a
woman.
She wouldn’t be conservative enough for Lord Fawley. She wouldn’t be old enough for Lord
Selwyn. And Lord Flint had always been a misogynistic arse and thought the Wizengamot
should be run by men.
And yet, Draco felt sure she would be a candidate that all three of them could get behind once
he and his father had pointed out the obvious reasons for selecting her. What they would not
be saying, of course, was that it was Hermione who had selected her almost unilaterally.
Draco finished his morning routine, made a quick floo call to Blaise who said he was
welcome to use the villa, and then stepped out of the floo at the Ministry an hour later. He
nearly ran headfirst into Theo, who had dark circles under his eyes and was drinking an
espresso like his life depended upon it.
“Alright, mate?” asked Draco, as they fell in step together toward the conference room they
would be using.
“Cami woke up,” said Theo.
“Erm… hasn’t she always been awake? I mean, when she’s not sleeping, that is?”
Theo shot him a look that Draco had come to interpret as, You are not a parent and therefore
you don’t know what the fuck you’re saying right now.
It was vaguely offensive, but Draco assumed he would probably be giving similar looks to
Blaise and others once it was finally his turn.
“No,” he said. “Newborns sleep a lot. They can sleep anywhere and through anything, and
just when you start congratulating yourself for your fantastic parenting and adherence to
some sort of schedule they suddenly become alert. Then you realize that there isn’t a
schedule and there never was one. They just lured you into a false sense of security, and you
gave yourself credit for no good reason.”
Draco chuckled a little, and Theo scowled.
“So what is she doing now, then?” asked Draco.
Theo sighed and rubbed a hand over his face. “She has to be held to sleep.”
“Well that’s not so bad, is it?”
“According to your wife, it is when the parent needs to sleep too. She sent Pansy all this
research that made her think we’re going to hurt the baby if we fall asleep while holding her.”
“Well could you?” asked Draco seriously.
Theo groaned. “Yes, of course we could in theory, but mate… I’m dead on my feet! I’m
doing magic without realizing it, I’m mixing up ingredients for basic household potions, and
I nearly splinched myself while apparating yesterday. Part of me thinks that’s almost more
dangerous than just sleeping with her.”
“So what’s the solution then?”
“Sleep deprivation in shifts. It’s the best we can do right now. We take it in four-hour
blocks. All of that ‘sleep when the baby sleeps’ advice is utter bollocks.”
“Why not use an elf?” asked Draco curiously.
Theo just scowled at him. “That’s what I said, but Pans says we need to bond with her.”
“Bad luck, mate,” said Draco fervently.
Not that he wanted to pawn Little Star off on the elves, but he wasn’t above giving them one
of the night shifts if it meant he and Hermione actually got some sleep during those early
months.
Their conversation came to a halt as they pushed open the conference room door to find the
others already assembled. They shook hands, and all the men clapped Theo on the shoulder
in congratulations. Draco had to suppress a snort, imagining Hermione’s reaction to that.
“As if Theo did any of the work!”
He rather thought Pansy would agree.
Eventually the excitement died down, and they all settled around a conference room table,
where Lucius looked at Draco expectantly.
“Thank you for coming,” started Draco. “Father and I have been in the process of vetting
several more candidates for Minister, and we think we have a proposal that will prove to be
satisfactory.”
Everyone straightened and watched Draco curiously as he took a moment to arrange his
notes. He and Lucius had prepared for this extensively. Draco knew she was a good choice.
But he was experiencing a rather unfortunate case of imposter syndrome as he readied
himself to drop the news on these Wizengamot members who were veterans in their own
right. It was true his father had bullied them into his way of thinking for years, but Draco
was of an entirely new generation.
It felt strange.
He glanced at Theo, who gave him an encouraging nod.
“Right,” said Draco. “We would like to consider Maribelle Marchbanks.”
There was a split second of silence, and then they all started talking at once.
“A woman?”
“Too liberal!”
“Her age though…”
“A woman?”
Draco raised his hand for silence.
“Yes, a woman. Given how unpopular the MLPP has been – and it’s been especially
burdensome for witches – it’s critical we present somebody who will make the wizarding
public trust the Wizengamot again. Madam Marchbanks did not vote for the MLPP or the
amendment. She came out strongly against it during both votes. But she’s also not so liberal
that the entire conservative bloc will be alienated. She’s a reasonable, moderate choice.”
There was a beat of silence as the others absorbed this.
“Her age, though…” said Lord Selwyn.
Draco just gave him a stern look. “She’s ten years older than Shacklebolt. She has a couple
of decades of experience. She is well-liked, and most importantly it will be clear that we
have listened to the public when we present a choice who was anti-MLPP from the very
beginning.”
“But a witch, Draco. We surely can’t have a witch,” said Lord Flint.
Draco opened his mouth to respond, but to his surprise Theo jumped in.
“Lord Flint, I just watched my wife – a witch – give birth to my daughter a few weeks ago.
And do you know what I thought while it was happening? Thank fuck that wasn’t me. She
was brave, beautiful, powerful. The notion that a witch should be excluded from this position
simply because she’s female is asinine, and you know it. Would you have been able to push
Marcus out of your… you know?”
Draco internally winced a little. Theo had always been blunt, but this was borderline
unprofessional. Draco decided to blame sleep deprivation as he watched Lord Flint’s face
turn very red.
“I don’t see what that has to do with anything,” he said grumpily.
Theo rolled his eyes and then rubbed them. He looked slightly manic. “Look, if you have
the balls to write a note to your wife in front of all of us to tell her that Maribelle Marchbanks
has been taken off the table because you disagree with having a female Minister, then by all
means do it. If you write a note to Pamela that says it, we’ll take Madam Marchbanks out of
the running right now.”
Draco’s stomach clenched for a moment, but then eased as Lord Flint slumped a little.
“That’s what I thought,” said Theo, rolling his eyes. “Eliminating Madam Marchbanks
because she’s a witch is irrational. If anything, choosing a witch as our next Minister will
soften the public’s opinion, exactly like Draco suggested. You all know we desperately need
some improvement on that front. Public trust in the Wizengamot has never been lower, not
ever. That includes the war years.”
Lord Flint fell silent, and Draco breathed a mental sigh of relief. He turned to the others.
“Well?”
Lord Selwyn was frowning. “I know she’s older than Shacklebolt, but frankly I always
thought he was too young as well.”
“Madame Marchbanks is a perfect age,” cut in Lucius. “She has plenty of experience, but
she’s not so old that the younger witches and wizards will be unable to relate to her. I know
the MLPP has been unpopular, but we do need children and marriages and some normalcy.
We need somebody the younger generation will connect to and like. Besides, most of the
older candidates we have considered have told us to look elsewhere. It takes a lot of energy
to be the Minister of Magic.”
Lord Selwyn snorted a little. “Young people…” he muttered.
Lucius caught Draco’s eye and gave a small smirk. Draco had heard Lord Selwyn call nearly
everyone a young person with that same sort of distaste, including Lucius. Lord Selwyn was
roughly Albus Dumbledore’s age – or the age he would have been had he still been alive –
and though Lord Selwyn had plenty of sway on the Wizengamot, he thought anybody below
the age of eighty was a child.
“Like Draco said, she’s ten years older than Shacklebolt,” said Lord Parkinson. Draco perked
up a little at this, because before this meeting Theo had told him he wasn’t exactly certain
what his father-in-law would think about this. Draco had a sudden hope that he would not
take any serious convincing.
“Fine,” huffed Lord Selwyn. “But she’s the absolute youngest candidate we should consider.
You all must know I only supported Minister Shacklebolt because there was little choice in
the aftermath of the war.”
There was some sympathetic murmuring at this, and Draco felt a rush of satisfaction. Now it
was just…
“I don’t think she’s conservative enough,” said Lord Fawley.
This, of course, was the only objection that was actually substantive. While Draco himself
was more moderate than most of these men, the Malfoy seat still fell in the conservative
camp. It had for centuries. Draco was determined to pull his bloc closer to the middle or else
break with them entirely, but he needed them for this first. It would take time to reposition
himself as a moderate or – Merlin help his father – a liberal. He wanted to give Hermione
her wish list as quickly as possible, so any overt changes to the Malfoy seat would have to
come after the repeal went into effect.
With barely a glance at his father, Draco pulled out a stack of parchment. It was Maribelle
Marchbanks’s voting record on every single matter that had come before the Wizengamot
over the last twenty years, along with Lord Fawley’s own voting record and several other
very conservative members. Draco had prepared a side-by-side comparison.
“You’ll see she’s not quite a conservative as you, Lord Fawley, but her record reflects that she
is rather conservative on most matters, with the exception of blood politics and laws like the
MLPP that have an outsized effect on witches compared to wizards.”
Draco passed copies of the parchment around to each person at the table, and together they
dug in and began to go through her record vote by vote.
Draco caught Lucius’s eye as Lord Fawley began to soften, and Lucius gave Draco a furtive
smile.
We can do this, thought Draco. We can get them on board.
And Draco was certain that when the most conservative members of the Wizengamot put
forth a middle-aged witch with a moderate voting record to oust Kingsley Shacklebolt, the
vote would go in her favor. And then – if Draco was very lucky – Hermione might agree to
stay married after Little Star was born.

The meeting only broke up when Pansy’s patronus appeared, demanding that Theo come
home right that instant to relieve her from baby duties. Draco idly wondered just how often
he would be seeing the poodle patronus fetching either him or Theo now that his goddaughter
was here.
Draco shook hands with the others and then stopped by the portkey office to arrange their
last-minute trip to Italy. By the time he floo’d back to the Manor, he was feeling tired, but
upbeat. He would be going on vacation with his wife soon. And the entire group had come
around to the idea of endorsing Maribelle Marchbanks, despite the individual concerns from
each member in their bloc. It had happened quickly enough that Draco didn’t even need to
reschedule most of his meetings for the following week to take a few days off.
And with Flint, Fawley, and Selwyn on board – not to mention Theo and Pansy’s father and
Lucius himself – they would be able to bring others in line to create the coalition they needed
to get her instated as the new Minister. Before the meeting broke up they were already in the
process of divvying up other Wizengamot members for closed-door meetings, while Draco
and Lucius were tasked with formally notifying Maribelle Marchbanks herself. Lucius
offered to just handle it, as he had worked with her for years and knew her much better than
Draco did.
Draco was feeling flush with success and couldn’t wait to share the news with Hermione as
he arrived back at the Manor and went in search of his wife.
It took a long while to find her, and it wasn’t until he called for Patsy that he eventually
located her in a little-used salon. Patsy was wringing her hands as she led Draco there.
“What’s wrong, Patsy?” asked Draco with concern.
“It’s just that Mistress is having guests,” said the little elf nervously. “They is just arriving.”
“Who?” asked Draco curiously.
Hermione’s classes ended rather early on Wednesdays and Fridays so she often arrived back
at the Manor before Draco did on those days. But it was still very unusual for her to receive
visitors in the middle of the week.
Patsy let out another distressed sound. “It is… oh Master Draco, I is not wanting to say. ‘Tis
best for you to see for yourself, Sir.”
This was very odd indeed, and Draco had no idea what he was in for as he made his way to
the small room, which he knew was in the far corner of the Manor. He wondered why
Hermione was receiving visitors there, unless she needed to make a quick escape. There
were several exterior doors to the room.
Steeling himself for whatever he was about to find, he approached the closed door and
knocked as he pushed it open. He came to a halt when he saw who was seated in the small
room, with tea and a few sandwiches between them.
His wife was in an armchair, looking rather tense. Prudence Weasley was in another, next to
Hermione. And seated next to each other on the small settee opposite them was Ron and
Molly Weasley.
Draco mentally groaned.
“Good afternoon, darling,” he said, trying to affect a bored air as he strode into the room and
dropped a kiss on Hermione’s head. Prudence gave him a tight smile as the others grimaced.
As much as Draco didn’t want to be here, he wouldn’t leave Hermione alone with this
crowd. It was true that Ron had apologized and Prudence was a friend, but Molly hadn’t
made any effort to reach out, and Draco didn’t know if she was here because she wanted to
be or because she was being coerced by the others.
He moved to a chair that was arranged in a corner and levitated it to join the circle, placing it
close to Hermione’s other side.
“To what do we owe the pleasure?” he asked coldly, as he very obviously reached for
Hermione’s hand and laced their fingers together. Ron and Molly both caught the gesture of
course, and their faces looked grim.
“Molly would like to say something,” said Prudence firmly.
Draco’s gaze now bore into the short woman. She was clearly uncomfortable and pursed her
lips before taking a deep breath.
“I… overreacted the last time we saw each other. I apologize.”
There was a lengthy silence, and Draco saw Ron exchanging awkward glances with
Prudence. Finally, Hermione broke it.
“Why are you really here, Molly?” she asked a bit wearily. “It’s been months.”
Now Molly seemed to slump.
“I had trouble seeing things clearly while Ronald was in Azkaban. I shouldn’t have said
those things to you. I didn’t… fully understand the situation at the time.”
Curiously, she was glancing between Ron and Prudence now.
“What situation?” asked Draco.
To Draco’s surprise it was Ron who answered with some surprising bluntness. “The fact that
I was falling in love with Prudence even though I went behind her back with that
amendment. I was too caught up in trying to save Hermione to realize it when I was working
with Shacklebolt and your dad, but I had a lot of time to think about it in Azkaban. When I
got out I told mum that Azkaban had given me the time I needed to understand what I really
wanted.”
“And it wasn’t me,” said Hermione firmly.
“No,” confessed Ron. “It never was, not really. Not for a long time. We’re too different.
You were just…”
“The easy choice,” supplied Hermione.
“Right,” said Ron a bit awkwardly.
“So you’re apologizing now because your son is telling you to?” asked Draco, looking at
Molly with some incredulity.
She made a frustrated sound and threw her hands in the air. “None of you are parents!”
Draco pointedly did not look at Hermione, because they were parents now. But she was
wearing a loose top, and her bump would not be obvious through it. The Potters had been
sworn to secrecy, and evidently they had kept the secret.
“I’m not sure why that matters,” said Draco.
Now Molly gave him a fierce look. “It matters because parents feel everything their children
feel! Every moment of hurt, every betrayal, every single slight. When our children cry, we
weep. When they are afraid, we are terrified. Every feeling of theirs is amplified in us. I am
not trying to excuse what I said a few months ago – I am apologizing for it, truly. But at the
time I was a mother trying to support my son who I thought had been betrayed by the woman
he loved. Hermione left him at the altar, and once they finally made up with each other while
she was in Azkaban, Ronald came home and said they would be able to reconcile someday.
He seemed encouraged by it, excited. It made me worried because he had always seemed
more eager for a relationship than she was. Up until the wedding, I told myself it was just
differences in temperament. But after she jilted him I realized she truly didn’t feel that way
about him and any feelings he had for her were one-sided. That is… terrible to watch, as a
parent. I thought that Ronnie loved her from the time they were children, and he was going
to have his heart broken yet again. Then sure enough, she married you instead. I know I
should not have said the things I did, and I have cared about Hermione for many years,
despite our occasional differences. But the only thing I could not forgive was breaking my
child’s heart. That’s what I thought she had done, and I… overreacted.”
Draco’s own heart was racing after this little speech, and he forced his eyes not to slide to
Hermione’s stomach.
How would he react to a witch who broke Little Star’s heart? How would he treat her? He
hoped he would be kinder than Molly Weasley, but would he really? The thought of any sort
of emotional slight against his son – however minor – was poisonous.
Hermione sighed, and he could tell she was imagining the same thing.
“So when Ron told you he didn’t really love me, not like that…” she prompted.
Now Molly sighed too.
“When he told me that, I could finally see things from your perspective. I am sorry, my dear.
I regret our encounter that day, and despite my beliefs at the time I should never have said the
things I did.”
There was an awkward silence for another moment as Hermione seemed to weigh this.
“You do know that Draco’s not a Death Eater, right?” she finally said.
Draco sat up and looked at her in surprise.
Molly dipped her head. “Yes, Harry and Ginny have made that clear. I just… well, at the
time I believed your articles, dear. The ones you wrote in Azkaban.”
Draco stilled, and he heard Hermione give a tiny groan next to him.
“God,” she said. “Of course you did. I am such a –”
“Stop,” said Draco firmly. Hermione gave him a miserable look, and he saw the others now
staring at him in surprise too.
“Let’s all just stop,” he added. “Molly, Hermione wrote those things to try to make herself a
sympathetic figure in the press so she could work to get the MLPP overturned. She didn’t lie,
but she played up the very worst sides of me and my history to spin it in a particular way.
She did it with my permission, and we’re moving on from it.”
Then he turned to his wife. “Hermione, darling, stop beating yourself up about it. We’ve
been over this before. It was worth it to get the MLPP overturned, and it’s going to work.
I’m certain of it.”
Finally he looked back at the others. “I know I have no right to declare a truce here – I’m not
the injured party from either side – but from where I sit, it sounds like there were many
misunderstandings and high emotions and things that we all regret. In fact, the only person in
this room who hasn’t done anything wrong is Prudence.”
“Oh please don’t bring me into this,” she muttered. There were some awkward chuckles at
this.
“You’re right,” said Hermione. “I would rather we just move forward from it. I miss your
family, Mrs. Weasley. I miss the Burrow. I can accept your apology, and hopefully you can
accept mine for ruining the wedding. I truly didn’t mean for it to be so last minute. But if we
can both move on, then I would like for us to be able to do that. I just need to know that you
will accept Draco too and won’t try to exclude him or bring up old rivalries. We’re married
now, and I… quite like it.”
She turned crimson at this, and Draco’s heart flipped. He saw Molly’s eyes widen a little,
but then she swallowed hard and nodded.
“Yes, of course. Your husband is certainly welcome.”
Hermione let out an exhale of relief. “Thank you. I’ll be honest, we may not be around for
Sunday lunch all that often. Things have changed a lot in the last few months. I have finally
reconciled with my parents, so I have been seeing them most Sundays instead. But at some
point I’d like to drop by again.”
Molly’s eyes softened a bit. “You reconnected with your parents?”
Hermione glanced at Draco. “Yes. Draco, he… well, he and Harry went to them without me
just before Christmas and told them everything. Then he surprised me on Christmas day by
bringing them to Malfoy Manor for dinner. I thought Lucius was going to have a cow.”
All three Weasley’s lips twitched at this, and Draco gave a small chuckle. Then to Draco’s
great surprise Molly turned to him and said, “Then you’re welcome at the Burrow at any
time, Draco. It would be wonderful to finally put these hurt feelings behind us.”
She rose, and Ron and Prudence did too.
Hermione hesitated for a split second but then approached Mrs. Weasley and gave her a
tentative hug. Molly, however, was not having it, and she pulled her in close.
“We’ll start anew, dear. Let’s just pretend the last year was a nightmare, and we’ve all woken
up, yes?”
Hermione huffed a laugh. “I’ll say.”
With that she pulled away and then Draco found himself rather unexpectedly pressed against
her ample bosom too.
“Thank you for bringing her parents around,” she whispered. “I know they missed her, and
she missed them.”
Draco blinked in surprise, but just nodded as he was released. He saw Hermione giving Ron
a rather awkward side-hug, and then she pulled Prudence in for what seemed to be the most
comfortable embrace out of the three.
After they said their farewells, Hermione sank back down into the armchair.
“Well?” said Draco. “How are you feeling?”
“Drained. Relieved. It’s a bit like that time we visited Ron in Azkaban, I suppose. I’ve seen
him once with Harry since he got out, but it was awkward. This is going to be awkward too
for a while. I don’t think I’ll ever be as close to Molly as I once was, but then again… I don’t
have to be. I can visit the other Weasley’s and Prudence without having to spend a lot of time
with either one of them until I’m ready. The Burrow is always crammed full of so many
people that it won’t be difficult. I’m just glad we aren’t fighting anymore.”
“You didn’t tell them about Little Star,” pointed out Draco.
Hermione shook her head a bit pensively. “No. I probably will at some point, but… not yet.
I need at least a little time to process this before I do.”
Draco rose and pulled her to her feet.
“I’m proud of you, darling.”
“Oh?”
“You’re forgiving, but you also held out for an apology first.”
“You think I struck the right balance then?”
Draco shrugged. “I’ve told you before it doesn’t matter what I think. It only matters that you
do the right thing for you. I think you’re figuring that out, that’s all.”
She sighed. “Well I have to admit, when I imagine some girl breaking Little Star’s heart in
twenty years…”
“Don’t even suggest such a thing,” said Draco airily. “He’s going to be the heartbreaker.”
“But if it did happen…” insisted Hermione.
“Then I’d probably set the family peacocks on her,” admitted Draco.
Hermione gave a tired chuckle, and he put a finger under her chin to tilt her face up to him.
“I love you, darling. I’m glad you have come to some sort of resolution with them, truly.”
“Me too,” she said. “It’s a bit sad the relationship may not ever be what it once was, but I
think I’m okay with that. I can live with being cordial and a little distant.”
Draco smiled. “Good. And now let me give you some news that I’m sure will cheer you
up.”
Hermione raised her eyebrows expectantly.
“Maribelle Marchbanks is a go.”
Hermione’s smile was blinding, and Draco’s heart skipped a beat again.
The Weasley’s didn’t matter, though Draco was pleased that there had been some resolution
on that front. No, it was Draco who had made his wife happy today — Draco and the work
he was putting into the Wizengamot to give her to the world she envisioned.
“Thank you Draco,” she said, as she flung her arms around him. “You’re my best boy.”
Chapter 25: The Name Game.
24 April 2004
Draco and Hermione landed with thud, and Draco stumbled to keep his wife upright.
“Oomph,” he gasped. “Sorry. Are you okay? Is Little Star…”
“We’re fine,” said Hermione, as she straightened up and pulled a shawl around her shoulders
a little tighter. “Oh,” she breathed.
Draco looked around too, and a small smile crossed his face. They had landed on the
balcony of Blaise’s villa, having been given very precise coordinates by his friend. It was
late afternoon, and it was starting to cool down for the evening, though it was still much
warmer than the place they had just left.
The sun sparkled off of the turquoise water of the Mediterranean. Just as Draco remembered,
this villa had a spectacular view.
“Blaise really doesn’t come here in the spring and summer?” asked Hermione in amazement,
as she looked around.
Draco shook his head. “No. He claims he doesn’t like tourists. It’s very quiet in January and
February.”
“It shouldn’t be that busy yet,” said Hermione.
Draco shook his head. “No, I agree with you. It becomes mobbed in the summer, but this
time of year is perfect. Warm enough to enjoy it, but not yet summer with hoards of school
children.”
“Good,” said Hermione. “I’m trying to get away from the hoards of school children.”
Draco just raised an eyebrow, and she smiled a little. “Alright, fine. I’ll admit they’re
growing on me. But a few days off is still very welcome.”
“Then let me show you the villa, and then we can head into town.”
Hermione nodded agreeably to this, and Draco picked up both of their bags before unlocking
the patio door and flinging it open.
Hermione inhaled, and Draco grinned. It had been years since he had been here, but it was
just as he remembered. The interior had a painted tile floor, with an elaborate mosaic border
that Draco knew ran through the entire villa. The walls were whitewashed to display the
frescos on the ceiling and the interior columns. The entire rear of the villa was fitted with
windows to look out over the sea. It was stunning, peaceful, and so very private.
“Blaise sent his elf to prepare it for us, but we won’t be seeing him. It’s just us for the next
few days.”
“I can’t believe he has this… it’s just wonderful!”
Draco frowned. “The Manor is nicer.”
Hermione rolled her eyes. “No it’s not.”
Draco scoffed. “Of course it is. It has fifteen bedrooms. Blaise’s villa only has eight.”
“Blaise’s villa is in Positano with an unobstructed view of the Mediterranean. Sorry to
disappoint you, but he has you beat.”
Draco scowled a little, as Hermione laughed. He watched her glancing around as he led them
to the bedroom he was accustomed to using when he used to visit.
“What if I bought it from him?” he asked, as he observed her interest.
Hermione came to a halt in the middle of the hall and turned to look at him in confusion.
“Pardon?”
“This,” he said, gesturing around. “What if I bought it from Blaise? He only comes here
during the worst part of the year anyway.”
“But why?”
“Because you like it, and I like you.”
Hermione gave him an exasperated smile. “Be serious.”
“I am serious. Blaise could still come for his regular visits. But this could be our little
getaway.”
“There’s nothing about this place that’s little.”
“It’s smaller than the Manor.”
She huffed a laugh. “I suppose you have me there.”
“So what do you say?”
She just laughed again. “We’ve barely arrived. Let’s see how we like it before you plan to
buy it, hmm?”
Draco inclined his head, but mentally he was already thinking about what he could say to
convince Blaise to sell. The villa had been in Blaise’s family for a long time, but it was
vacant most of the year. Blaise had a love-hate relationship with it for that reason. He was
always complaining about the maintenance on it and the tourists that would flood the town
the moment it became warm. But Draco had always enjoyed it, and Hermione’s eyes shone
as soon as they landed on the balcony. If she liked this place as much as he thought she
would, then he would have another Project.
Draco led her near the end of the hall to the bedroom Draco thought of as his. The bedrooms
were all equivalently sized, except for the primary one, which had its own floor. Draco made
a mental note to take Hermione up there before the end of the trip so she could see it, but
Blaise had made Draco swear he wouldn’t shag Hermione on that bed because he did sleep
there on occasion. The room that had always been Draco’s was still very lush though, and it
had its own door out to the same large patio, but on the end which was near the pool.
Hermione gasped again when he led her inside.
“I didn’t know there was a pool!”
“The balcony curves a bit. You can’t see it from the place we landed, but yes there is. And
it’s charmed to be the perfect temperature year-round. Blaise turns it into an enormous hot
tub in the winter.”
Hermione bit her lip as she looked at it, and Draco tried not to groan.
“I didn’t bring a bathing costume.”
“Who says you need a bathing costume?”
She made an appalled sound as Draco dropped their bags and moved toward her to pull her
closer.
“I certainly wouldn’t mind taking a dip without one,” he murmured into her ear.
“But somebody might see,” she breathed.
“Privacy charms,” he said. “It’s just you and me darling. We can spend the next five days
naked if you wish.”
She slipped her arm around his neck and began to play with his hair. Draco sighed into her
touch.
“You’d like that, would you?”
“I’ll confess that it’s a recurring fantasy.”
“It seems a bit disrespectful to Blaise,” she pointed out.
“What Blaise doesn’t know won’t hurt him. I promised him I wouldn’t shag you on his bed.
I made no such promises about the pool.”
Hermione let out a low chuckle, and Draco pulled her to him to capture her lips. She let him
do it, and he spent several lovely minutes tasting her until she pulled back. He let her go
reluctantly.
“We aren’t spending five days naked in the villa,” she said, giving him a pointed look.
Draco sighed dramatically. “That’s a shame. It would have been time very well spent.”
“I’m not saying we won’t spend any time naked… but I would like to do some sightseeing. I
can already tell this part of the world is as beautiful as everyone says.”
“Very well,” said Draco, conceding defeat. “But we should spend some time naked each
day. As soon as Little Star is here, he’ll be interrupting our regular sexy time.”
“Sexy time?” asked Hermione in amusement.
“Of course, darling. You know – those times you have your wicked way with me, and I make
you come by putting my mouth on your–”
“Okay!” she said, as she started to laugh. “Fine! You win. We will make sure to be naked
each day in anticipation of limited sexy time in the near future.”
“I knew you would see reason. And the first stop is this pool.”

A Few Minutes Later
Draco didn’t coax. He didn’t cajole. He wasn’t Weasley. He wooed and seduced.
Occasionally he demanded in a sexy sort of way, but usually he let it be Hermione’s idea.
And Hermione really did want to explore that swimming pool more thoroughly. He could
tell. There was only one problem.
“I’ve never skinny dipped before.”
“There’s a first time for everything.”
“But skinny dipping while pregnant… ”
“Darling, the books all say that water is one of the best ways to relax. It takes the pressure
off your back and hips.”
Hermione’s baby bump was still quite petite, all things considered, but she had already
started complaining of joint pain. She finally conceded that a dip in the pool might be just
the thing, though she insisted on wrapping up in a towel first and then letting it drop just
before she slid in.
Draco, however, was on a mission to seduce his delicious little wife, so once he saw that she
was in the water, he strolled out gloriously naked as well.
“Draco, where is your towel?” she asked, but her eyes were huge and looking at his cock
while she said it.
Draco canted his head to study her.
She really wants to fuck you.
The family magic had grown quieter since Hermione’s pregnancy took hold, but it still spoke
to him now and then.
Draco couldn’t help the smirk that crossed his face as her eyes turned dark.
“Draco, anybody could see you,” she said, licking her lips a little and looking toward the next
door neighbors a bit worriedly.
Draco waved her off. “I already told you. There are privacy charms.”
And with that, Draco turned to survey the sea with his hands on his hips so that Hermione
could get a perfect profile view of his cock pointing straight toward it. He heard her choke.
He glanced back at her and flexed ever so slightly. The choking noise turned into a little
groan.
“See something you like, darling?”
“My God,” she breathed. “You’re incorrigible.”
“I’ll make you a deal. Float on your back for a moment so I can see those pretty tits, and
then I’ll join you. You can give me my punishment for being so naughty.”
Her jaw dropped, but then a look of determination lit her face as she slowly allowed herself
to fall back into the water.
Draco looked down at her and marveled at the curls forming a halo around her face and the
rivulets trailing down her breasts and small bump. She was beautiful like this as the sun
began to grow lower in the sky. He couldn’t help himself. He dropped his hand to his cock
and started to pump. Hermione turned crimson when she noticed, but said nothing and let
him look for a long moment.
“You’re like some divine water nymph,” he finally commented.
“I thought I was a fertility goddess,” she quipped, running a hand across her bump.
“Mmmm, that too. Perhaps you’re a nymph in heat. Surely they must reproduce. Because
right now you look extraordinary. Fecund, ripe, lush, round, filled, fructious, fruitful, preg–”
“Yes, thank you,” she said, cutting him off with a laugh. “Now are you getting in the bloody
pool or not?”
“That depends on your immediate plans.”
“I plan to shag you and possibly spank you on Blaise’s behalf for talking me into sexy time in
his swimming pool.”
Draco needed no further invitation, and he silently congratulated himself at being a true
master of seduction. It was her idea now, and he immediately slid into the pool and pulled
her to him. In no time at all she was pushing him against the wall and sliding down on top of
his cock, taking full control as she rode him.
She did not spank him, to Draco’s slight disappointment, because the logistics of doing such
a thing underwater turned out to be a bit challenging, but he would privately rate the rest of
their sexy time a ten out of ten.
“We can spank each other in bed later,” she purred into his ear, while Draco’s eyes rolled
back at her words.
Their sexy time in the pool led to sexy time in the bedroom, and they never did get to explore
Positano that day. But Draco had no complaints. Their babymoon was off to a cracking start.

27 April 2004
Positano had always been beautiful, but it wasn’t until Draco was looking at it through the
eyes of his wife that he developed a real appreciation for the place. The last few times he had
been here his occlumency haze had been so thick he scarcely noticed the difference between
Italy and England.
It was absurd, but it was true.
Whereas Wiltshire was largely rolling pastures with small towns dotted throughout and the
occasional larger city with old English charm, the Amalfi coast was entirely different. The
houses were mostly white, with the occasional brightly-colored building scattered here and
there. They were all very close together and built into the side of the surrounding mountains
to give spectacular views over the water. The streets were steep, and in Positano everything
led to the beach and small harbor at the base of the town, where the sea kissed the edge of the
sand. The neighboring towns were similar, though of course each one had something about it
that made it unique.
They had been in Italy for three full days and had run themselves ragged between all the
sightseeing and extended interludes for sex. Draco was slightly sunburned, exhausted, and he
had never been happier.
Hermione, naturally, was a walking encyclopedia, and she side-along apparated Draco along
the coast, while she kept up a constant stream of chatter about the places they were visiting.
They had spent anywhere from a few minutes to a few hours in most of the little towns, from
Ravello to Praiano to Amalfi itself. Hermione had seemed thoroughly charmed by the shops
and cafes, and Draco had been thoroughly charmed by his wife. It was a perfect place to
escape for a few days, lost among the cobblestone streets and restaurants with fresh seafood,
which Hermione had been craving recently.
Their last day would be spent entirely on a boat, at Draco’s suggestion. He insisted
Hermione needed to see the coast from the water and not just from land. They had an early
evening portkey back, and he thought a long half-day at sea would be the perfect way to end
their trip.
Technically this was their final evening there, so Draco had arranged dinner at a small, but
delicious restaurant that was tucked away in the small wizarding section of Positano. Their
drinks had just been poured when Draco cleared his throat.
“Darling, there’s something we should discuss.”
Hermione looked at him cautiously. “What is it?”
Draco took a deep breath and pulled the list from his pocket. He had been working on this
for weeks, but had not found a good opportunity to talk to her about it yet. The last night of
their babymoon seemed fitting.
“Names for Little Star,” he said, presenting the list to her with a bit of a flourish.
Hermione relaxed a little, and her caution turned to amusement as she accepted the list and
began to scan it.
“We each have an unlimited number of vetoes,” he said. “That seems only fair to me. But to
make this easier I put together a list of names I would consider, with asterisks next to my
favorites.”
She stifled a laugh as she began to read it.
“What’s so funny?” he asked, with a frown.
“Just looking at the names that start with A… you’ve put an asterisk next to ‘Aldhibah,’
‘Alrakis,’ ‘Alruba,’ ‘Alsafi’, ‘Altais,’ and ‘Athebyne,’” she said.
“Yes, because they’re fantastic,” he insisted.
“Nobody will ever pronounce them correctly,” she pointed out.
“Of course they will. You just did!”
“That’s because I was very good at astronomy.”
“You were good at everything, darling,” said Draco cordially, hoping to butter her up.
“Draco,” she said, just shaking her head and looking amused.
“What? They’re good names!”
“You only like them because they are all part of the Draco constellation.”
Damn. He should have known she would see right through him. She had received top marks
in that subject, after all.
“Well he’s my son, isn’t he?” asked Draco a little grumpily.
“It’s a bit narcissistic.”
“No, it’s my mother who is named after Narcissus,” he countered. “This is a subtle, but
poignant connection between father and son.”
“Look, if we are going to use anything from Draco it should be ‘Eltanin.’ That’s the brightest
star.”
“Yes, and if you turn to the E’s you will see I put three asterisks by that name,” said Draco
eagerly. “Eltanin Malfoy. It rolls off the tongue. It’s regal, unique, and pronounceable.”
“I would almost have to insist on his middle name being ‘John’ then,” she said. To Draco’s
slight consternation she was actually giggling.
“Eltanin John?” he asked. “Why?”
“Nothing to worry about, Draco,” she said, still laughing as she reached across the table to
pat his hand. “It’s a muggle thing. We can make a point to watch The Lion King when we
get home, and I’ll explain it to you then.”
Draco wasn’t sure what she was on about, but he sensed that 'Eltanin' was on the verge of
being vetoed.
“Could we put it on the list of potential middle names then?” he asked, hoping to find a
compromise. “The Malfoys have always used the father’s first name as the son’s middle
name, but there aren’t many names that sound good with Draco. Maybe we could use one of
the Draco stars for it instead.”
Hermione paused and turned serious. “I’ll consider it,” she said. “‘Leo Eltanin Malfoy’ does
sound better than ‘Leo Draco Malfoy,’ I’ll grant you that. ‘Leo’ and ‘Draco’ are too similar.”
“I’ve vetoed ‘Leo,’” pointed out Draco.
“Yes, I know you think you’ve vetoed it,” said Hermione blithely, as she reached out to pat
his hand. “But I’m sure you will come around again.”
“Hermione, would you please just look at other names?”
She sighed and looked down the page.
“Most of these are off the table.”
“And why is that?” asked Draco a bit sourly. He had spent ages on this list.
“Because they’re difficult to pronounce! I know I’m giving you a hard time about Leo, but at
least nobody will mess that up!”
“Why are you going on about that?”
“Because I have a name that is consistently mispronounced. ‘Hermy.’ ‘Hermo-ninny.’
‘Hermy-one.’ I was called everything except ‘Hermione’ growing up.”
Draco frowned. “Nobody ever mispronounced my name,” he said.
“No, because there are only two possibilities: the right way and ‘Drack-oh.’ But you had
tutors who were all being paid to know which one was correct.”
“So will he.”
“He will also have muggle peers and teachers. Don’t put him through that, Draco, please.”
Draco sighed, his dreams of naming the baby 'Dziban' or 'Edasich' melting away.
“Fine. Tell me some names you could tolerate then, other than ‘Leo.’”
“I like ‘Atlas,’” she said. “I also like ‘Archer,’ though it’s not on your list.”
“Archer?” he asked.
“Yes, like Saggitarius. It doesn’t have to be a literal star or constellation name to honor the
tradition. It could be a reference.”
“Alright…” said Draco slowly.
“I also don’t mind ‘Callisto,’ ‘Cosmo,’ or ‘Cyrus…’” she said, now looking further down the
list. “I actually love ‘Caelum,’ but that might be mispronounced too frequently. Perhaps I
should field test it with some muggles…”
Draco felt some tension leave him. At least there were a few names she liked. He wouldn’t
have to agree to Leo.
“Alright then. I won’t push for ‘Giasaur.’”
She shot him an amused look. “No. I’m sorry, Draco, but every star in your constellation is
vetoed except for possible middle name usage of ‘Eltanin’ or ‘Thuban.’ Then again, I have
some reservations about those too. Finding a first name that fits with Draco would be much
nicer.”
Draco’s heart lifted at this a little. “You really don’t mind ‘Draco’ as a middle name then?”
he asked.
He had barely admitted to himself that he was afraid she would dislike the Malfoy naming
tradition, so he had tried to find alternatives he could live with. She was already honoring the
Blacks, and it seemed like too much to hope that she would be willing to follow the Malfoys
too. There would be no Granger traditions at all if she agreed to it.
She softened. “No, I don’t mind. My family doesn’t have naming traditions like yours does.
I always assumed Little Star’s middle name would be ‘Draco.’”
Draco’s face split into a broad grin. “Alright then,” he said, pulling the list back to him. “In
that case, let me strike ‘Fafnir’ and ‘Taiyi’ from this list for you, darling. They’re both part
of the Draco constellation too, but they’re my least favorite.”

After Dinner That Night
“I love it here,” said Hermione happily, as she dug her bare feet into the sand. They had
finished their dinner and were now walking along the beach. They hadn’t decided on a name
just yet, but Draco was feeling increasingly optimistic that they would find something that
worked with 'Draco' as a middle name. He loved calling their baby 'Little Star,' but he
thought that settling on an actual name would make it seem even more real. Then again, they
were in no rush. He had made his opening suggestions, and now Hermione had taken his list
and tucked it into a pocket in her dress to consider more closely on her own time.
The sun was beginning to set, and the temperature was dropping, but Hermione seemed
undeterred. She had just pulled her shawl out again and wrapped it around herself while
slipping off her shoes. Draco had reached for them and was carrying them in one hand while
holding Hermione’s hand with the other. His own shoes were getting sand in them, but he
didn’t care.
He thought this night was perfect.
“I love it because you’re here,” he said simply.
He glanced at her and saw her cheeks turning pink, but she looked pleased. The wind blew a
curl in her face, and Draco released her hand for a moment to tuck it behind her ear.
“You do know that, don’t you? I’m afraid I’m a bit smitten.”
She gave him a shy smile. “Yes, you are rather.”
Draco huffed a laugh and shrugged. “I can’t seem to help myself.”
“Well your smittenness seems to be rubbing off a bit.”
“Smittenness?”
“Hush, I’m entitled to make up words now and then.”
Draco flashed her a grin and then tugged on her hand to continue their slow walk. “You’re
entitled to do anything you wish, darling.”
She came to a halt again, and Draco looked back at her in confusion. She was frowning a
little and was studying him closely.
“What is it?” he asked.
“It’s just… you always do what I want.”
Draco inclined his head. It was true, or at least he hoped it was true. It was certainly what he
tried to do.
“And?”
“And shouldn’t we do things that you want now and then?”
“We could always name the baby ‘Eltanin,’” he quipped.
She just frowned harder at this, and the smile slid off of Draco’s face when she didn’t
respond.
Draco narrowed his eyes a little and approached her again. She seemed a little perturbed –
maybe even worried. Draco tucked her chin under his hand and tilted her face up. It glowed
in the setting sun.
“Hermione, the only thing I want is you and Little Star. Whatever that needs to look like so
you’re happy too, I can manage. Whether it’s being in Italy with you or watching movies
with you or changing nappies in a few months… that’s all I want. I have everything I want
right now, so I’m content.”
He wouldn’t tell her that his greatest fear was that their marriage might be dissolved, and she
would never return to him. Despite Draco’s and Lucius’s best efforts with the MLPP, a
strong majority of the Wizengamot members seemed to favor annulment instead of divorce.
It made Draco ill every time he thought about it, and it was something he had to actively
occlude. He knew they might not be successful in insisting upon divorce, but he kept telling
himself he would cross that bridge when he came to it. There was still a chance.
Hermione’s face softened. “It seems so simple when you put it that way.”
“That’s because it is. I know our path getting to this point hasn’t been easy, and the
circumstances that brought us together certainly weren’t ideal. But we are here now, and
well…”
Draco dropped his hand and placed it on the small swell of her stomach.
“How could I possibly ask for more than this?”
His words seemed to make Hermione emotional, because she gave a great sniff and then
moved into his arms, kissing him firmly. He indulged himself with his wife’s mouth, the
lingering sharpness of the lemon gelato she had eaten for dessert still on her tongue.
When she pulled back, she looked at him so seriously that Draco’s heart seemed to skip.
“I’ve never been the type of person who was content to just be. I always had to be on top. I
had to help Harry save the world. I had to join a think tank and fight for elf rights and go to
prison because of the sodding MLPP. Then I had to marry you before I was fully ready to do
it. I’ve never allowed myself to be happy with what I have.”
Draco’s skipping heart began to sink for a moment, until she started to speak again.
“But I think…” she added slowly, “Well, I think I may have missed a critical life lesson
somewhere along the way. Do you know why my mother and grandmother keep telling me I
won’t do better than you?”
Draco shook his head.
“It’s not because it’s one of those things you hear in polite company when talking about
social rank and marriages of convenience. Nothing about our marriage was convenient at all
– I’ve actually thought of it as a marriage of inconvenience given all the things we went
through and all the people who hurt us to get here. But they still keep telling me I won’t do
better because they know I've reached the peak. Whether our marriage was inconvenient or
not, there is nobody better for me. I am on top already. They’re trying to tell me that it’s
okay for me to be content with what I have, even though it’s in my nature to always look for
something more.”
“Can you be content?” he whispered, and his heart began to thud.
He needed her to be content. Merlin, but he needed it more than almost anything.
She nodded slowly. “I think so, but it’s strange for me. It’s just very out of character for me
to decide that I’m content. I’ve always run myself ragged pushing for more. I’m relentless,
and I can’t think of a single thing I’ve done or relationship I’ve maintained where I’ve looked
at it after the fact and thought, ‘that was good enough.’ That’s really what I’ve been doing
these past few months, you know: I’ve tried to learn how to stop looking for more when it
comes to a husband. Because Draco… I’ve looked.”
A flash of jealousy hit him so hard he was nearly breathless.
“I’ve looked for years, and I haven’t found anybody who can hold a candle to you. It’s not
even close,” she added.
His jealousy fizzled in an instant, and his stomach unclenched.
“It’s okay to let yourself be happy, Hermione,” he said simply. “I know there are billions of
people on the planet. There might be some other bloke out there who is better for you or who
would cherish you like I do, without all of the shitty baggage from school and the war. But
sometimes I think that baggage is the thing that made us finally see each other clearly.
You’re right that our marriage was very inconvenient, but I wouldn’t have had it any other
way because coming together like this helped me see your strength, and I hope it showed you
my remorse. And now we’re married and expecting our first child while standing on a beach
at sunset on the fucking Amalfi coast. I would accept a thousand more inconveniences if
that’s what it took to bring you back here in five years or ten, preferably with more than one
child in tow.”
She looked almost stricken, but Draco made himself keep going. She needed to hear this.
“I’m not perfect, darling – far from it. But even if I’m not the most perfect man in the world,
I’m yours. And I like to think that you're my witch, even when you’re cross or exasperated
with me. I’m not at all interested in holding out for somebody better, because I don’t think I
would ever find her. Even if I did find somebody who was better on paper, she still wouldn’t
be you. She wouldn’t be the girl who slapped me in third year or the teenager who helped
Potter take down the Dark Lord or the woman who went to prison to avoid marrying me or
the mother of my child. There is only one witch who has done all of those things, and that’s
you.”
“Draco…” she breathed. There was a tear rolling down her cheek, and Draco swiped it away
with his thumb and fell silent as he let her absorb the things he had just said.
She exhaled, and for a moment Draco thought she was about to collapse. She leaned into
him, and he sensed something draining out of her. He hoped it was all of her fight, her
indecision, her concerns that she might find somebody better one day.
“You’re right,” she whispered. “My perfect man is still imperfect, but I think that’s okay. I
want the man who challenged me academically. I need the man who was put into an
impossible position and allowed it to change him for the better. I crave the man who visited
me in prison and who made me feel beautiful in my own body and adopted Crookshanks to
get on my good side. I want the man I desire so much that I became reckless with my birth
control and accidentally conceived a child with him.”
Draco’s heart was thudding out of his chest.
“You have him,” he said simply. “Hermione, darling, you have every part of him, and if you
can just accept it… He will never ever let you go.”
She seemed to sway a little, and Draco pulled her closer. Her tiny bump pressed against his
own stomach, and Draco dropped his forehead to meet hers.
“Hermione,” he said, no pleaded. Because Draco was ready to plead. He had told himself he
wasn’t a man who would coax or cajole or beg. He had been proud of his restraint and hadn’t
done something like this since he was trying to convince her to marry him in the first place.
But now? Right now he was willing to fucking beg if he had to because she could give him
this. She even wanted to, he was certain of it.
“Draco,” she whispered. In the setting sun he caught another glint of a tear, but he didn’t
wipe this one away. He leaned down to kiss it instead.
“Be content, Hermione. Let yourself have this. Let me have this. Be my wife, be a mother
to our child, let me spoil you and him so much that you’re always cross with me. Then in a
couple years let’s do it all over again so he has a sibling or even two or three. Let’s make
traditions and memories and mark milestones together. And while we’re doing this, live at
the Manor with me and tell Crookshanks to keep my father on his toes. Boss me around in
bed and tie me up. Then do it in public and tell those bastards on the Wizengamot that you
have me whipped, because you absolutely do. Fuck the MLPP and just do life with me,
Hermione. Say that it’s enough for you, please darling.”
“It’s enough,” she said.
It slipped out, barely a whisper, but Draco heard it, and his blood roared. It was the thing he
needed to hear from her; the moment when he could finally let his own fears start to recede.
There would still be more to do to build their relationship of course. They had only been
married a few months, and they hadn’t even been on speaking terms a year ago. But she was
going to let herself fall for him, really fall for him. He could be enough for her, and once the
MLPP was gone, Draco thought she would choose to stay.
“It’s enough for me too,” he said simply. “You will always be enough, darling."
Chapter 26: Transitions of Power.
15 May 2004.
Hermione was seventeen weeks and a few days pregnant, and Draco thought she had never
been more beautiful. She could still hide her bump under billowing robes or floaty dresses,
but her normal muggle wear – jeans, t-shirts, and the like – now showed it off to perfection.
Hermione had been very careful to always wear robes in public, and even most of her
students were still unaware of her pregnancy. Draco wondered if she would be able to finish
the school year before it became widely known.
Little Star was now the size of a pomegranate, according to Hermione. Draco wasn’t certain
how she always seemed to know these things, but he didn’t second guess it. Comparing their
baby to various types of fruit was remarkably helpful in orienting himself, if a little odd.
Today was an unusual Saturday because Hermione had been asked to chaperone the last
Hogsmeade visit of the year. Draco had wrinkled his nose at this when she told him earlier in
the week, but eventually they decided to make a day out of it, and his mood improved
dramatically.
“I only have to be in the village during a certain window of time. There’s no real patrol
route.”
Hermione had been lucky to get the first shift, so she was responsible for getting the students
out of the castle, and then she would be in the village through lunch. She left before Draco
did, and when it came time to meet her, Draco found himself oddly excited about it. Perhaps
it was because they rarely allowed themselves to be seen in wizarding public together since
they both despised the press. Or maybe it was because Draco had never taken her on a date
to Hogsmeade while they were in school, which was one of those quintessential wizarding
experiences. Regardless of the reason, Draco was feeling remarkably upbeat as he made his
way to the end of the lane in order to apparate.
A few seconds later, he found himself staring up at the Hogshead, in precisely the same spot
where he had vomited all over Hermione months earlier. He shook his head in amazement as
he considered just how much had changed since then.
“Draco!” called a familiar voice.
Draco spun around to find Hermione hurrying toward him, her robes billowing as she
beamed.
Draco’s breath caught as he smiled down at her and pulled her in for a brief kiss.
“Ready for our date then?” she asked. She seemed very eager, almost a little nervous, though
her eyes were twinkling.
Draco canted his head to study her. “I’m always ready to spend time with you. But you have
an odd expression on your face… do you have something in mind?”
“Well…” she said slowly, before looking longingly at something over Draco’s shoulder.
He turned around to find himself face to face with a new boutique that had a window filled
with frilly fabrics in white, soft pink, and the lightest blue.
“Ah,” he said, a smile creeping on his face. “You want to shop for Little Star?”
Hermione bit her bottom lip, and Draco tried not to groan. She nodded, but seemed a bit
hesitant.
“What is it, darling?”
“Well, nobody really knows yet… just our families and closest friends.”
Draco pulled her in for a deeper kiss and let his hand drift down to her belly. “They’re all
going to find out soon enough,” he murmured before another cry broke them apart.
“Draco!”
Draco pulled back a little in confusion. Hermione was looking a bit dazed as she shook her
head to clear it before focusing on the voice.
It was Beatrice Greengrass. And she was there with Astoria, who was looking very pale
indeed. Both of their eyes were glued to Draco's hand, which was still on Hermione’s
stomach.
“Sod it all,” breathed Hermione.
Draco cleared his throat and removed his hand. “Beatrice. Astoria,” he said in a cold voice.
Their eyes had still not left Hermione’s abdomen, which was now fully covered by her robes.
“Is she pregnant?” demanded Beatrice.
Draco glanced at Hermione, whose face had gone pale. She gave him a look that clearly said,
This is your ex-fiancée. You need to handle it.
“I cannot fathom why you think that should be any business of yours,” said Draco.
Astoria’s frown deepened while Beatrice started to splutter. “She’s a mud–”
“She is my wife,” snarled Draco. “And I suggest you keep that fact in the forefront of your
mind whenever you speak to either one of us.”
Beatrice huffed, and her eyes narrowed. “Our social groups will never accept any child of
hers!”
Draco felt Hermione tense next to him, but the absurdity of this statement bubbled over, and
he just started to laugh. And once he started, he could scarcely stop.
By the time his laughter finally died out, all three witches were looking at him like he had
lost his mind.
“I know,” he gasped. “I know, it’s just… you think either one of us gives a single fuck about
your social group?”
And then he dissolved into laughter again, and he saw Hermione start to smile a little out of
the corner of his eye. Astoria assumed a pained look as though she wished to be anywhere
else, and Beatrice began to splutter again.
Draco wiped tears of mirth from his eyes as he finally straightened up and looked at them
both, still chuckling.
“Beatrice, do us all a favor and kindly fuck off. Astoria, please, for the love of Merlin, get
away from your mother. You’re never going to find a husband if she’s the one looking for
you.”
Beatrice’s jaw dropped, and Astoria’s mouth tightened, though Draco knew her well enough
to see that she privately agreed with him.
“Now then, we must be going. There has been a lot of happy news in the Nott, Potter, and
Malfoy households recently.”
Draco pulled Hermione close to him again and gave her a deep kiss before brushing her belly
one last time. She was breathless and staring at him with shining eyes as he pulled away and
then tugged on her hand to head to the baby store.
The last thing he heard was Beatrice ranting, before Astoria cut her off with a, “Honestly,
Mother, he’s right!”
Draco snorted with laughter before turning to Hermione, who was looking at him with
amusement.
“Well the cat’s out of the bag now, I suppose.”
He stepped forward and tucked a lock of hair behind one ear. “It’s true, darling. But look on
the bright side. We can save ourselves the trouble of making a formal announcement.
Beatrice and Astoria will handle it for us. Besides, now you can shop to your heart’s content,
and there is no need to hide the bags.”
Hermione relaxed into a smile. “Fair enough. I’ll owl the Weasley’s and Minerva when we
get home so they hear it from me first. They’re the only ones I care about who still don’t
know. But you’re right. I'm far enough along that everyone is going to find out soon.”
“Excellent,” he said. “Now what are we shopping for today?”
Hermione’s eyes softened as she looked around at the tiny booties and knit caps.
“A layette,” she declared. “And look, I even printed off a list so we wouldn’t forget
anything. Let’s start with the newborn sizes.”
Draco’s heart fluttered as she started holding up the tiniest baby outfits he had ever seen.
“Get all of them, darling. Nothing but the best for our Little Star.”

17 May 2004
Malfoy Heir on the Way!
by Rita Skeeter
The rumors are true! Lord Draco Malfoy’s wife, Hermione Granger – also known as Lady
Malfoy – is expecting! This reporter caught wind of a rumor a few days ago from none other
than Lord Malfoy’s former beau, Astoria Greengrass.
“My mother and I ran into Lord and Lady Malfoy in Hogsmeade and saw them kissing in
public while Lord Malfoy brushed her stomach. They were outside Bitty Baby Boutique and
clearly ready to begin shopping for their new arrival. I will confess, it was shocking,
especially after all of the nasty things Lady Malfoy has written about her husband.”
I immediately took steps to confirm the rumors and reached out to the Malfoy family
personally. They released the following joint statement:
“It is true we are expecting a son in October. Like many couples, our marriage has had its
ups and downs, and those have been exacerbated by the MLPP. However, we are thrilled to
be welcoming our little boy in the next few months and have made a conscious effort to
resolve our differences in order to parent him the way he deserves. We appreciate your good
wishes and ask for privacy for our growing family during this time.”
The news is no doubt shocking to many readers of The Daily Prophet, especially in light of
the rumors that the MLPP may be on its last leg.
“We’ve been talking about overturning it, yes,” said Lord Selwyn, one of the MLPP’s biggest
champions. “We have received enough pushback from the public to be reexamining our
position, but of course nothing about that is certain.”
If the rumors are true, then this reporter is shocked that Lady Malfoy allowed herself to get
into the family way, given that she has become something of an authority on all the legal
ways to prevent pregnancies under the MLPP. This reporter reached out to Lady Malfoy to
ask her if any of the legal methods she has been writing about for months failed.
“No, Draco and I did not experience a failure with one of the legal prevention methods. In
our case, our son’s conception had nothing at all to do with the MLPP, other than the fact
that Draco and I were paired through the law and reconnected because of it. All along I have
been advocating for a witch’s right to choose when they start a family and with whom. In my
case, I chose my son and my husband, as we have finally found common ground with each
other. I wish every witch had the same opportunities that I did.”
When asked if she still supported a repeal of the MLPP, Lady Malfoy answered in the
affirmative.
“I have always been against the MLPP, and my pregnancy does not change that at all. I
think many of the witches who have become pregnant because of this law would agree that
it’s possible to love our children but still find the MLPP to be a blatant overstepping and
interference by the government.”
Maribelle Marchbanks folded The Daily Prophet and lowered it as she stared over her
reading glasses at Draco and Lucius.
“Well congratulations are obviously in order,” she said. “And I must say I was impressed
with your wife’s handling of that Skeeter woman. She’s always been a nuisance.”
Draco inclined his head. “Thank you, Madam Marchbanks.”
“How are you faring with the Greengrasses?” she asked.
Draco waved her off. “They are interfering, nothing more. It was true they caught us
shopping for Little Star in Hogsmeade. We knew it was inevitable that the news would come
out.”
“Little Star?” she asked curiously.
Draco turned a faint pink, but one glance at his father assured him Madam Marchbanks
would find the story charming.
“We haven’t picked a name yet, but the tradition in my mother’s family is to name children
for the stars. That’s what we’ve taken to calling him while we consider our options.”
“Oh that’s lovely,” she said approvingly. “And I’m glad to hear your wife is willing to follow
your traditions in that matter.”
Draco inclined his head.
“I have always been a proponent of muggleborn rights, you know,” she added, “but there is
no question that it requires compromise from both sides to bring a muggleborn into a family
such as yours.”
“I am already learning that raising a child with another person requires a great deal of
compromise in any event,” said Draco smoothly. “My wife is willing to give him a
traditional wizarding education, and I am willing to place him in muggle schools for his other
core subjects. We have both had to adjust our thinking to accommodate the other, but I like
to believe it means our marriage will survive the end of the MLPP.”
Madam Marchbanks got a knowing glint in her eye.
“Oh yes, Lucius and I have had a few discussions about overturning the MLPP. It was a truly
appalling law, you know.”
“Indeed,” chimed Lucius, who was studiously glossing over the fact that he was the one who
championed the MLPP in the first place. “And in fact, that is why we are here, Madam
Marchbanks.”
She inclined her head to prompt him to continue.
“You know we’ve discussed Minister Shacklebolt’s views about all of this. Unfortunately,
the man has become entrenched and absolutely refuses to see reason. He will not bring a
resolution to repeal the MLPP to the floor of the Wizengamot, but we know that you would.”
A small smile crossed her face. “Of course I would. In fact, it would be a pleasure to do so.”
Draco and Lucius glanced at each other and both started to smile slowly. In that moment
Draco found himself a bit startled by their similarities. He had always looked very much like
his father, but their resemblance was utterly striking as their smiles mirrored one another.
“In that case,” said Lucius, “as one of the leaders of the conservative bloc, I would like to
propose that we put forward a vote of no confidence. I am certain it will pass. And then we
would like you, Madam Marchbanks, to step in as our new Minister of Magic.”
Draco held his breath as he watched Madam Marchbanks process the news that this was
really happening.
“If you think you have the votes for it, then I would be honored to accept. Being the Minister
of Magic is something I have dreamed about for a long time, and my first order of business
will be repealing the MLPP. And Lord Malfoy,” she added, now looking directly at Draco
with a small smile on her face.
“Yes, Madam Marchbanks?”
“Please tell your wife I said ‘thank you.’ I strongly suspect she is the reason I find myself in
this position.”
Draco flashed a grin. “Of course. I’ll admit the idea was hers, but you’re the one who did
the work to get the others on board.”
Madame Marchbanks exhaled and straightened. “Very well, then. When can we expect the
vote of no confidence?”
“Friday,” said Lucius. “We will do it on Friday.”

21 May 2004
It was Friday.
Draco and Hermione woke up at nearly the same time, an odd sort of eagerness suspended
between them. They exchanged anticipatory looks and then readied themselves for their
respective days, knowing that they would be seeing each other soon.
The weather outside was blustery. Something about it felt appropriate for the thing that was
coming.
The terms of the Ministers of Magic in Wizarding Britain tended to fall in one of two camps:
very long or surprisingly short. Rufus Scrimgeour, for example, was murdered a year after
taking office – and then there was Pius Thickness who didn’t even last that long. But when
Wizarding Britain was at peace, Ministers of Magic tended to linger. In fact, there had only
been five Ministers of Magic in Draco’s lifetime, and that included the war years. There
were no term limits or elections, per se. Rather, they were selected by the Wizengamot,
which had both hereditary and elected seats. There was some accountability to the public
that way, but in practice it meant that Ministers of Magic could get away with quite a lot
before the Wizengamot felt they had no choice but to act and remove support for the
incumbent Minister.
That, of course, was why Cornelius Fudge was able to blatantly dismiss Voldemort’s second
rise. It was also why Shacklebolt introduced the MLPP. Neither one believed they would
pay for it politically, because when they were making their decisions the Wizengamot opted
to put its head in the sand about public perception.
But all good things have to come to an end eventually, even popularity within the governing
body that elected the Minister in the first place.
A savvy Minister of Magic knew this, surely. History taught Draco that very few Ministers
ever resigned or retired at the height of their power. And why would they? Why not cling to
the thing that made them the greatest man – and the very occasional woman – in Britain? He
supposed it was a bit like elite quidditch players – they never quit the game while they were
ahead. Inevitably they kept playing even past their peak, until they had been traded so often
their shine had worn off.
Draco thought it was senseless to cling to the title that used to make one great or to truly
believe that popularity could be resurrected once a good name was lost. Draco knew firsthand just how difficult that could be. While the Malfoy name would always command
respect in some circles, he knew there would always be whispers about his Death Eater days
too. The things he did while wearing that mask could never be undone, despite the fact that
he had been a teenager while it was happening. But even though Draco knew it was stupid to
believe he would ever be fully forgiven, he still held out an unrealistic hope that someday the
world at large would see him as more than a Death Eater. Similarly, Kingsley Shacklebolt
seemed to believe that the MLPP would just blow over if given enough time. Perhaps it was
optimism or maybe it was just foolishness. Whatever it was, it seemed inherent in the human
condition to always hope, even when all the evidence suggested that such hope was futile.
And curiously, it seemed that those who finally fell rarely saw it coming.
Draco, for one, was certain that Kingsley Shacklebolt would not see it coming. Draco had
run into the man in the halls of the Ministry of Magic the previous day, and Kingsley had
greeted him as though they were old colleagues.
“I hear Lucius is training you to take his seat soon! That’s good news, my boy. New blood
on the Wizengamot is always welcome.”
Draco wondered for a split second if Kingsley was really that good of an actor. But he
dismissed the thought almost as soon as he had it. Lucius had sworn the conservative bloc to
secrecy so that no whisper of the thing that would be happening that day reached
Shacklebolt’s ears. And miracle of miracles, despite the fact that rumors spread through
wizarding society like wildfire, evidently some secrets could be kept. Draco supposed this
should not surprise him. Lucius had kept secrets before. The fact that Malfoy Manor had
been Voldemort’s headquarters had been kept secret for nearly two years, after all. A few
months to ensure that the ousting of the Minister of Magic went smoothly was nothing
compared to a secret like that.
Besides, who really wanted to break that news? Even Shacklebolt’s staunchest opposition
wouldn’t relish that sort of awkwardness.
And so, as Draco and Hermione prepared for their day, with Draco giving Hermione a
lingering kiss and a brush on her abdomen for Little Star, he knew they were both thinking
the same thing: this was historic.
How odd was it to have a day like this, when one knew that history was about to be made? In
the past, Draco had only realized he was part of history being made after the fact: when he
watched Dumbledore actually die; when he saw Potter pull off his invisibility cloak to defeat
the Dark Lord; even when his name was called with Hermione’s during the MLPP Matching
Ceremony. All of those things managed to surprise him in the moment, and it was only after
they were done that he recognized something truly monumental had just occurred. They
were the moments that built through a lifetime – the things one never forgot.
But today, he and Hermione both knew that there would be a turning point for Wizarding
Britain before either one of them entered the Ministry of Magic. It was both exhilarating and
very odd.
“I’ll see you soon, darling,” he said, as he watched her floo to Hogwarts. And Draco knew it
was true: Hermione had arranged another field trip, this time with all of the seventh year
students.
“It’s a historic day. I want them to see it,” she said simply.
The students, of course, did not know why ‘Professor G’ was taking them to the Ministry of
Magic that day. But every single one of them signed up for her field trip, given that the
alternative was revision for their N.E.W.T.s.
Draco took a deep breath as he looked at himself in the mirror. Technically he was a visitor
today because Lucius still held the family seat. It was good, he thought. He would be able to
sit with Hermione in the viewing gallery.
Ensuring that he was presentable and professional, he made a point to school his face.
Kingsley Shacklebolt couldn’t do anything about what was coming today, but Draco still
didn’t want to be the one to tip him off. He strode out of his room and made his way to his
father’s study, where he saw Lucius in the traditional Wizengamot robes.
“Ready?” asked Lucius.
Draco nodded, feeling oddly jittery. Lucius just gave him a small smile when he noticed his
son’s expression.
“It’s strange, isn’t it?”
Yes, that was a perfect word for it. Strange.
Draco inclined his head in agreement, and soon they were floo’ing to the Ministry of Magic
together.
“Hang out in the lobby,” said Lucius quietly. “Visitors are allowed in only thirty minutes
before the session begins.”
“That works. I’m meeting Hermione and her students anyway,” said Draco.
Lucius nodded, and then they split: Lucius to do a last-minute check to ensure they had the
votes they needed, and Draco to the fountain in the lobby to wait for Hermione.
The minutes ticked by, and Draco watched as several more members of the Wizengamot
arrived in their plum-colored robes. A few nodded at Draco knowingly and others looked at
him with some curiosity. He knew that not all of them were aware of what was to come, but
they didn’t have to be. As long as they had the votes they needed Lucius had always
preferred to keep things on a need-to-know basis.
Before long the floo turned green, and his wife stepped out, brushing her robes off smartly, as
she led a group of seventh year students behind her.
“Draco!” she said, waving toward him. Draco approached and pulled her in for a light kiss,
before turning to the students and nodding at a few of them he recognized.
“Ready then?” she asked. “We will all have to go through security first.”
Draco and the students nodded, as Hermione led them to a guard station, where their wands
were collected for holding. Once everyone had turned in their wands, she launched into a
lecture about the Wizengamot, the functions of it and its history, and he was pleased to see
that most of the students were listening intently. He supposed it was because they were all
adults now, staring down their futures after Hogwarts in just a few short weeks, and Hogwarts
really didn’t offer a class that focused on things like their government.
“I intend to make this field trip an annual event for the seventh years,” said Hermione, with a
twinkle. “However, I think this inaugural trip will be rather memorable for you all…
emphasis on the word, inaugural.”
Draco smirked as the students exchanged curious looks with each other, but Hermione
refused to say anything more.
Soon they were heading into the same room where Hermione and Draco had been matched.
Today, it was partitioned so the Wizengamot members were in the lower seats, closer to the
front, and guests were behind them in the upper seats of the gallery.
Draco nodded to several members he knew, and he threw a wink at Theo who was drinking
yet more coffee and looking enormously sleep-deprived. In the corner of the room were a
few aurors, including Potter, and it was oddly comforting to see him there. Draco knew the
aurors were providing security to the Wizengamot members, but he suspected that Potter
would prioritize Hermione’s safety over that of anybody else in the room.
Before long they all took their seats, and then Kingsley Shacklebolt strode in to open the
session.
It took him a full thirty seconds to notice Hermione in the viewing gallery, and as soon as he
did his eyes narrowed.
Draco glanced sideways at her and saw her give him a satisfied little wave that made
Shacklebolt’s face turn ashen.
He cleared his throat and made an effort to ignore her as he opened the session.
They moved through normal business: updates on muggle-wizard relations, anticipated
enrollment at Hogwarts for the next school year, and a conflict with the goblins that was
being resolved. All of it was routine, and Draco could tell that Shacklebolt was growing
more comfortable as the session moved on.
And then he opened the floor for comments and motions, as was customary.
Theo raised his hand, and Shacklebolt frowned a little. Theo was very new and had never
said a word up to this point. He glanced at Hermione for a moment before calling on him.
“The Minister of Magic acknowledges Lord Nott and gives him the floor.”
“Thank you, Minister,” said Theo. “I would like to present a motion from the conservative
bloc for a vote of no confidence in the Minister of Magic.”
There was a split second of shocked silence, and then the press, which was in its own section
of the visitor’s gallery, erupted with cameras flashing and quills scratching.
“I second the motion,” called Lucius.
Shacklebolt was frozen with shock.
“But… but…” he stuttered.
“Procedurally, you must call the vote, Minister,” added Lucius, with a sneer.
“But surely there must be a debate or –” he started, and Lucius rolled his eyes.
“No. Debate is not required unless Lord Nott requests it. He did not make that request.”
“But nobody said –”
“We are not obligated to inform you,” said Lucius coldly. “Lord Nott presented the motion,
and I seconded it. All we have to do is vote.”
Draco moved his hand to cover Hermione’s, and he felt her grip his hand hard, her nails
digging into his skin ever so slightly. He glanced around at the students, who all seemed
utterly spellbound by what was happening. He knew that they must realize they were
witnessing history too.
Shacklebolt swallowed hard. “Very… very well,” he said haltingly. “Those in favor of Lord
Nott’s motion?”
Draco wondered if the man was about to faint as more than two-thirds of the conservative
bloc and nearly every member of the liberal bloc raised their hands.
And just like that, his reign as Minister of Magic was over.
It was oddly anticlimactic, until his eyes fell on Hermione again, and his face twisted with
loathing.
“This was all because of you,” he spat.
Hermione stood now, and though it was very out of turn for a spectator to comment, nobody
seemed inclined to stop her.
“No, Kingsley. This was because of you. If you hadn’t supported the MLPP so blindly the
public never would have demanded this. I am only one person, and I’m a professor now. I’m
no longer a lobbyist. I certainly didn’t convince the Wizengamot to do this on my own. But
the decision is the right one. Somebody needs to be held responsible for the worst law passed
by your administration, and as Minister of Magic that falls on you.”
Draco saw Kingsley’s wand hand twitch, and in an instant he was disarmed, and Potter was
striding forward.
“Kingsley,” he said. “It’s time for you to leave.”
“You knew!” he said, turning on Potter.
He just shook his head. “No. I didn’t. But you are a civilian now, which means you are a
spectator. You know that spectators are not allowed wands in Wizengamot sessions. Please,
let’s go before the press makes this any worse.”
Draco sensed Shacklebolt deflate slightly, though he still threw a look toward Hermione that
was pure poison as he allowed himself to be escorted away. As they reached the door, Potter
looked back and nodded once to Draco, which he interpreted to mean, I’ll keep an eye on
him.
Draco exhaled and turned to find Hermione lowering herself into her seat, a broad smile
slowly blooming on her face.
“Brilliant,” she murmured.
Draco smiled too, and then he turned his attention back to the front. It was certainly irregular
for the Minister of Magic to be ousted, but procedurally it meant that the most senior member
of the Wizengamot became the presiding officer until a new Minister was elected.
It just so happened that this individual was Lord Selwyn.
The man is older than dirt, though Draco a bit uncharitably. Lord Selwyn was a true pain in
Draco’s arse, constantly complaining about how young everyone around him was. Then
again, he was on board with the plan, and that would make the next thing even smoother.
He approached the front and took the seat that had just been vacated by Shacklebolt before
clearing his throat.
“Now then,” he said in a scratchy voice. “I understand that we need to elect a new Minister.
As the conservative bloc has a majority, it shall put forth a candidate for consideration by this
chamber.”
At this, Lucius rose, and Lord Selwyn nodded to him.
“Lord Wiltshire, you may have the floor.”
“Thank you, Lord Selwyn,” he said, sounding much warmer now that Shacklebolt was gone.
“We would like to put forth a candidate who has united this chamber in the past. This
individual has the respect of the public and has assured me that she will champion a repeal of
the MLPP.”
At the word ‘she,’ there were some murmurings, and more than one shrewd look was thrown
Hermione’s way. Draco heard her snort lightly in amusement.
“I’m far too young,” she whispered.
“You won’t be forever,” Draco whispered back.
She shot him a knowing look, and he smiled a little. It wouldn’t surprise him at all if
Hermione became Minister of Magic one day, or was at least in the pool of potential
candidates. Still, he knew she was right: she was in her mid-twenties. War hero she may be,
but the Wizengamot probably would not consider her to be a serious contender for Minister
until her mid-forties at the very earliest.
Think about all the things she will be able to accomplish in the next twenty years.
One thing was certain: if she was ever in the running for it, she would certainly have Draco’s
full support.
Lucius let the titters die down before continuing. “I would like to present a motion for
Maribelle Marchbanks to be instated as Minister of Magic.”
“Seconded,” said Lord Fawley.
The whispers were almost deafening now, as those who had not been made aware of this
seemed to be sizing her up. Lord Selwyn banged his gavel several times until there was
silence.
“Very well,” he said. “All in favor of Madam Maribelle Marchbanks being named Minister
of Magic, raise your hands!”
Hands began to rise through the chamber, and Draco held his breath as he did a quick count.
It was not as overwhelming as Shacklebolt’s ousting, that was certain. But as he surveyed the
room, he found himself exhaling with relief as he saw that they had the majority with ten
votes to spare.
Hermione gave a suppressed squeal and clutched his hand again, and Draco broke out into a
broad smile as Lord Selwyn banged his gavel and made the announcement.
“Very well. Then Madam Marchbanks, if you could please rise and join me at the front.”
Maribelle Marchbanks rose, her head held high, a glint of triumph in her eye as she made her
way forward.
Lord Selwyn reached out and clasped her hand in congratulations. The press was blinding as
cameras went off to capture the moment.
“The official inauguration will be scheduled soon,” said Lord Selwyn. “And in the
meantime, you are the acting Interim Minister of Magic. I turn this chamber back over to
you.”
“Thank you, Lord Selwyn,” she said, as she accepted the gavel and took her place. Draco
knew she was excited, but he was struck by her composure as she lowered herself into the
chair.
“Now then, as acting Interim Minister of Magic, I will open the floor to any other business.”
Draco was sure there was nothing else to say, but to his surprise Lucius rose again.
“Interim Minister,” he said, “I have one more piece of business.”
“Very well. Lord Wiltshire may have the floor.”
Lucius straightened up, and then to Draco’s surprise he turned to the gallery and sent a small
smile to Draco. “It is time I resign my seat. My son Draco will be submitting the paperwork
to take over the seat from me in the coming weeks.”
There was shocked silence at this, none more so than Draco. He knew, of course, that this
was his father’s plan all along. Draco had even agreed to it. But now? Already?
Madam Marchbanks gave Lucius a piercing look, but he just shrugged. “It will take a few
weeks to make the transition effective. Please consider this my official notice of pending
resignation so that the Malfoy seat doesn’t go dormant during the transition.”
Madam Marchbanks inclined her head. “Very well. Your notice has been received, Lord
Wiltshire. Please let me know if there is anything I can do to assist with the transition.”
Lucius inclined his head gratefully and lowered himself again. Draco turned to find
Hermione watching him with a small smile. Draco opened his mouth, but nothing came out.
He closed it again and just shook his head a little to clear it.
The session wrapped up soon after that, but Draco was glued to his seat as his father turned
and approached. He barely felt Hermione lean in to give him a kiss on the cheek before
ushering her students off to give them both some privacy.
It was only when Lucius was right in front of him that Draco finally found his voice.
“Already?”
Lucius smiled a little. “It will take some time, Draco. And I will still be helping with the
inauguration and the MLPP repeal.”
Draco swallowed hard and nodded. “Alright. I just thought you would wait until the MLPP
was gone. Maybe this autumn or–”
He cut himself off as Lucius was shaking his head.
“No, Draco. Now is the perfect time.”
“Why?” asked Draco. He wasn’t sure why he was feeling so emotional. Perhaps it was
because he was about to take up the Malfoy mantle. Or maybe it was the satisfaction he had
sensed from Hermione. Or it could have been the look of pride on Lucius’s face as he
surveyed his son. Whatever it was, the question came out in a small voice. He felt like a
boy, asking his father a question that was only for his ears.
Lucius heard it, and he placed a hand on Draco’s shoulder, just as he used to do when Draco
came to him with problems as a child.
“Because, son… when it’s time to repeal the MLPP, I want you to be able to cast the Malfoy
vote.”
Yes, it was a historic day, indeed. Draco knew he would never forget it.
Chapter 27: Dr. Cocky Cock Cox.
2 June 2004.
Hermione was twenty weeks pregnant.
“I’m halfway done!” she exclaimed.
“And where are you on the terrified to excited scale now?” asked Draco curiously.
“Oh, at least fifty-fifty. Seems fitting, yes?”
“I would say so. And what do we have this week?”
“A sweet potato.”
“Merlin.”
It was shocking. Something about pregnancy seemed to both take forever and move along
very quickly all at the same time. It didn’t make sense. Draco was very impatient to meet
their son, but then again, the speed at which he was growing absolutely baffled him.
And some part of him wished he could freeze Hermione in time just like this. She had the
most perfect baby bump he could imagine: visible, adorable, but not yet so large it impeded
her mobility to any great degree. She was starting to complain of back pain a little more
often, but it wasn’t yet debilitating. They were in the middle of the pregnancy and also in the
middle of that golden second trimester. Soon, he knew, her discomfort would return in full
force and probably get progressively worse until the end.
At least, that’s what the books all said.
Draco’s own excitement was well beyond fifty percent, especially today. Because today he
would get to see the baby again, and Hermione assured him that this time he would look like
a real baby and not a blob.
It was the anatomy scan. Draco had read about it of course, and he was both nervous and
thrilled. Hermione’s parents would be there for it, and even his parents had asked to come
too. Narcissa hadn’t really surprised him by making the request because she had gone
positively mad ever since learning Hermione was pregnant; but hearing Lucius say that he
wanted to join too made Draco gape, before he grew rather concerned.
“You can’t wear robes, Father.”
“Obviously, Draco.”
“During the last scan I wore a suit, but I may have been overdressed. Jeans are probably
more appropriate.”
“I do not own jeans, nor will I ever own jeans,” insisted Lucius.
“Chinos then.”
“Draco…”
“You know what? Nevermind. I’ll coordinate with Patsy to make sure you are dressed
appropriately.”
Draco was sure the Statute of Secrecy was about to be blown into smithereens by the
presence of his parents, but then again, how could he deny his father a request like this,
especially when Hermione was in favor of it?
“It’s wonderful, Draco,” she had told him. “It shows a lot growth. I’m not at all inclined to
stop him from coming, and isn’t it good for us to do a bit of a dry run at the hospital before
the birth? He won’t be in the room with us, but I imagine he and your mother will be in the
waiting room.”
“I doubt it,” he snorted. “Mother may be there, but no Malfoy has ever seen his wife give
birth. I’m pretty sure my father just waited at the Manor for news when I was born.”
Hermione just stared at him, and then her expression turned stoney. “Do not think, even for a
moment, that you will be excused from the birth of our son.”
Draco’s eyes widened as he sensed the threat coming from his wife.
“No! No, of course not, darling, I would never… I’m simply saying that my father…”
“Well maybe he’s mellowing out in his old age, because evidently he wants to come to the
scan. That’s far more intimate than a hospital waiting room.”
Draco knew she was right, and perhaps her guess that Lucius was mellowing out was correct
as well. In any event, Draco soon found himself waiting with both of his parents and his
inlaws in the same muggle waiting room as their last scan. Lucius was still a bit frosty
toward the Grangers, but Narcissa had warmed up considerably. And to Draco’s great relief,
Lucius had consented to wear muggle slacks and a tailored oxford shirt. His hair was causing
more curious looks from the muggles than his outfit.
“Sorry I’m late!” came Hermione, as she strode in. “I had to give out a last minute detention,
and I got delayed.”
Draco was relieved to see that her students were not with her this time.
“It’s no problem, dear,” said Helen. “We are just excited to be here!”
Hermione gave her mother a swift smile before checking in. They waited another thirty
minutes or so before her name was called.
“Hermione Granger!”
Hermione, Draco, and all four grandparents rose to follow. The excitement was palpable,
though Lucius’s was more muted than the other three. As they walked into the small room
with the enormous camera and screen, he looked at it askance.
“We usually only allow–” started the same muggle woman Draco recognized from their
previous visit.
“Confundus,” said Hermione, pointing her wand to the woman.
“Merlin, here we go again,” muttered Draco.
But to his enormous relief, this time only a single confundus was required before they started,
as the muggle did not try to make Hermione fully disrobe.
“Let’s just see that belly, love, and then we’ll take a look at the baby!” she said kindly.
Lucius cleared his throat a bit uncomfortably as Hermione’s midriff was exposed. She,
however, just rolled her eyes at his prudishness and settled back on the makeshift bed while
the muggle woman squirted the same clear jelly on Hermione’s stomach.
“Here we go…” said David Granger excitedly, as everyone’s eyes turned to the screen in
front of them. The muggle pulled out the same wand and smeared the jelly around with it
and then…
“Circe, Merlin, and Morgana!” exclaimed Lucius.
“Shhh!” hissed Hermione as she was forced to confund the muggle again. “Just say ‘Oh my
God,’ Lucius, honestly!”
Draco was sure Lucius would have had a snarky response to her, if he hadn’t been so
transfixed by what he was seeing on the screen.
“But that’s a baby,” he pointed out, gesturing to the screen.
Hermione rolled her eyes, but he saw an amused smile flit across her face as she fell silent.
They all stared at the screen and saw something that was very obviously a baby suddenly
stretch for a moment before curling back into the fetal position.
Hermione gasped, just as the muggle woman said, “There’s our baby Malfoy!”
“What?” asked Draco, turning toward Hermione worriedly. “What is it, darling?”
“It’s just… I felt it! When he stretched!”
“Well of course,” said the muggle. “You must have been feeling the baby for awhile? You
don’t have an anterior placenta.”
Hermione blinked, and everyone looked at her for confirmation.
“Well… I thought perhaps… but it’s been rather faint, and I thought maybe I was imagining
things. I kept reading it felt like butterflies, and mine hasn’t felt like that. It’s a bit ticklish.
Sort of like a muscle spasm. Or perhaps drinking something fizzy. But just now… that felt
like a tiny kick!”
The muggle woman nodded knowingly. “Yes, baby’s quite active. Look!”
Hermione swallowed hard, and Draco reached out to grip her hand as they all looked back at
the screen again. He almost looked to be dancing as he tried to roll over.
“It’s just… wow,” said Hermione. She sounded a little breathless.
As for Draco, he was in disbelief. This was no blob. There was a real baby with legs and
arms and…
“Oh look, baby is sucking its thumb,” said the muggle woman with a smile in her voice.
“Merlin…” breathed Draco. “Err… I mean, oh my God?” he corrected himself as he saw
Hermione’s expression.
“This is unbelievable,” said Narcissa, who was watching with wide eyes.
Hermione smiled a little, and Draco thought he heard Helen sniff as the muggle got to work.
“Alright, let’s take some measurements, shall we?” said the muggle.
She started clicking buttons, and the wizards watched in fascination as she measured his head
and his legs and body length.
“Is this accurate?” asked Lucius. Draco could hear both skepticism and amazement in his
voice.
“Oh yes, fairly accurate,” she said. “Obviously there’s a bit of user error based on where I
start and end the measurements, but it’s accurate within a few millimeters.”
“Mer – my God,” said Lucius, swiftly correcting himself. Hermione nodded a little with
satisfaction.
“Now then, would you like to know the sex?” asked the muggle.
Everyone in the room exchanged looks.
“We’re quite sure it’s a boy,” said Hermione, though Draco could hear some hesitation in her
voice.
Wait. Why was she hesitating? It’s obviously a boy. The family magic guarantees it.
Then again, hadn’t everything about his marriage to Hermione been unconventional? Not
that Draco would object to a girl at all – no, after meeting Cami he was quite keen to have a
girl someday. But he wasn’t precisely certain just how many times Hermione would be
willing to do this with him, and he needed a boy for the title at some point.
Draco promised himself in that moment that he would add Little Star’s blood to the wards
very soon after he was born. Waiting at least two or three years was tradition in his family.
Historically, most generations ensured the heir survived common childhood illnesses or else
produced a little brother as a back-up plan first before breaking the magic.
But no, Draco was quite keen to break that spell as soon as he could. Perhaps their birth
control would fail again, and then he could have a girl too. Or maybe Hermione would be
game to try again someday.
“It would be wonderful if you could confirm our suspicions for us,” said Draco smoothly.
The muggle gave him a small smile.
“It does seem like parents often guess correctly. Of course there’s always a fifty-fifty chance,
but it’s uncanny how often those feelings seem to get it right.”
She moved the wand around on Hermione’s stomach a little more and narrowed her eyes.
“We need baby to turn for us. Ms. Granger, if you could roll on your side please? I’m going
to poke the baby a bit.”
Draco exchanged slightly alarmed looks with his parents, but Hermione didn’t seem to find
this unusual at all. She turned to the side, and then the muggle began to massage her stomach
a bit. Little Star started to kick and move.
“Oh dear, he doesn’t like being disturbed, does he?” asked Helen in amusement.
Draco found his nerves easing, and he chuckled a bit.
“Stubborn little thing…” commented the muggle. “Come on, baby… let us see…”
“He takes after his mother,” said David, and Draco heard Hermione huff in irritation as the
others laughed.
“One more time…” muttered the muggle, “...and there!”
Sure enough, Little Star finally turned over, spread his legs wide open, and gave them a
frontal view.
“Gracious,” muttered Narcissa.
“Definitely a boy,” said the muggle, with a small laugh in her voice. “You see? There’s his
equipment.”
She pointed to what was obviously a tiny penis on the screen. Draco felt an odd blend of
amusement and pride as he stared at it.
“It’s rather large for his overall size,” commented the muggle, and unconsciously Draco felt
his chest swelling.
“He takes after me too, then,” he said.
The words just slipped out, and Hermione clapped a hand over her mouth as she started to
giggle, while Narcissa made an offended sound. His inlaws gave him slightly pained looks.
“Sorry, mother,” he muttered.
The muggle took a few more measurements of Little Star’s body and then said, “Now let’s
check your cervix.”
Lucius cleared his throat uncomfortably, but again Hermione just rolled her eyes as the
muggle started measuring some other part of Hermione’s body and then froze.
“Huh…” she said.
Hermione snapped to attention.
“What is it? What’s wrong?”
The muggle glanced at her and then assumed a professional mask, which made Draco’s pulse
tick up.
“The doctor will talk to you about it. I’m just a technician.”
Draco’s stomach inexplicably knotted.
“But–” started Hermione.
“Nothing to worry about,” said the muggle. “I’m just making notes of measurements, that’s
all. Now then, would you like to hear his heartbeat?”
This had the effect of diverting the grandparents, but Hermione and Draco exchanged slightly
worried looks.
“I’ll ask,” she whispered. “My appointment is right after this. You can come too if you
want.”
Draco nodded firmly. He did want to. Up to this point Hermione had taken most of her
appointments alone, but if there was something wrong he wanted to hear about it first-hand.
He tried to push the anxiety away and focus on the muggle as she turned to the screen and
flipped a switch.
Thump, thump, thump, thump, thump…
Draco exhaled and glanced at his parents’ amazed faces for a moment before he closed his
eyes and focused on the sound.
Thump, thump, thump, thump, thump…
Little Star was fine. He was moving, dancing, and his heart was beating at a similar pace as
last time.
“I can hardly believe this.”
Draco opened his eyes and glanced to his left. The words came from his father.
If this doesn’t soften him toward muggles, then nothing will.
But Draco could see Lucius coming around to the muggle way of doing things before his
very eyes. Seeing the baby, measuring the baby, listening to the baby’s heartbeat…
Hermione assured him that witches and wizards never experienced this at St. Mungo’s.
“Believe it, Lucius,” said Hermione, with a small smile on her face. “That’s your grandson.”

30 Minutes Later
Hermione was jiggling her foot nervously. She had changed into a medical gown and was
sitting on the edge of an examination table waiting for the doctor.
“I don’t know what could be wrong,” she kept saying. “Everything looked normal to me, and
you know I’ve researched this extensively…”
Of course she had. Hermione could probably pass a muggle obstetrics exam based on the
amount of research she had done.
Draco was seated in a chair next to her that was far too small, as he tried not to let his nerves
get to him. He had just seen Little Star, after all, and everything looked perfect to his
admittedly untrained eye.
“When will the doctor get here?” he asked under his breath.
“Soon,” she assured him. “Dr. Cox is usually on time, but of course if he has to a deliver a
baby then things go off schedule.”
Draco just nodded and swallowed hard, trying to control his own nerves.
Dr. Cox bustled in a few minutes later, and all of Draco's thoughts were completely derailed
by the shockingly attractive man who must have been in his mid-to-late thirties. He had dark,
piercing eyes, a chiseled jaw, and his chocolate skin seemed to glow. He was wearing those
same blue pajamas that seemed so prevalent in muggle medicine and a white coat. When he
saw Hermione, he smiled, and Draco noticed deep dimples and perfectly straight teeth that
were almost blindingly white. As he spoke his voice was a rich, soothing baritone.
“Hermione,” he almost crooned. “How are you doing today?”
Oh fuck no.
This Dr. Cox was far more attractive than Draco was. Draco was quite accustomed to sizing
up other, attractive men and coming out on top comparatively speaking, but now… well, Dr.
Cox looked like a smoother, suaver, more mature and put together version of Blaise, if such a
thing were even possible. And not only that, but he was better educated, professional,
muggle, and they would be discussing…
“I’ve been feeling alright, but the ultrasound tech made some notes about my cervix, and now
I’m very concerned.”
She waved her hands a bit vaguely, and Dr. Cox hummed a little.
“Hmmm, yes, I see that she made a few notes for me. We’ll discuss your cervix in a
moment. Let me check you out first.”
Dr. Cox shot Draco a glance.
“I assume you’re Draco?” he asked in a voice that was probably perfectly pleasant, but which
Draco chose to interpret as dismissive and challenging.
“Yes, I’m her husband,” he emphasized.
Dr. Cox hummed again before placing his hands on Hermione’s stomach and beginning a
physical exam.
“Your pain is manageable?” he asked her. “And your nausea is still under control?”
“Yes sir.”
Fucking hell, she just called him ‘sir.’
Draco didn’t think he had ever been this jealous in his life, and that included the day Potter
joined the Gryffindor quidditch team as a first year.
“And your breasts? Still tender?”
Why. Just why.
“A bit… especially when Draco is a little rough.”
Draco tried not to choke as Dr. Cox shot him a disapproving look. “You’ll want to be
mindful of it. Many women experience breast pain on and off during their entire pregnancy,
even before their milk comes in after birth.”
“Right,” muttered Draco sullenly. So the man was cocky in addition to being ridiculously
attractive.
Yes, he was cocky. His cock was probably cocky too and cocked and eager to impale
Draco’s wife.
Draco suddenly realized he was checking out another man’s crotch for proof of such a
transgression before he wrenched his eyes away.
But before he did, he was sure he saw something suspicious.
Fuck it all. He was Dr. Cocky Cock Cox.
The doctor made a few more noises as he measured Hermione’s ‘fundal height,’ whatever the
fuck that was and declared her to be ‘absolutely perfect.’
Even if Draco agreed that Hermione was perfect, he didn’t care to hear Dr. Cocky Cock Cox
say so.
He was in a foul mood by the time they got to her cervix.
“Now your scans…” said Dr. Cocky Cock Cox, as he studied some papers and print-outs the
muggle woman must have given him.
“Yes?” asked Hermione anxiously. And even though Draco was ready to fire Dr. Cocky
Cock Cox for trying to seduce his wife – because Draco was certain that all of his throatclearing and humming and angling of that cocky cock toward Hermione was an attempt to do
precisely that – he tensed as he waited for the news.
“Your cervix is on the short side,” he said. Hermione opened her mouth to surely ask a
thousand questions, and Dr. Cocky Cock Cox interrupted her before she could begin.
That arrogant bastard.
“Not alarmingly short,” he added. “Just on the shorter range of normal. It’s still in the
normal range, however, but it’s right on the edge. We’ll keep an eye on it and give you a
transvaginal ultrasound at your next appointment to make sure nothing has changed.”
Hermione sank down, and Draco felt some of his tension ease, though he couldn’t help but
ask a very important question.
“What is a transvaginal ultrasound?”
Dr. Cocky Cock Cox glanced at Draco and gave him a dismissive look before turning back to
Hermione.
“It’s a wand with a camera in it. We insert it into the vagina to take closer pictures of internal
organs. It’s a bit more precise than a transabdominal ultrasound.”
Hermione just waved him off as though she already knew this, but Draco could only think of
one thing: Dr. Cocky Cock Cox was going to be responsible for putting a camera dildo into
his wife’s cunt and taking pictures of it.
What the actual fuck. If anybody is getting pictures of her cunt it should be me. Why couldn't
the family magic have been stricter to prevent any man from touching her forever? Why did
this part of it have to stop once she became pregnant?
But Hermione evidently wasn’t paying any attention to Draco’s internal monologue about
how grossly unfair and inappropriate this plan happened to be.
“So the baby’s alright?” Hermione asked.
Draco felt a shot of guilt for worrying about pictures of his wife’s cunt when she reminded
him of the baby.
Right. The baby. We’re worried about the baby. Not Dr. Cocky Cock Cox pulling out his
camera and–
“Yes, he’s fine. Like I said, just something to keep an eye on.”
“Do I need to be on bed rest or –”
Dr. Cocky Cock Cox shook his head. “No, it’s not that dire. I would say not to overtax
yourself, but that’s good advice for any pregnant woman. Light exercise is fine. Exhausting
yourself is not.”
“And sex? We can still have sex, can’t we?”
At this, Dr. Cocky Cock Cox gave Draco another glance, and Draco shot him a challenging
look back.
Yes, I still have sex with my wife, you wanker. Because she’s MY wife. MINE.
“Sex is still fine. I won’t put you on pelvic rest yet. Like I said, you don’t technically meet
the medical definition of a short cervix, it’s just on the very edge. If it begins to thin too
early, however, you’ll be on pelvic rest for the end of your pregnancy. We will keep checking
it periodically. For now though, sexual activities should be safe.”
Draco just knew that Dr. Cocky Cock Cox was going to put Hermione on pelvic rest at some
point simply to thwart Draco. He’d probably woo with her lectures about gestational
diabetes and Braxton Hicks contractions while citing medical texts to her. And then there
would be those cervical checks…
Because yes, Draco had finally read ahead in his books after Cami was born and knew what
was coming. This man would not be limiting himself to cameras. No, he would actually be
shoving his fingers up his wife’s cunt and fingering her in places Draco had never managed
to reach before with his own hands.
No. No, I’ll convince her to change doctors before then. Somebody old, preferably
geriatric. Bonus points if they are female.
The rest of the appointment went quickly, and soon Hermione was standing to thank the
doctor, her medical gown slipping off of her a little as she did it. She clutched it to keep it
from sliding off entirely and gave a breathy laugh of embarrassment before turning very pink.
Draco tried not to growl.
“Thank you,” she said, her eyes sparkling. Dr. Cocky Cock Cox gave her a twinkling smile
and then fucking winked at her as he left the room.
Draco was ignored.
Shocking.
“Well that’s a relief!” said Hermione, turning to Draco and smiling.
He forced his feelings about her doctor away as he pulled her to him and gave her a rather
lengthy kiss.
It wouldn’t hurt to remind her that he was the reason she was here in the first place, would it?
“I’m glad everything is alright.”
“Yes, Dr. Cox is excellent. He’ll keep an eye on me.”
Draco stilled.
“Darling, are there any other doctors you could see instead?”
She pulled back and gave him a perplexed look. “Why on earth would I do that? Dr. Cox is
wonderful. He keeps up with all the current medical literature, and he graduated top of his
class from Oxford.”
Of course he was at the top of his fucking class.
“He seems awfully friendly…” said Draco hesitantly.
To his consternation she just rolled her eyes as she began to dress. “Yes, because he has a
fantastic bedside manner. It’s critical in his specialty, you know – the poor man sees worried,
pregnant women all day long who are in pain and hormonal. He does a wonderful job
calming my anxiety. Truly, I couldn’t ask for anybody more capable than him.”
Fuck.
“I’m just surprised by how young he is. Surely someone older with more experience would
be preferable?”
Hermione shot him a scolding look as they started to make their way out of the room and
down the hall that was painted a odd shade of light teal.
“No, actually. Statistically speaking, mortality rates tend to go up when being treated by an
older doctor. It’s unclear why that happens – perhaps they are less versed in the newest
research or their fine motor skills may start to diminish as they age. I’m not certain. But I
feel safer with somebody Dr. Cox’s age. He’s old enough to have experience, but young
enough to still be on the cutting edge of medical research. Trust me, Draco, he’s perfect.”
Draco wrinkled his nose and tried not to groan, but he knew he wasn’t winning this one.
“Fine. I suppose you won’t be seeing him much after the baby is born in any event.”
“No, just for a check up after the first six weeks or so and then an annual visit. He’s been my
doctor for a long time. I don’t see myself switching any time soon.”
Draco was still mentally grumbling as they made their way out onto the street and toward an
alley they could use to apparate.
“I’m so glad Little Star is okay,” said Hermione, turning to him before they left. Draco felt
himself softening at this.
“Me too, darling. It was wonderful to see him today.”
She gave him a small smile and brushed a soft kiss on his lips.
“I couldn’t agree more. I’ll see you for dinner tonight. I have to go back to Hogwarts.”
Draco pulled her forward for one last kiss and place his hand on her stomach as he loved to
do.
“I’ll see you both tonight darling.”
The shy smile she gave him as she apparated away made Draco relax for the first time since
the scan.
Fuck you, Dr. Cocky Cock Cox. My wife is coming home to ME tonight.

5 June 2004
It took a few days for Draco to forget Dr. Cocky Cock Cox, and it finally took his birthday to
drive the man completely from Draco’s mind. It fell on a Saturday this year, which meant
very little to Draco who did not hold a traditional job, but it did mean that he was able to
spend the whole day in his wife’s company. Exams for the students would be starting the
following week, so classes were effectively over. There would be two more weeks of exams,
then a week of grading, and then Hogwarts would be dismissed for the summer.
Today, however, Hermione was all his. She had woken him up with a specialty breakfast and
insisted on having all of his friends over for lunch. The Potters came too, to Draco’s surprise,
as did Teddy and Andromeda. It was rather entertaining pulling out their old brooms and
racing around the gardens, while Teddy whooped below, though to Draco’s consternation
Potter still managed to beat him.
The afternoon faded into dinner, and it was growing a bit late when his friends finally wished
him one last happy birthday and bid him farewell. It was only then that he realized his wife
had disappeared at some point, and he looked around curiously.
“Mother, have you seen Hermione?” he asked.
Narcissa just gave him a curious look. “She said she was turning in early. She was feeling a
bit tired.”
“Oh. Alright.”
Draco tried not to let his disappointment show on his face. Not that he expected anything for
his birthday, and she had arranged a lovely social gathering with both of their friends
groups… but he couldn’t help the small pang that hit him before he shoved it away.
No. I had a great birthday. And she’s pregnant. Of course a day like this would exhaust her.
In fact, Draco was starting to feel a little tired too, so he made his excuses and began to make
his way toward their room, thinking that perhaps tomorrow he would truly have her all to
himself since it was Sunday. His birthday had been wonderful, but very social. Perhaps
tomorrow they could have a private celebration.
Every thought of this left his mind, however, as he pushed open the door and came to a
complete halt.
For a split second he didn’t recognize where he was. The walls behind the bed and on one
side of the room had been draped in white fabric. There were lights aiming toward the bed,
which no longer had the green quilt they used, but was also made up in all white. And then
he noticed his wife, sitting in one corner while wearing a robe, with her makeup dark and hair
unbound.
“Erm, Hermione?” he asked in confusion.
She stood and seemed to reach for something just out of Draco’s eyesight. She approached
him with her hands behind her back, and Draco sensed she was both nervous and determined.
“I thought you might want your birthday gift,” she said.
Draco glanced around at the room and had the oddest thought that it looked like a set.
“Alright…” he said slowly. “Can you tell me what it is?”
She hesitated for a moment, but then steeled herself and pulled the thing out from behind her
back and handed it to him.
It was a camera.
“You got me a camera?” he asked with a little confusion.
Not that he was opposed, but they had never once discussed it.
She gave him a small smile. “No. Not exactly. This is a camera, it’s true. But your birthday
gift is a photoshoot. Of me. You’ve been telling me for ages you want to freeze me while
I’m pregnant, and I thought you might really want to do it.”
His breath caught. “A maternity shoot?”
She turned a bit pink, but had a teasing smile on her face. “In a manner of speaking. Let me
show you how the camera works.”
She walked him through the few buttons he needed to know and the way the zoom and focus
worked.
“This one uses film, so we can develop it in the potion that makes the pictures move if you
want. Or they can be still like muggle pictures.”
Draco’s heart was inexplicably pounding.
“I’m surprised you want me to take them.” he said as she made her way over to the whitedraped section of the room.
“Oh?”
“I’m not a professional,” he pointed out.
Hermione shot him a smile. “We can have a professional take some too, if you want. But for
these… well I need you to take them.”
“And why’s that?” he asked cautiously.
“Because you’re the only one who is going to see me like this.”
And then to Draco’s shock she turned her back on him and let the robe fall to the floor, and
he realized she was wearing nothing but tiny knickers underneath.
Every bit of blood in his body rushed straight to his cock.
“Hermione…” he rasped.
She looked over her shoulder at him and gave him a determined look. “Yes, Draco?”
“Are you serious? I can really…”
He couldn’t even finish the sentence. His mouth was dry as he realized why he needed to be
the photographer.
“If you ever let another person see them, I will hex you into the next century. But yes,
Draco. You can have pictures of me like this so you don’t forget. Tell me how you want
me.”
Draco licked his lips and immediately raised the camera to his face to capture her little smile
over her shoulder to him.
“Bend over the bed for me,” he said. “Spread your legs and let me see it.”
She said nothing, but did precisely as he asked, and he took a couple more shots.
“Sit on the edge of the bed, turn to face me, legs open, and grab your tits.”
She positioned herself just as he said and then threw her head back while she gripped her
breasts.
“Fuck me…” he muttered behind the lens.
“You know what? I want you to make yourself come. Touch yourself. Do whatever you
need to do to get off, and I’m going to take a picture of every fucking moment.”
Determination lit her face, and then she began to pinch her own nipples as her hand crept
toward her knickers.
She didn’t take them off, but she placed her hand inside of them as she began to rub herself,
and it wasn’t long before she was moaning.
Draco was snapping pictures like his life depended on it. He couldn’t believe she was doing
this for him. He doubted she would ever agree to do it again. He wanted every gasp, every
tug, every twitch. Her breasts heaved, and her abdomen was filled with Draco’s son: that
perfect baby bump that was all because of him.
Draco gritted his teeth so he wouldn’t come in his pants like a preteen.
“Knickers off. I want to see your cunt bare,” he demanded, and then he held his breath to see
if she would really do it.
To his utter shock she grabbed her wand from the nightstand and just vanished them before
opening her legs again.
This was unbelievable. This was pornographic. This was…
“Dammit, Hermione, I don’t think I’ve ever been this hard in my life….” he said as he took a
few more. “Keep going. I want to see you come.”
To Draco’s surprise, Hermione was slower to get that point by herself than when he helped
her do it. But that just meant more pictures for him. And before too long she was climaxing,
and Draco was snapping pictures frantically, determined to capture every moment.
“Put your fingers in your mouth and suck them,” he said. “Eyes open and look at me when
you do it.”
Her hazel eyes opened as she she sucked off her fingers in a terribly inappropriate way. And
then she began to give him a few more poses to round out the experience.
Hermione in bed, on her side caressing her stomach.
Hermione on her knees for him, back arched.
Hermione on the edge of the bed with her legs crossed, pressing her tits toward him.
Over and over again she posed, and Draco snapped pictures, until he reached the very limit of
what he could tolerate.
“We’ve got it, I’m sure we’ve got it,” he said, as he tossed the camera aside a bit
unceremoniously and pulled her toward him. His hands immediately gripped her breasts and
arse.
“Fuck, darling… I can’t believe…”
She smiled a little as she leaned up to kiss him. “They’re for your eyes only, Draco. Nobody
else.”
“Not ever,” he said fervently. “I’ll keep them in the same drawer as the polyjuice and
condoms.”
“Good boy.”
“Fuck, don’t say that to me or I’ll come in my pants.”
Hermione just laughed, and pressed herself into him further.
“But you are… you’re my very good boy… and good boys get to choose. Do you want to
fuck me or do you want my mouth?”
Draco licked his lips as he considered this. “Can I have both? After you tie me up first?”
Again he held his breathe, not daring to believe his birthday was going to end like this.
Excitement lit her features, and she said nothing to him, but pushed him toward the bed.
Moments later his clothes had been vanished and he was bound as her tongue licked up his
shaft, and moments after that her lips closed around the tip as she began to suck him off.
Draco’s eyes rolled back in his head at the sensation. He was the luckiest bastard in the
world.
His very last thought before she lifted herself up and sank down onto his cock was of Dr.
Cocky Cock Cox.
Fuck you and your photographic dildo, you wanker. My pictures are a thousand times better
than yours.
Chapter 28: Dreams of Divorce.
15 June 2004.
Kingsley Shacklebolt was out of office, and Lucius was well on his way to transitioning the
Malfoy seat to Draco, though it would not become official for a couple more weeks. When
Theo had taken over the Nott hereditary seat, it had taken several months to push the
paperwork through. His father was dead, and the seat went dormant while waiting for a Nott
to claim it. Seats that were already held by a member of that family transitioned more
smoothly than seats that were dormant.
Curiously, quite a few hereditary seats had gone dormant over the last few hundred years.
When a seat remained dormant and unclaimed for fifty years, it was no longer hereditary and
moved into the pool for elected seats. The last seat that had converted this way previously
belonged to the Gaunts.
“The person who holds a hereditary seat has to bear the surname,” said Draco.
“I’m aware of that, and it’s ridiculous,” retorted Hermione.
“True. But it did give me an idea, darling…”
“And what is that?”
“Perhaps we should consider having a second child and give him or her the Black surname.
Eligibility is allowed to skip one generation.”
Hermione turned and gave him an incredulous look, as though Draco was joking.
“I’m not joking,” he clarified. “There’s a procedure for it. Theo mentioned they may do that
for the Parkinson seat, since Pansy is an only child, and there is nobody else to claim it after
her. Cami will get the Nott seat.”
Hermione narrowed her eyes and tilted her head to think about it. “Why not Teddy?”
Draco shrugged. “He wasn’t named a Black at birth. They lost the chance to do it. It’s the
name you are registered with at the Ministry of Magic when you are born that allows you to
qualify or not.”
“And that’s why there are no muggleborn seats except those that are elected,” pointed out
Hermione. “None of us are registered at birth, and we can’t marry into a hereditary seat.”
Draco inclined his head. “True.”
She wrinkled her nose. “I’d rather do away with hereditary seats entirely.”
Draco bit his lip. “I’m not disagreeing with you, but I don’t think we will ever have the
momentum to get that rule passed, at least not for a very long time. It’s been set up this way
since the Wizengamot was formed, and you would have to get a supermajority of the
Wizengamot to vote against their own interests for it. The Black seat will eventually
disappear entirely if we don’t have a second child and give him or her the Black surname.”
“Would that be the worst thing? Over time more and more of those hereditary seats will
disappear organically, especially for those purebloods who insist on marrying other
purebloods. Already nearly half of the seats are elected.”
“Yes, but I’d prefer the seats that disappear be those that are not influenced by us, darling.
Keeping the Malfoy and Black seats in the family – not to mention the Nott and Parkinson
seats in Theo’s family – can only be helpful for the things we try to accomplish in the future.”
Hermione sat back and considered this.
“I will think about it, Draco. The Black seat has been dormant since Sirius’s father died, so
we have twenty-five years before it becomes electable.”
“Yes, but keep in mind our child would have to claim it after they are an adult. So we need to
subtract seventeen years from that and another two years to be safe since you’re only twentytwo weeks with Little Star tomorrow, and our second child will also take nine months to
grow, and claiming a dormant seat takes longer than transitioning a filled seat. That only
gives us about six years to decide, darling.”
To Draco’s consternation, Hermione gave him an amused look and then reached up to pat his
cheek.
“You’ve obviously thought about this quite a bit.”
Draco inclined his head.
“I would point out that you don’t necessarily need me for it. Any child of yours could be
named Black and qualify.”
Draco frowned. “I don’t intend to have children with anybody else.”
Draco thought a pleased look crossed Hermione’s face, but she said nothing and just raised an
eyebrow.
“I mean it,” he insisted. “Setting aside the Black seat for now, I only need one child for the
title and Malfoy estate. You are giving him to me. I would rather the seat expire and become
electable than have children with some other woman.”
“But…” she prompted.
“But, if you were open to having another child with me, I’m simply pointing out that he or
she could have the opportunity to claim a Wizengamot seat too if we arrange things
appropriately in advance. And I’m certain any child of ours will have more progressive
viewpoints than others who have held that seat in the past, since you would be their mother.”
Hermione’s face seemed to soften a little. “Just how many children do you want, Draco?”
Draco bit his lip. “As many as you’ll give me.”
Hermione raised one eyebrow.
“I’m serious,” he added. “If you only want one, we will have one. If you want more than
that, we can have more than that. That can be your decision, darling. However many you
want, whenever you want, with the caveat that if you want at least one more then we should
make sure the age gap isn’t too large or else the Black family seat may expire before Extra
Little Star gets to claim it. But otherwise, that decision is all yours. I’m pretty sure there is
not a number that would be too high for me.”
Hermione huffed a small laugh and moved forward to kiss him.
“You’re adorable sometimes, did you know that?”
Draco pulled back in surprise. “Oh?”
“Yes. Truly adorable. I’ll think about it Draco. I do appreciate you pointing this out to me
with six years to consider whether we should make an Extra Little Star or not.”
Draco let out a relieved breath. “You’ll really think about it?”
“Yes, though for the next several months I’m probably going to be more focused on the Little
Star we have before worrying about making an Extra Little Star to join him.”
“Fair enough, darling. Now then, I’ll see you tonight? I have some big meetings at the
Ministry today.”
Hermione nodded agreeably to this and moved off to floo to Hogwarts, casting one final,
amused look back at Draco before she left. Draco followed her several minutes later, as he
floo’d to the Ministry to join his father in what was likely to be one of the most important
meetings about the MLPP repeal, at least in Draco’s mind.
Today he would learn if all of his efforts to convince the Wizengamot to go the divorce route,
rather than annulment via a repeal, had been effective.
Truthfully, this was why Draco raised the possibility of a second child with Hermione. He
wanted her to be thinking about it and considering it just in case he couldn’t convince the
others to get on board with divorce. Draco knew Hermione would not divorce him before
Little Star was born. She had promised him that months ago. He also hoped that she
wouldn’t divorce him at all if it took some sort of intentional act on her part to end the
marriage. He sensed she was settling in with her life at the Manor, and though there were
things about her old life she still clung to – she had not given up her flat, for instance – Draco
hoped that a combination of falling in love with him and inertia would convince her to stay
married to him instead of taking the steps needed to get a divorce.
He thought she was falling in love with him. He hoped she was. He told her he loved her
rather frequently, and she still had not said it back to him in the same way he said it to her.
Then again, her declaration to him their last night in Positano stuck with Draco and was
something he clung to whenever doubts began to creep in. She told him she would be
content and that he would be enough for her. But he knew that it would still take time for her
to adjust to this. It ran so counter to the way she had lived her entire life that it could be a
few more months before she fully embraced it and said those words back.
So yes, Draco was still highly in favor of divorce as the preferred mechanism to end the
MLPP marriages. He wanted to buy himself as much time as possible for Hermione to
decide to stay married to him. If the law was simply repealed, their marriage would end
automatically, and she would have to take active steps to marry him again. Draco didn’t
know if she was there yet.
Draco was turning this over and over in his mind as he sat in the large conference room,
surveying others. Lucius, he knew, was now very in favor of divorce as well – for precisely
the same reasons as Draco. Then again, if this was the thing they had to concede on in order
to get the MLPP repealed, Draco knew they would do it.
He had to give his wife what she wanted.
“The divorce route is too administratively burdensome, Lucius,” said Lord Graham. “It will
be expensive, and we will have to create an entire department at the Ministry of Magic for it.”
“And it creates a bad precedent,” said Lord Flint. “A full repeal accomplishes our objectives
without introducing the concept of no fault divorce into wizarding society. We aren’t
muggles.”
“Would it really be so terrible to have a no fault divorce though?” asked Madam
Merriweather. Draco peered at the woman. She had a beaky nose and kept her hair in a
severe bun. She was part of the liberal bloc and was rather outspoken. Lucius had told
Draco that they would still have a chance for the divorce route as long as she was on their
side.
“I’d wager it would be very popular with the wizarding public,” she added. “Not everyone
wants to be trapped in a marriage, Lord Flint.”
He snorted. “We have lived for thousands of years without the concept, and it has been
critical to keeping our social fabric together. Don't you see what it has done to muggles?
The divorce rate skyrocketed.”
“So?” asked Madam Merriweather. “What is it to you, Lord Flint, if couples choose not to
stay married because they fall out of love?”
“It erodes our traditions, as you very well know,” he retorted.
It makes pureblood marriages more likely to fail, thought Draco.
This was the thing Lord Flint would not say out loud, but it was a point Hermione had made
to him weeks ago when they were discussing it. So many pureblood marriages were
practically arranged, that the families who still cared about it relied on the near-impossibility
of divorce for keeping their children in those marriages, at least until grandchildren were
born. While divorce was permitted in limited instances, such as infidelity or violence, Draco
knew that in practice it almost never happened. Bruises could be healed. Memories could be
modified. The very existence of magic made it nearly impossible to gather the proof required
for divorce.
“I rather think,” said Madam Merriweather, “that the families who follow those traditions
will still follow those traditions, whether no-fault divorce is permitted or not.”
“And I rather think that the point of this meeting is to repeal the MLPP, rather than
overhauling other magical marriage laws. We can accomplish the same thing as a divorce if
we simply repeal it. The Department of Mysteries has looked at it and reports that the
marriages that were enacted because of the MLPP would be automatically broken. We won’t
even have to do a separate vow breaking for it. It is responsive, efficient, inexpensive, and
very simple to administer. We should not amend the MLPP by permitting divorce; we should
repeal it as though it never existed in the first place. You know that is what the public wants
from us, Madam Merriweather.”
Draco held his breath, his stomach in knots now. He could not deny Lord Flint’s points. He
was right, of course. A repeal would be simple and would require no finessing of language,
no creating loopholes, nothing. The law would simply go away. It was clearly in line with
what the public wanted, even if it was not what Draco wanted.
“Lord Flint, are you certain that–” started Lucius, but Lord Flint gave him a fierce look.
“I am certain. The MLPP is giving us children, which is something the wizarding world
needs desperately. But I acknowledge that it has been deeply unpopular, and I am willing to
repeal it for that reason. That being said, if we are going to do this, Lucius, we need to do it
the whole way. It needs to be simple, clear, administrable. We can’t amend the damn thing
yet again and then find ourselves with over two hundred couples thrust into divorce
proceedings all at the same time. The press would be almost as bad as the MLPP itself, and
you know it.”
To Draco’s unease, quite a few others in the room were nodding along. Lucius shot Draco a
look that clearly said, It’s this or nothing.
Draco felt a bit sick as he nodded to his father, and Lucius swallowed hard before turning to
the others.
“Very well. Then we are considering a full repeal. Madam Merriweather?”
Madam Merriweather looked around at the others, and then sighed. “I would ask that we
consider loosening the divorce restrictions in future legislation. However, with respect to the
MLPP, I am in agreement that a full repeal is the most appropriate measure. You all know I
voted against this law from the very beginning, and I would like nothing more than to see it
gone.”
And with that, Draco’s stomach sank to the floor.
There would be no route for divorce if the MLPP was overturned. His marriage would end
automatically.
Fuck, fuck, fuck.

30 June 2004
There were several notable things that happened on the last day of June.
It began that morning, when Draco was nearly tackled by his wife as he awoke. She was
bouncing with excitement, and he did not resist when she pushed him back on the bed and
then give him a very large and rather sloppy kiss.
“It’s viability day!”
Draco blinked up at her a bit owlishly.
“Oh?”
“Yes! At twenty-four weeks he has a greater than fifty percent chance of surviving if he is
born in a muggle hospital.”
Draco’s jaw dropped. “You’re joking.”
“Nope!” she said excitedly. “Not joking! Obviously it’s still far too early, and he needs to
stay in there for several more months, but this is still a huge milestone! We are having a
baby, Draco!”
Draco found himself smiling broadly at this, even though he found himself anxious as he
thought about a baby that small being born. Little Star would never have a hope of surviving
in the wizarding world at this point, and it was shocking to think that he could if under the
care of muggles. In fact, his odds were good enough that muggles considered the pregnancy
to be viable already.
Then again, when had his wife ever been wrong about this sort of thing?
“That’s brilliant, Hermione. Truly.”
She huffed an exhale and smiled too. “It finally feels real. He’s active, he’s viable, and
Draco… we are going to do this.”
Draco smiled softly as he raised his hand to her abdomen, and that was when the second
notable thing happened: Draco felt a distinct kick.
His eyes widened, and his jaw dropped. He scrambled to sit up and was fixated on her
abdomen now as he pressed his hand against it more firmly. Sure enough, a moment later
there was another small kick.
“Hermione…” he said softly.
He raised his head to find her staring at him, practically beaming. “You felt it?”
“Yes… yes, I can’t believe it!”
She laughed in delight and pulled him forward for another kiss. “This is going to be an
exciting day, Draco. I can just feel it.”
Hermione’s prediction proved to be true when an owl arrived just before she floo’d to
Hogwarts.
She ripped the letter opened, and then her eyes widened as she thrust the letter into Draco’s
hands.
Hermione,
Gin thinks she might be in labor, but her contractions aren’t close enough yet to go to St.
Mungo’s. Molly is at Grimmauld with her to keep an eye on things. I am wrapping up at the
Ministry this morning before my paternity leave, but then I’ll be headed back there as well. I
don’t know how long this will last – Molly says that Bill took almost twenty-four hours of
labor for her – but you’ll be a godmother soon! I know it might be awkward for a little while
since we are asking Ron to be godfather, but you two are my best friends and always have
been. We would love to see you after you are done teaching this afternoon, whether the baby
has arrived by then or not. I’ll send a patronus once we go to St. Mungo’s.
Love, Harry
Draco folded the note and looked up at Hermione with a raised eyebrow. She was wringing
her hands a bit.
“Darling, what is it?”
“It’s just… I’m godparenting with Ron…”
Draco sighed and handed the note back to her. “Yes, that’s true. But it’s more ceremonial
now that we aren’t in a war. And you said you two are figuring out how to behave around
one another.”
“That’s true,” she admitted.
“I’m happy to go wait at St. Mungo’s with you,” he added. “You don’t have to be around all
the Weasleys without me.”
Hermione exhaled in relief and gave him a grateful smile. “Thanks. I want to support Harry
and Ginny, obviously, but…”
“I get it,” said Draco. “Think nothing of it. We can head there once you’re done for the day,
assuming Ginny has gone herself.”
Hermione smiled broadly at this and pulled Draco in for one more kiss before floo’ing away.
He glanced down at her retreating bum before checking his watch. He had thirty minutes
before his first meeting of the day.
Plenty of time.
He took the stairs two at a time and slipped back into their room, where he opened the top
drawer of his dresser and pulled out the photos of Hermione from his birthday.
He still could not believe she had done this for him. They turned out so much better than he
ever imagined, especially since she developed the photos in the potion that made them move.
Over and over again she was touching herself, arching her back, climaxing for him. Draco
had rubbed more than a few out in the days since getting these photos back. Of course, it was
always preferable to have the real Hermione instead, but when she was busy or distracted…
well, this was vastly superior to his imagination.
Blaise’s naughty magazines had nothing on pictures of his wife that were only for his eyes.
Within fifteen minutes he was coming with a grunt. He waved his wand to clean himself up,
refastened his trousers, and then made his way back downstairs to the floo for the next
notable event of the day: Lucius’s last meeting as a member of the Wizengamot.

Early That Evening
Draco was lost in thought, as he sat in the familiar waiting room of the St. Mungo’s maternity
ward as the clock ticked toward baby Potter’s grand debut. There were far too many
Weasleys, in Draco’s opinion, and they seemed to process stress and anticipation with
boisterousness. Hermione was sitting in one corner of the waiting room quietly, with her
head on Draco’s shoulder as she waited for news. Draco, of course, had his head leaning on
top of hers as he reminisced about his father’s last day on the Wizengamot. Technically,
Draco would assume his duties the following day, though he supposed nothing would change
very much. Lucius had turned over increasingly large amounts of work to Draco as they
made it to the last day of June, until it was only the things that required an actual
Wizengamot member to be present that Lucius handled himself.
Still, it was a bit strange.
“How was it?” asked Hermione softly. “Lucius’s last day, I mean?”
Draco huffed a little. “They threw a party for him. I’m not certain if it was to congratulate
him or themselves for surviving his tenure.”
He felt her chuckle a little. “Are you ready for it, then? That seat will be yours tomorrow.”
Draco nodded. “As ready as I can be.”
She lifted her head, so he did too. She turned to look at him seriously. “I’m proud of you,
Draco. Truly.”
Draco’s heart stuttered a little, and he felt his cheeks reddening. “I did it for you, Hermione.”
She smiled softly at this and seemed to be searching his face for something. Draco found
himself falling into her eyes as she studied him. The noise from the Weasleys and that
blasted water feature on the wall all melted away as a flurry of expressions seemed to cross
her face.
Finally she said, “You’re enough, Draco. I hope you know that.”
In that moment some vague plans that Draco had been considering ever since he accepted
that the MLPP repeal would automatically end his marriage solidified.
“Thank you,” he said. “And Hermione… you’re enough for me, too. I love you.”
Her face softened again for just a moment before she bit her lip, looking uncharacteristically
nervous. “Draco, I–”
“HE’S HERE!” bellowed Potter, causing Draco and Hermione to both jump in surprise.
Draco’s heart was racing as he glanced back down at Hermione. She was a bit pink and had
the oddest expression on her face. She somehow managed to look both relieved and irritated
at precisely the same time.
Was she going to say it back?
Draco’s heart surged at the possibility. Granted, the waiting room at St. Mungo’s wasn’t the
most romantic place for a declaration like that, but Draco didn’t care. He had been saying it
to her for ages now, and she had never said it back to him. He was desperate to hear it for
many reasons, not least of which included his plans for the upcoming week.
But no. As usual, Potter managed to interfere and interrupt whatever she was about to say.
In a single glance Draco knew the moment was lost.
He grumbled to himself as he slowly followed Hermione over to the larger group. She had
already made her way to Potter to give him a congratulatory hug.
“Tell us everything!” said Arthur Weasley eagerly. Draco couldn’t help but notice the man
looked harried, though now he seemed utterly relieved that it was over. Molly had not been
in the waiting room at all, having been by Ginny’s side for the entire experience.
“My mother will be in the waiting room with the rest of them,” Hermione had said when she
first discovered this. “Yours too. The only person watching me give birth will be you.”
Then again, Draco supposed that his mother and Hermione’s mother had only done this
once. Molly Weasley had done this six times, and if there was ever a mother who was
prepared to see it, then it would surely be her. Still, Draco shuddered a little as he considered
just how overbearing an experience like that might be.
“He’s perfect,” said Potter breathlessly. “And Gin is tired, but just fine. He was 3.3 kg, so
he’s a bit on the small side, but he’s a couple weeks early. The healers said that was to be
expected. No major complications.”
“And the name?” asked Ron. “What did you decide on?”
“James Sirius,” said Potter, now grinning broadly. “After my dad and godfather of course.”
Of course.
Draco supposed it wasn’t surprising. He was grateful that Hermione was willing to honor his
own family traditions with Little Star’s name, though they still had not settled on anything
official just yet. She continued to insist on Leo, and he continued to veto it, so for now they
had come to a stalemate.
“That’s lovely Harry,” said Hermione kindly. “I’m sure your dad and Sirius would both be
honored.”
Potter turned a little pink at that, before gesturing toward everyone to follow him.
“They’ve just moved Gin to recovery. It will be a bit cramped with everyone in there, but she
wants to introduce you to him.”
Draco and Hermione fell back to the end of the crowd, the trail of redheads all in front.
Draco was hoping Hermione would return to the conversation they had been having before
Potter interrupted, but instead her eyes were narrowed at his shaggy dark head in front.
“What do you think his WAPGAR was?” she asked under her breath.
Draco huffed a laugh. “Why? Is it a competition?”
She rolled her eyes a little, but he saw she was also smiling. “It’s always a competition. I
thought you of all people would know that.”
Draco lifted one eyebrow at her. “I’ll not deny I’m keen on Little Star scoring ten out of ten,
but that’s for his own health, darling.”
“And because it would give us objective proof that he’s perfect.”
Draco rolled his eyes at her, but her own eyes were twinkling, and he let it slide. Truthfully,
much of Draco’s competitive nature had been burned out of him by the war. Then again, if
there was one child with whom a Malfoy seemed destined to compete it would be a Potter.
“He and Little Star are going to be in different classes at Hogwarts,” he reminded her. “Little
Star will born after the first of September.”
“I suppose that’s true. But that doesn’t mean they won’t play together or end up in the same
house together. James has no choice but to be Gryffindor given who his parents are, and I
like to think my genes will outweigh yours when it comes to the Sorting Hat.”
Draco scoffed, but she just nudged him playfully as they made it to the room. They slowed
as they approached.
“Let’s give them a minute,” she said, peering in. “It’s awfully cramped.”
Draco had no objections to this. He and the Weasleys had largely ignored each other in the
waiting room, other than a brief conversation with George, Prudence, and then Arthur.
Hermione had spoken to the Weasleys a bit longer than Draco had, but it was clear that she
was now an outsider. Draco could tell it bothered her a little bit, but he also sensed that some
part of her had accepted it. They would surely see the Weasleys a few times per year going
forward. It would be cordial and tolerable, and Hermione would gravitate toward Potter,
Ginny and hopefully her own husband when they interacted together. Draco idly wondered if
Ron and Prudence’s marriage would survive the ending of the MLPP too.
They stood there in companionable silence for fifteen or twenty minutes until a shuffling at
the door made them both look up.
“Gin is asking to see you,” said Ron Weasley a bit gruffly. He moved out with Prudence,
who threw them both a smile, and Hermione seemed to exhale in relief that her first foray
into godmothering would not be held jointly with Ron Weasley.
Draco watched as she carefully approached Ginny, who was holding a small bundle with a
thatch of dark black hair. Hermione had held Cami before, but Draco sensed that this was
different for her. This time, the child was her godchild. He was the son of her best friend.
Draco could tell she was getting a bit emotional as she reached out for him.
Ginny gave her a tired smile and carefully passed the baby to Hermione, who supported him
behind the head and instinctively started to sway.
Draco sidled over to her and looked down at him. Just like Cami, James’s eyes were closed.
His skin was pink, and his hands were tightly fisted.
“What color are his eyes?” asked Hermione softly, her gaze fixed on the little boy.
“Dark blue for now,” said Ginny. “But Mum says all of us had blue eyes to start.”
Hermione hummed a little at this.
“I’m hoping he gets Lily’s eyes,” added Ginny with a sigh.
Hermione smiled a little and nodded in agreement.
Potter moved to the other side of Hermione and put a finger in James’s fist, much like Theo
had that day Draco met Cami.
“This is the craziest thing I’ve ever done,” Potter said under his breath.
“Nonsense, Harry, we’ve all done much crazier things than this.”
But Potter was shaking his head.
“No. No, this is the wildest, most unbelievable thing. And I understand my parents now. I
finally know why they did what they did. I’d die to give him a better life than what I had
growing up.”
Hermione gave him a sad smile, and Draco looked at Potter thoughtfully. He knew Potter
had a martyr complex in life and death situations, but he supposed that this was somehow
different. This was a deeper love, a greater love. It was something far more enduring.
It wasn’t long after that that Molly Weasley approached and coaxed the baby out of
Hermione’s arms. Hermione let him go a bit reluctantly, and Draco caught a flash of
irritation on Ginny’s face, though she said nothing about it.
That is going to be a recurring theme for the next seventeen years, he thought a bit
uncharitably. No doubt the Potters would have quite a task ahead of them to establish
boundaries with the Weasleys toward their son, and Molly in particular. It was obvious to
Draco that Molly was smitten with the baby. Not that Draco expected Narcissa or Helen to
be less smitten with Little Star, but Draco liked to think that he and Hermione would be able
to set appropriate boundaries about that sort of thing.
Then again, perhaps I’m dreaming.
It wasn’t long after that that Hermione clasped Draco’s hand as she bid farewell to the
Weasleys and then tugged him toward the floo in the waiting room.
Once they were back at Malfoy Manor she turned to him and took a deep breath.
“We’re next, Draco.”
Draco’s stomach lurched at this, and he was filled with a mixture of excitement and dread for
everything that was coming between now and when Little Star finally arrived.
“You’re right,” he heard himself say.
Yes, many notable things had happened that day. But Draco knew there was a lot more to
come.
Chapter 29: Thirteenth Time's a Charm.
3 July 200
“Draco, we’re going to be late!”
Draco heard an impatient tap, tap, tap coming from his wife’s feet at the bottom of the stairs
as he hurried toward it, adjusting his tie. He was going all muggle tonight to forecast the new
direction the Malfoy seat would be taking. Draco had officially signed the paperwork to take
over the seat the day after James Potter was born, and now here he was, two days later, at his
first official engagement.
He came to a halt when he saw Hermione at the foot of the stairs, her arms crossed with
annoyance while she checked her watch. She was in a fitted red gown that did nothing to
hide her bump. The straps were off her shoulder, giving her neckline a graceful dip. Her hair
was pulled back into a low bun, with curls escaping around her face and nape, and the whole
ensemble was topped off with large gold earrings and gloves.
She looked like some divine version of the Gryffindor lion.
“Honestly, Draco, this is your first public appearance! We have to be on time!”
Draco forced himself to snap out of it, as he swallowed hard, only now looking at her face to
see a flash of irritation cross it. He picked up his pace and lightly made his way down the
stairs before pulling her in for a kiss on the cheek.
“There will be a thousand people there, darling. Nobody will notice if we are a few minutes
late.”
“You know I can’t abide tardiness,” she huffed.
Draco cocked an eyebrow at her. “You need to learn the art of being fashionably late to
things like this.”
“I’m never late.”
“You were late to both of your scans with Little Star.”
“The expectant mother is never late to something like that,” she said blithely. “But we can be
late when we are not the guests of honor.”
Draco rolled his eyes, but ceased his objections as he gave her another once over. “You’re
looking very courageous tonight.”
“I decided it was a good night to stand out.”
“I find it strangely appealing, though the red and gold motif reminds me of Hogwarts.”
“You will see plenty of red and gold when Leo gets sorted into Gryffindor. Now is the time
to get used to it.”
“Leo is still vetoed.”
“Nothing is officially vetoed until his name appears on his birth certificate.”
Draco raised an eyebrow at this as he placed his hand on her stomach and started to speak to
it. “In that case, I’m going to tell the elves to deck out your room in green and silver,
Eltanin. Red and gold just doesn’t match anything in the Manor.”
Hermione’s jaw dropped, and Draco just tapped her on the nose.
“Accept my veto for Leo, and I will accept yours for Eltanin.”
She harumped and turned her back on him, before wobbling precariously. Draco’s hand
darted out to steady her, and only now did he realize she was several inches taller than
normal, and he glanced down to find strappy gold heels that looked to be digging into her feet
painfully.
“Darling, those shoes…”
“I always wear heels around men who think they're better than me, especially when they're
short. It’s the best way to tower over them and be taken seriously.”
“You’re going to break an ankle.”
“I’m not,” she declared, as she stomped her foot and wobbled again.
“Merlin, Hermione, go put on something else!”
She turned and faced him fully. “I have an image to maintain, Draco. Tonight is important
for you and for the MLPP vote coming up next week.”
Draco sighed and conceded defeat. “Fine. But hang onto me, yeah? We don’t need you
hurting yourself or Eltanin.”
Hermione scoffed, but conceded to grip his arm as they made their way toward the floo.
“Ministry of Magic!” they called together as they wooshed away, arriving moments later in
the large lobby. They stepped out together and looked around with some surprise. The lobby
had always been sizable, but tonight it was enormous. Draco could scarcely see the back
wall of it, and it was clear that the Ministry had been hard at work with expansion charms
over the past week. Previous events like this were typically standing room only, but tonight
the venue had grown enough to hold numerous tables, a stage, and a dance floor. The room
was dim and candles floated in the air to create an elegant atmosphere, while the sounds of
chatter and the clanking of wine glasses filled the space.
Hermione tugged on Draco’s arm and gestured toward a large table that was elegantly draped
in purple and gold, where Harry Potter was standing with several official-looking witches
with clipboards.
“Hi Harry,” said Hermione brightly as they made their way over.
Potter had dark circles under his eyes and suppressed a yawn.
“Hiya, Hermione. Hang tight, I have to do the security spells.”
Potter flicked his wand toward both of them, and an odd feeling passed over Draco as though
he was being bathed in something slimy. Mercifully, it vanished a moment later.
“What was that?” asked Hermione, and Draco heard the lilt of academic curiosity in her
voice.
Potter just waved her off. “Polyjuice detection. As long as I know who you are I don’t have
to do more than that if I trust you. Go ahead and get your table. I’m at the one right next to
you if I don’t fall asleep first.”
Hermione gave him a sympathetic look. “That bad?”
“I have slept less than four hours since Gin gave birth three days ago,” he confessed. “I
wouldn’t have been here tonight if we knew James was coming early, but by the time he
arrived it was too late to arrange for other security for this. After tonight I won’t be violating
my paternity leave again except for the MLPP repeal. I volunteered for that too because I
don’t trust Kingsley not to make a stink.”
Draco exchanged a concerned look with Hermione.
“You don’t think he’s a threat, do you?” she asked.
Potter shook his head. “No, not really. I gave him a pretty stern warning after the vote of no
confidence. But he’s not pleased, and he is a former auror. He wasn’t invited tonight, you
know, but he could still make an appearance at the MLPP vote since it’s open to the public.”
Draco’s mouth thinned at this, but he nodded at Potter. “Please keep an eye on it.”
“Of course I will,” he said, exchanging a knowing look with Draco. “Hermione is my best
friend, and other than my wife and child she’s my top priority. And Kingsley will get over it,
he’s just still smarting from it.”
Draco felt himself relax a bit as he shook Potter’s hand and then checked in with the witches
with the clipboards. They showed him a map of the room and indicated their table, which
was surprisingly close to the head table on the stage. Draco tucked Hermione a bit closer to
him as he escorted her toward it, and as they moved through the enormous room he saw
many heads turning to watch.
“Hold that head high, Lady Malfoy,” Draco whispered to her.
She just smirked. “You too, Lord Malfoy, who knocked up Hermione Granger after she went
to jail.”
Draco’s face split into a broad grin at the reminder. “Merlin, I did do that, didn’t I? That is
unquestionably my life’s greatest achievement.”
Hermione laughed lightly, and soon Draco saw the flash of cameras that told him the press
had found them. Draco made a point to bend close to Hermione and whisper conspiratorially
in her ear while brushing her stomach possessively.
Some part of him was hoping Astoria and Weasley would see the photos the next day. Or
better yet, Dr. Cocky Cock Cox. Perhaps Draco could drop a few pictures by his office since
he was a muggle.
Draco had been unfortunately reminded of him after Hermione’s appointment the previous
day, in which his photographic dildo evidently made its first appearance.
The dildo may be his, but the baby is mine, Draco told himself.
Still, he made a point to turn Hermione and kiss her directly in front of Rita Skeeter just to
increase his odds that the message would be sent loud and clear.
When they arrived at their table, Draco pulled out a chair for his wife and looked around at
their tablemates. Theo and Pansy were both there, finally looking a bit more alive. Pansy’s
parents were there as well. Lucius and Narcissa were talking animatedly to the Parkinsons,
and Draco and Hermione rounded out their table of eight.
“Well this is better than I expected,” said Draco as he sat between Hermione and Theo.
“The Notts and the Malfoys. We fill an eight-top now,” said Theo with a smirk.
Soon everyone fell silent as Lord Selwyn rose from the head table and slowly made his way
to a podium. He cleared his throat and then began to speak.
“Tonight, the Wizengamot is inaugurating a new Minister of Magic!”
Draco’s mind started to wander as words about progress and the future and a new hope for
wizarding Britain washed over him. Instead, he found his gaze lingering on Hermione, who
was listening with rapt attention.
I really don’t hate Shacklebolt or the MLPP, Draco was forced to acknowledge. They are the
reason she’s here with me tonight.
And it was true.
Like many poorly thought out plans there could be a silver lining, and Draco’s personal silver
lining was so shiny he found himself a bit wistful as he listened to Lord Selwyn ramble on.
It was only when Maribelle Marchbanks stood to be sworn in that Draco’s attention was
pulled back to the stage. He was a bit taken aback by the vision of her as she approached. As
part of the planning committee for this event, Draco knew the Ministers of Magic always
wore ceremonial robes for a swearing in. Hermione said it was akin to muggle royalty during
a coronation. Still, even knowing what was coming he was surprised by the elaborate robes
of gold that she wore as she approached Lord Selwyn. The stitching was fine, and it was
edged in embroidery depicting magical creatures and plants, all woven in silver along the
hem. When she reached Lord Selwyn, she kneeled on a purple pillow, and Lord Selwyn
placed both hands on her head before muttering a spell.
The audience gasped as swirls of golden light seemed to touch her head and then burst out for
a moment, before they dissipated. When she rose the golden robes were open, now revealing
an interior dress of plum. She looked regal, and Draco couldn’t help but imagine golden eyes
where there were blue and brown curls where her straight black hair was slicked back.
Someday Hermione would be the one wearing those robes, he was sure of it. As he glanced
at his wife, he could tell from her expression that she thought the same thing.
Soon after that speeches were made and dinner was served. Draco found himself sitting
quietly as he listened to the conversations around him. Hermione’s light laugh was engaging
as she spoke animatedly with Lucius and Lord Parkinson before asking Theo and Pansy
about Cami.
She’s starting to campaign already, Draco thought with a smile.
Sure enough, when dinner concluded and the dancing began, Draco pulled her close and kept
her from tripping over her heels.
“Well?” he asked. “When will it be your turn, darling?”
“Who says it’s ever going to be my turn?” she said with a sly smile.
Draco gave her a fond eye-roll.
“Please, give me some credit for knowing you. In fact…”
He trailed off as a notion struck him, and then he pulled her closer as he started to laugh.
“What is it?” she pressed.
“Oh nothing. I just finally realized why you took the job at Hogwarts. Even with your
excuses about an informed voting population something about it always struck me as odd.”
“Oh? You think I had some other agenda?” she asked, as a slow smile began.
Draco came to a complete halt in the middle of the dance floor and tilted her face up to look
at him.
“I’m certain you did. You know that after ten or twenty years of teaching at Hogwarts yours
will be a household name, not just because of the war but because you will have educated the
children and grandchildren of wizarding Britain. I’m certain that by then you will have
suggested any number of muggle-friendly policies that Theo and I will be pushing through
the Wizengamot. And by the time you’re old enough to be seriously considered for a
position like Minister of Magic you’ll undoubtedly be the obvious choice thanks to your
continued connection to the muggle world and your popularity among your former students.
You took the job so you could distance yourself from lobbying. You won’t be as
controversial if your career remains above politics. But you picked muggle studies because
it’s now a required course for every student at Hogwarts for all seven years, and in the postwar world you believe that it’s the subject that could help you become Minister of Magic
someday.”
She raised one eyebrow and just smirked.
Draco leaned down to kiss her, and once again a camera went off nearby.
When he pulled back he cupped her face.
“You’ll do it someday, darling.”
“There’s never been a muggleborn Minister of Magic before,” she pointed out.
“Perhaps not. But you’ve been shattering glass ceilings since you were eleven years old.
You’ll crush this one too, I’m certain of it.”
Hermione beamed at him and moved back into Draco’s arms, as they picked up the dance
once more. Draco glanced at the gold glove in his hand and then over at Minister
Marchbanks, whose gold ensemble outshone the rest.
Except it didn’t, he thought. Nothing and no one will ever outshine Hermione Granger.

9 July 2004
Draco was staring at himself in the mirror, his face pale and drawn as he swallowed hard.
He was prepared for today. At this point there wouldn’t be much for him to do, but he had
been up very late the night before arguing about the exact repeal date for the MLPP. He had
come back to the Manor after Hermione was already in bed, and he was intending to leave
today before she woke up. He didn’t want to tell her that he had failed in her final request:
that the repeal actually take place after Little Star was born.
Just because they were voting on it today didn’t mean the repeal had to be effective today.
Once the other members of the Wizengamot had made it clear that there would be a full
repeal and the magical marriages would automatically end, Draco and Lucius had
immediately pushed for an effective date on the first of January. Hermione had been in favor
of that approach, because it would ensure that Little Star was born well before their marriage
was over.
Up until a couple days ago Draco thought they would be successful too. It would give the
Ministry plenty of time to message the change to the public, and everything would start
afresh in the new year. Most of the other Wizengamot members seemed to find this sensible.
But then Lord fucking Flint had come in at the eleventh hour and demanded that the repeal be
effectively immediately.
At first Draco didn’t understand why there was such a rush, but Lord Flint made the
unfortunately valid point that if the repeal wasn’t effective very soon then the Ministry would
be legally required to hold another Matching Ceremony on the first of September, and the
new couples would have to follow the consummation requirements or else risk a short stint in
Azkaban before the repeal went into effect.
It was true that it wouldn’t affect very many people, because the next batch of matches was
much smaller than the first. But it could still be bad press. And in the case of the Flint
family, it would affect their daughter, who had just missed the age cutoff for the previous
Matching Ceremony by a few days and whose own engagement plans had fallen apart over
the holidays. She had no hope of getting married in time.
Yes, Lord Flint certainly had his own reasons for repealing the law as quickly as possible, but
even Draco couldn’t deny that his general points were good ones. It meant that the other
Wizengamot members had reversed course very quickly, and Draco and Lucius suddenly
found themselves fighting an uphill battle to extend the repeal date past Hermione’s due date.
Draco had lost that fight for good the previous night. Lucius had left early, and once he was
gone Draco found himself all alone, trying to defend a position that had suddenly become
indefensible. He knew what Hermione would say when he finally told her about Lord Flint’s
point.
My goodness, he’s absolutely right! If I had thought of that, I would never have pushed to
repeal it at the end of the year!
That didn’t make Draco feel any better about it, though. He slipped his hand into his robes
and clutched at the thing he was holding there. He had intended to do this anyway, but now it
was absolutely critical.
He didn’t know if Hermione was ready for it. She still had not told him she was in love with
him. But Draco was out of time to wait for her to get on board, and at this point the only
thing he could do was deliver the MLPP repeal she so wanted and then hope that it would be
enough.
He straightened up and smoothed his plum robes with the gold thread around the collar. He
had been working the past week of course, but this was his first session and therefore the first
time he had ever worn them.
He cast one last glance at himself and then slipped back into their room. He brushed a curl
off of Hermione’s forehead, and she sighed in her sleep. He would catch up with her after the
vote. He knew she would be there for it, and the last-minute change in the repeal date would
surprise her.
He made his way silently down the hallway and descended the stairs. He was about to floo
away, when a voice stopped him.
“Draco!” came Narcissa’s voice from his father’s office.
Draco turned to find his mother standing there in her dressing gown, holding a cup of tea. It
was such an unusual sight his jaw dropped. Then even more surprising, Lucius appeared
behind her, brushing her hair from her shoulder affectionately.
For a moment the Malfoys just stared at each other, and then he realized his mother had tears
in her eyes.
“What is it?” asked Draco quietly.
“Look at you, my dear. You’re all grown up.”
Draco gave her a small smile. “I’ve been grown up.”
“You’ve grown a lot this past year, it’s true. But it’s never struck me quite like this.”
Lucius wrapped an arm around her shoulder and pulled her close, as he just raised a knowing
eyebrow at Draco. Draco’s gaze shifted to his father.
“The repeal won’t be immediate, but it’s going to happen before Little Star is born. I just…
I’m sorry, Father. I feel like I failed.”
Draco closed his eyes so he couldn’t see Lucius’s reaction to this news.
“Draco,” came Lucius’s voice, much closer than Draco was expecting.
Draco opened his eyes to find his father right in front of him. To his surprise, Lucius reached
up to grip his shoulder.
“You didn’t fail, Draco. Not at all. You managed to get a compromise candidate instated as
Minster of Magic, and you are repealing this law despite the fact that it is against your own
interest to do so.”
“But I—” started Draco, but Lucius cut him off with a firm shake of the head.
“No. Listen to me, Draco. By any measure you did spectacularly well. Every piece of
legislation requires compromise, every single one. You will never get everything you want.
I’ve been telling you that from the beginning, and here is your proof. I’ll not deny that there
are times it feels like you fought for nothing. But you need to take a step back and see just
how much you have accomplished.”
Draco was relieved his father wasn’t angry, but he still slumped. “But now what?”
Lucius squeezed his shoulder. “You’re a Malfoy, son. You know exactly what to do.”
“I think about the rules I’ve been given, and I play to win,” recited Draco. It was something
his father had drilled into him since childhood.
“Precisely. And when the rules change? Like they did last night?”
“I pivot so I still come out on top.”
“Exactly.”
“Is that why you support Hermione now?” asked Draco suddenly. “You pivoted?”
Lucius gave an elegant snort. “Your wife was obviously not my first choice, but yes, Draco.
When it became clear she was not going to give up and neither were you, I pivoted and
decided to play to win.”
“And what is winning to you now?”
“My son married and taking up the Wizengamot seat. My grandson growing healthy and
strong. That’s all, Draco.”
“And the title?”
“Frankly, that’s not my problem anymore,” said Lucius.
Draco looked at him in shock. “Pardon?”
Lucius shrugged. “It’s not. I’ve secured my heir. He survived Hogwarts and the Dark Lord
and has grown up. He’s now married and has reproduced. By the time the title gets to you,
I’ll be dead. It’s no longer my concern.”
“But the MLPP repeal…”
“You know what to do about that.”
Draco swallowed hard, and nodded. “Yes, but… it’s Hermione.”
Lucius raised one eyebrow. “And now for my last piece of advice.”
Draco nodded, inviting his father to continue.
“You hold nothing back when it’s time. She’s brave enough to be a Gryffindor, but she’s as
shrewd as a Slytherin. Appeal to both her heart and her head. And if you do that? You
cannot lose, Draco.”
Draco took a deep breath.
“I cannot lose.”
“No, you can’t.”
Draco closed his eyes to center himself, but he refused to occlude. Not now, not ever again.
He opened his eyes to find his parents staring at him, small smiles on both of their faces.
Lucius nodded in approval.
“Now then,” he said, “Go meet the others if you must. Your mother and I will see you in the
session. I’m sure Hermione will be there too.”
Draco nodded. “I haven’t seen her yet.”
Lucius waved his hand dismissively. “Not to worry. We’ll tell her where you are.”
Draco gave them both swift smiles and then floo’d to the Ministry of Magic.

That Afternoon
Draco was sitting in his seat in the chambers, trying not to fidget. Both of his parents had
just arrived, and as he watched, his wife did too a few minutes later. She shot him a curious
glance, and he just grimaced back at her.
Despite his father’s encouraging words, he still felt like he had failed her. And he couldn’t
tell from her expression whether she had heard the news or not.
As Minister Marchbanks approached the front to open the session, the visitor’s door opened
one last time, and Kingsley Shacklebolt came striding in. Draco froze, as did many others in
his vicinity. To his disbelief, Shacklebolt approached Hermione and then sat down right next
to her. She stiffened and cast him a glare that was so withering Draco was shocked
Shacklebolt didn’t shrivel up and die in his seat. But as Draco observed them, he soon
learned why somebody like Shacklebolt had held onto power as long as he did. Evidently
Shacklebolt was nearly as stubborn as his wife, if not quite as shrewd.
“Hermione,” he said in his voice that always seemed to carry.
“Kingsley,” she said with a saccharine smile. “Pleasure to see you here, with the other
visitors.”
Kingsley’s nostrils flared, but Hermione just raised one imperious eyebrow and then turned
back to nod silently at Draco.
Draco turned to find Potter in the session, his eyes fixed on Kingsley and Hermione, his hand
already on his wand.
Fuck it all.
Draco didn’t think Kingsley would be stupid enough to try something physical, but there was
no question he was trying to intimidate his wife.
The notion made Draco oddly ragey. He glanced at his father and could see that Lucius was
sneering at Shacklebolt and glaring in much the same way Draco was. Something about that
expression on his father’s face bolstered him. He didn’t know precisely when Lucius had
moved from openly objecting to Hermione to overt support, but the shift had been gradual.
Still, it had happened, and there was no question Lucius now viewed Hermione as a Malfoy
with every right that position would grant her.
That included the right not to be harassed by other men on a power trip.
“Kingsley,” came Lucius’s drawl from the gallery, “I do hope we won’t be forced to
withdraw the Malfoy support for your other pet projects. What a shame it would be if your
entire political legacy was erased thanks to poor behavior.”
The threat was not subtle, and to Draco’s relief, Shacklebolt’s eyes widened as he seemed to
realize that Hermione now had Lucius’s full support, and it wasn’t just limited to the MLPP.
He would be taking on them both if he pushed too hard.
Shacklebolt gave a tight smile and then rose to find another seat a few aisles away.
Draco finally relaxed and saw Potter did too, though his gaze was still fixed on Kingsley and
had not budged. He nodded toward his father in thanks, and Lucius shot him a conspiratorial
smile before leaning toward Hermione and whispering to her.
There they go plotting with each other again. I always knew those two would be fearsome if
they ever joined forces.
But Draco didn’t mind it. He rather liked listening to his father and his wife hash out policy
over the dinner table before they delivered it to Draco to execute. They would be a welloiled machine within a few years, he was certain of it.
Minister Marchbanks banged her gavel and opened the session, moving through scheduled
business at an efficient pace. Draco had to admit this was something he appreciated about
her very much. She was no-nonsense and generally did not believe in having meetings when
a memo would do. She wasted none of their time, and before long it was time for the MLPP
repeal to be introduced.
“Our last piece of scheduled business,” she announced, “is a proposal for a complete repeal
of the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan. We will not be debating this proposal, but it will
proceed directly to an up or down vote. The precise language of the repeal is very brief, so in
the interest of being open with the media and the wizarding public, I will read the text of the
proposal in full and will ask each member of the Wizengamot for an oral vote to state their
position on record.”
She cleared her throat and placed some spectacles on her nose as she peered down at the
single sheet of paper that Draco knew contained only two sentences. But the words in those
two sentences represented so much fight and energy and achievement and failure all rolled
into one. He swallowed hard and recited it along with her in his head.
“Public Law 8742, also known as the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan, will be repealed in
full, with such repeal to be effective at 11:59 P.M. on the Thirty-First of August, 2004. Any
magical marriages that were created as a result of a match by the Ministry of Magic due to
the Matching Ceremony on the First of September, 2003 shall be immediately nullified at
such time, and the marriage bonds shall automatically break.”
She put the piece of parchment down and then peered over her spectacles at the Wizengamot
members and the press, all of whom were listening attentively. Draco’s eyes, however,
drifted to Hermione to try to gauge her reaction.
The final date the Wizengamot had agreed upon for the repeal was the last day of August so
that their obligations under the MLPP would not be triggered on the first of September. This
had accommodated Lord Flint’s concerns, while ensuring that the Ministry and the public had
as much time as possible to prepare for the wave of annulments. The repeal would take place
late on a Tuesday night. The Ministry was planning on imposing a stay of marriage for the
next three business days so that the annulments could be confirmed before any new marriages
were registered.
In the case of Draco and Hermione, it gave them about seven weeks to wed again before
Little Star was born, assuming she would agree to it. His stomach clenched.
Would she?
Based on Hermione’s expression, Draco thought Lucius must have given her some warning
about this. She looked a bit pale, but also resolute, as she nodded at Draco and gave him a
small smile. Draco exhaled to calm himself as he turned toward the front to begin the vote.
To Draco’s slight surprise, the vote was overwhelmingly in favor of the repeal. Even those
members of the Wizengamot that he and Lucius had not contacted were casting yeas. By the
time it reached Theo and Draco, who were sitting next to each other, there were only two
votes needed and quite a few other members to go.
“Lord Nott, please cast your vote,” said Minister Marchbanks.
“The Nott seat votes ‘yea,’” said Theo.
“Lord Malfoy, please cast your vote,” said Minister Marchbanks.
Draco cleared his throat. “The Malfoy seat enthusiastically votes ‘yea,’” he said.
He turned to find Hermione beaming at him, and for the first time in hours Draco felt like he
could believe his father and enjoy the success he had today.
The Marriage Law and Procreation Plan was officially repealed.

Later That Night
Draco was leaning against the bar at the Leaky Cauldron, watching his wife talk animatedly
with several of the younger members of the Wizengamot. Quite a few of them had headed to
the Leaky after the vote to have a drink and commiserate, and it had turned into an
impromptu public celebration once The Evening Prophet had reported that the repeal passed.
The place was absolutely packed.
Hermione’s laughter floated across the room, and Draco found himself smiling into his glass.
“Feeling any better?” asked Theo, as he sidled up to him.
Draco immediately scowled, and Theo chuckled.
“It’s going to be fine mate.”
“What if…”
“Don’t even say it,” said Theo. “She’s happy. Look at her.”
Theo was one of just three people who knew what Draco was planning tonight. He had been
forced to confess everything to Theo the day before when Draco’s near-manic insistence
upon a December repeal date caused Theo to pull him aside and make him spill everything at
wand point.
“I don’t know, Theo.”
“You’ve done this before,” he pointed out.
“Yes, but I had more leverage then.”
Theo raised a skeptical eyebrow.
“I did,” insisted Draco.
Theo just shook his head wearily. “I don’t think that’s true, mate. The way she looks at you
now… fuck, I wish Pansy looked at me like that.”
Draco blinked in surprise and turned to face Theo fully. “She’s never even said she loves
me.”
Theo shrugged. “Some people don’t say it that often. Hermione has never struck me as the
terribly romantic type, and you know she’s the sort to overthink emotional things. But she
does love you, Draco. It’s as plain as day.”
Draco took a deep breath and drained his drink. “Right then. In that case, wish me luck.”
Theo clapped him on the shoulder. “You won’t need it. But send me an owl later on tonight
anyway. I’ll take you out for drinks tomorrow.”
Draco exchanged a swift smile and then made his way through the crowd to collect
Hermione. She must be speaking about something grand, because she was gesticulating
broadly, and to his consternation she was wearing heels again and tottering a bit precariously
on them. Her balance had been not quite right for the last several weeks, no doubt thanks to
Little Star.
“Hermione,” he said, as he sidled up to her. “We should be going soon.”
“Oh yes, of course. Well it was lovely speaking to you all. I’m ever so pleased you voted to
repeal the MLPP. Your thoughts about werewolf rights are fascinating, and I’ll ask Draco to
get in touch with you on that next week.”
Everyone shook hands, and Draco shot her an amused look, while she just winked at him.
He tugged on her arm and led her to the floo. A few seconds later they were stepping across
the threshold at the Manor. Just as Draco had hoped, the Manor was dim and clearly empty.
“Where are your parents?” she asked in confusion, looking around at the lamps. It was late
evening, but still not late enough for them to have retired to bed.
“Oh they were having dinner with the Parkinson’s tonight,” he said.
Hermione nodded and allowed Draco to grip her hand. “Come along, darling, we haven’t
really had any time to talk the last few days. It’s a nice night. Let’s find some better shoes
for you and take a little stroll.”
Hermione nodded agreeably and called Patsy for some flats. Draco’s heart was starting to
pound and his palms were starting to sweat, but Theo was right. He had done this before.
In fact, he had done this a dozen times before.
But Draco knew that this time it would be different.
“This way,” he murmured, pulling her toward a door at the back of the house that led to the
patio and gardens. When they stepped out, she gasped and spun to look at him in
amazement.
The path was lined with lanterns and candles were suspended in the air. The night was balmy
and warm, and the fragrance from the famed Malfoy roses drifted across the patio.
Draco took a deep breath as he turned to her and grasped both of her hands in hers.
“I’m sorry if I failed you,” he said. “Lord Flint put up a fight about the effective date at the
last minute and pointed out that if the MLPP was still in effect after the first of September,
we would have to hold another Matching Ceremony to comply with the law.”
Hermione’s eyes widened. “Of course,” she murmured. “I should have thought of that.”
“We didn’t have any choice but to repeal it before that date. I know it’s not precisely what
you wanted, darling, but I hope it was enough.”
Her eyes softened. “You didn’t fail me at all, Draco. You got Shacklebolt out of office and
repealed the law for me. It’s extraordinary.”
“But is it enough?” he prodded.
“Enough for what?” she asked hesitantly.
“For this,” said Draco, as he lowered himself to one knee.
Her breath caught, and he thought he saw tears sparkle in her eyes.
“Hermione, I’ve asked you this a dozen times before, and none of them were quite right. But
eventually you said yes when you had no other choice, and ever since that day I’ve been
trying to prove to you that I could be the best choice for you, even though we were thrown
together by the Ministry the first time. Today I voted for an amendment that will erase our
marriage. It will end without any input from either one of us, almost as if it never happened.
I don’t like that at all, because our marriage did happen. It has been the most extraordinary,
maddening, wonderful, inconvenient, and special time in my life. You and Little Star are the
best things that have ever happened to me, and I love you both so much. And now I’m
asking you, begging you, to consent to become my wife again, this time through your own
choice and not because of any bloody law or matchmaking schemes. Please, Hermione…
Will you marry me?”
Hermione was blinking hard, and she opened her mouth in surprise. Draco’s heart was
pounding as he waited for an answer. Every other time he had asked her this question, they
had been in a prison cell in Azkaban. This time, he had done things properly. He had gone
back to Cartier and selected a simple engagement ring with a large solitaire diamond that he
thought coordinated well with her wedding band. He had created a romantic atmosphere and
gotten down on one knee.
He had told her he loved her and their son.
It was the thirteenth time that Draco Malfoy had proposed to Hermione Granger, and he
hoped beyond anything that she would say yes.
“Draco,” she said softly, as a slow smile started. “I have many flaws, and one of them is
being a bit taciturn when it comes to emotional things. I’ve never been very good at
expressing my feelings, and that means I’ve never said the words to you that you deserved to
hear. So let me say them now: I love you too, and I have been in love with you for months. I
never thought I would find a man quite like you — and if I ever did, I certainly didn’t think it
would be you a year ago. But you’ve proven that you will go to the ends of the earth for the
people you care about and love, and there is nothing more that I could ever ask for than that.
So yes, you’re enough. And yes, I’ll marry you. We’ll call Anthony Goldstein and ask him
to marry us the first day we are allowed to wed after the repeal. I don’t want to spend any
time not married to you.”
Draco thought his heart was bursting from his chest as he rose and pulled her in for a deep
kiss. By the time he released her she was breathless, and Draco reached into his pocket for
the ring. He slipped it onto her finger, and she gaped at it. The diamond flashed brilliantly in
the candlelight, and she stared at it in disbelief.
“So we’re actually engaged now?” she asked. She sounded properly stunned.
“Yes, but we’re also married,” he pointed out. “For at least a few more weeks.”
At this, Hermione threw back her head and began to laugh, the sound of it floating through
the gardens and making the night sparkle with delight. Before long Draco was joining her,
and they clutched at each other as the absurdity of everything they had been through to get to
this place hit them both at once.
“I love you so much, Draco,” she said, as she straightened up and wiped tears of mirth from
her eyes. “I could never imagine doing this with anybody but you.”
Chapter 30: It Never Goes According to the (Birth) Plan.
25 August 2004.
Hermione was thirty-two weeks pregnant. Draco thought she was beautiful, but Hermione
disagreed.
“I’m huge! I look like a beached whale!”
I didn’t matter how much Draco objected to this characterization, he couldn’t convince his
wife otherwise. Theo and Potter had both advised him to give it up and just make neutral
noises.
“You can’t agree with her or she’ll hex you,” said Potter wisely, “but if you keep telling her
she’s not big, she’ll know you’re lying. Best you can do is just hum whenever she says it.”
Draco knew Potter was correct after he made an enormous error by offering to help her put
on her shoes one day. She was sitting on the edge of their bed, struggling, and he bent down
to assist.
“Oomph,” he said, as she kicked him near the face.
“Well I can hardly see my own feet!” she declared.
“Yes, and that’s why I’m helping you, darling.”
“I’m pregnant, not an invalid!”
Draco had quickly become an expert at making soothing noises without actually saying
anything at all. Theo even complimented him on it when he and Pansy brought Cami over
for lunch one day, and Hermione was using her belly as a prop.
“I can eat food off of it like a TV dinner,” she commented. “And look Cam! You’re
bouncing!”
Cami giggled as Hermione lifted her hips a little and made Cami bounce on her belly.
“Mmmmm,” said Draco.
“Nice one, mate,” whispered Theo.
Hermione continued to oscillate between very excited and very, very done. He couldn’t help
but notice that the closer they got the the end, the more the ‘done’ seemed to outweigh the
excitement.
“I can’t sleep. I can’t move. I do not understand how on earth I’m supposed to get bigger
than this. There is nowhere else for him to go…”
“Darling, you still have eight weeks.”
“Don’t remind me! That’s forever!”
It actually didn’t feel like forever to Draco. And despite Hermione’s complaints he knew that
she didn’t think it was forever either. She had taken him shopping for something called a
‘pram’ and a ‘car seat’ in the muggle world. She had been spending a great deal of time with
Narcissa and her mother, setting up nurseries at both the Manor and the Granger household so
that her parents could babysit now and then. And he had even walked in on her trying on
some strange device that was attached to her breasts and jutted out aggressively to create
something that looked like butterbeer bottles suspended from her tits.
“It’s a breast pump, honestly,” said Hermione, after Draco asked her why she was wearing
bottles on her tits.
According to Hermione, she was deep in the throes of ‘nesting,’ and it was an entirely normal
developmental stage in most pregnancies.
“It means I have the hormonal urge to create a perfect space for our baby,” she said with
some authority. “And I may feel the need to reorganize several more times before it is
complete.”
Draco just stepped back and let her do it, offering only the rare comment when his opinion
was requested, which wasn’t very often.
When Hermione wasn’t nesting, she and both of their mothers were planning a very lastminute wedding.
True to the plan, the Ministry of Magic had declared that there would be a three-day stay of
magical marriages to confirm that all of the annulments had been effective before accepting
any new marriages. They would begin registering marriages again the Saturday after the
MLPP repeal went into effect, so that was the day Hermione and Draco were going to wed.
It gave them less than six weeks to plan the wedding, and all three women seemed slightly
manic because of it. But as Draco continued to point out, they were Malfoys and had every
advantage in the world when it came to this sort of thing. They could get married in the rose
garden with only the people they cared about in attendance, and the elves could provide food
and drink at the reception. It would be fine.
Narcissa and Helen both seemed to think that this was not fine, and the wedding needed to
feature the hundreds of guests that Draco and Hermione had both invited to their first
weddings when they were engaged to other people. To Draco’s slight surprise, Hermione
agreed.
“I don’t care about the spectacle, really, but after everything I wrote about you in the
papers… I want everyone to know I am choosing you, Draco.”
Draco had shrugged his shoulders and gone along with it, finding wedding planning to be far
more enjoyable when he was marrying Hermione instead of Astoria. At least this time he did
not have any compulsive need to occlude through it.
Hermione, of course, had created a rigorous planning schedule to ensure that everything ran
smoothly leading up to the week their marriage ended and she was due back at Hogwarts.
“I won’t be able to help with anything for the last three days,” she declared. “It all needs to
be finalized by the thirty-first.”
In typical Hermione Granger fashion, she was decisive and authoritative while she made
decision after decision about things like napkin colors and chair coverings.
“Don’t exhaust yourself too much, darling,” Draco warned.
“I won’t. And it will all be over soon.”
When she wasn’t nesting or wedding planning, Hermione was creating her birth plan and
explaining all the things she expected from Draco when it came time for the main event.
“I have decided that I will be having a natural birth!” she announced over breakfast one day.
“Erm… is there such a thing as an unnatural birth?” asked Draco in confusion.
Hermione harumphed and gave him a look that clearly said, you are asking me a very stupid
question.
But Draco didn’t think it was that stupid. Then again, a pregnant wife/fiancée was a
temperamental wife/fiancée.
“My apologies,” he said, trying to smooth the feathers he had inadvertently ruffled. “Please
explain.”
“Thank you,” she said a bit primly. “All it means is that I will be giving birth without drugs.
I plan to use natural – meaning non-pharmaceutical – coping mechanisms. And you see? I
have created a birth plan. It has pictograms and everything to make sure my entire medical
team understands my preferences.”
At this, she pushed forward a piece of paper, and Draco peered at it curiously. He saw
several things on it, such as a syringe with an X through it that said, 'No medications.' Next
to it was a picture of a nipple being pinched that said 'Natural induction methods.' And at the
very bottom was a picture of ten concentric rings that also had an X through it that said, 'No
cervical checks.'
Draco raised his eyebrows at this last one. Not that he was thrilled about Dr. Cocky Cock
Cox giving his wife cervical checks, but if he didn’t then…
“How will we know when you get to Level 10 without cervical checks?” he asked.
Hermione rolled her eyes in a way that told Draco he was being daft and said, “My body
knows what to do, Draco. Women have been doing this for millenia without cervical checks.
I just have to listen to it and visualize my cervix opening and the baby lowering.”
“Are you certain about that?”
“Yes! Honestly.”
Draco’s obvious skepticism about her birth plan, however, seemed to light a small fire under
Hermione because it wasn’t long after that that she demanded Draco attend a birthing class
with her, and that was where he found himself this evening, sitting on the floor with his legs
spread in a V, while Hermione leaned back against his chest and practiced breathing
exercises.
“Birth partners, put your hands on the mother’s belly in our support position! And now all of
you, breathe in through your nose and out for two gusts and then exhale!” cried an older
woman with gray curls and floaty muggle clothing. “Now inhale for one, two, three, four!
Aaaaaand hee-hee-hoooooooo.”
Draco apparently fucked it up because Hermione turned around and hissed, “You are
‘hee'ing’ when you’re supposed to be ‘hoo'ing!’”
“Hermione, this is ridiculous,” whispered Draco.
“No it is not! You’re my husband-slash-fiancé, and I expect you to pay attention so you can
be a supportive pregnancy partner!”
“Hermione, I support everything you’re doing! But this timed breathing thing is utter shite!”
“Then next time we do this, you can grow a uterus and push Extra Little Star out of your
vagina and see if you still feel that way!”
At this, Draco noticeably perked up.
“Wait, you’re willing to do this again?”
“I never said that!”
“No, but hypothetically, say I learn all this breathing bullshit for you – would you do it
again? Maybe soon?”
“God, sometimes I can’t believe I agreed to remarry you.”
“Hush, wife-slash-fiancée. You don’t get to take it back.”
She rolled her eyes, but Draco sat back, quite satisfied with his counterargument. Truly, the
shine from their engagement had not worn off at all. He felt bubbly every time he thought
about it, especially because she made a point to tell him she loved him at least once a day
after breaking the ice the first time. She told him she had a lot to make up for. Draco didn't
necessarily agree with that, but he wouldn't object if it meant hearing those words.
Still, Draco had to concede that if it was his vagina he would probably have opinions about
the way the baby came out of it too. So he buckled down and hee’d and hoo’d until he could
do it properly, both to please his wife and also to seduce her into making Extra Little Star as
soon as her body had recovered from the first.
Then again, Draco found himself second guessing his own cooperation when she announced
at the end of the class that he had graduated and was now ready to study hypnobirthing
methods.
“Hypnobirthing?” he asked in confusion. “What the fuck is that?”
“You know, where I sort of go into a trance because I’m visualizing so well I don’t think
about the pain.”
“Do you want me to just put you under the imperius curse? That would be more efficient.”
“Honestly, Draco, you would go to Azkaban.”
“Not if you don’t tell anybody. And then we can skip the hypnosis nonsense. It’s way faster
for me to just say, ‘imperio,’ and then order you not to feel pain.”
She opened her mouth to counter him and then got an odd look on her face as though she was
actually thinking about it.
“Oh for fuck’s sake, Hermione, I’m not serious! You can’t honestly be considering the
imperius curse to simulate hypnosis! And getting hypnotized in the first place is ridiculous!”
“Hypnosis is a perfectly valid method of controlling pain!”
“Did you or did you not actually walk out on Trelawney in third year because you think
divination is bollocks?”
“What on earth does divination have to do with anything?”
“It’s like hypnosis, isn’t it? It’s just made up bullshit!”
She scowled. “Hypnosis is not at all like divination, thank you very much! It has shown to
be very effective in childbirth!”
“But why?”
She rolled her eyes. “I already told you, didn’t I? I don’t want it to hurt too much! Hypnosis
should help me accept the pain and keep my mind elsewhere while it’s happening!”
“If you don’t want to feel pain, then don’t have a natural birth.”
“No, Draco, I want a natural birth so I can connect with my body! I was built to do this!”
“So you want to give birth with no drugs, but also feel no pain while you do it?”
“Yes! Or mostly, at any rate. The hypnosis is supposed to take my mind to other places!”
“Darling, I feel very certain that your mind is going to be focused on the pain unless I
imperius you. Hypnosis is not helpful at all.”
“Of course it is.”
“No, it’s not.”
She huffed and leveled such a fierce look at Draco that he immediately knew he was losing
this one.
“Come to the hypnobirthing class with me, and we’ll see about that.”
So three days later, Draco found himself spending his Saturday afternoon in a hypnobirthing
class. A not insignificant part of him wondered precisely how he had ended up here. Then
again, his wife/fiancée was here with him, so he supposed it wasn’t a bad thing, but there was
no question he felt very stupid while he closed his eyes and tried to visualize.
“We are thinking of an ocean,” said the soothing voice of the teacher. “Visualize the ocean.
The waves are rising. They crest and move rhythmically. In and out, in and out, and now a
surge…”
Draco opened one eye and looked around at the five other couples who all had their eyes
shut, breathing deeply and visualizing.
“And now we’re going to visualize ribbons,” the voice continued. “When the uterus
contracts the uterine muscles move up and the cervical muscles open out. Think of the
uterine muscles as ribbons. They are purple ribbons that are pulled taught, and then they
open the yellow ribbons around the cervix to loosen easily and comfortably. Follow my
voice and visualize that moment. Purple ribbons up! And then yellow ribbons oooopen...”
Draco truly had no idea what the fuck ribbons had to do with anything.
To Hermione’s obvious dismay, she clearly didn’t either. Both of Draco’s eyes were fully
open now, and he was watching his wife peek at the others to see if they were able to
visualize the ribbons better than she could.
“I’m not getting this,” she said, a bit of panic in her voice.
Draco softened and rubbed her lower back a bit. “Maybe just ignore her and try the water
one again,” he whispered.
She dutifully closed her eyes and tried, but the creases in her forehead were getting deeper
and deeper as she struggled with it.
“Draco!” she whispered in dismay.
That was his cue to be an actual supportive pregnancy partner instead of following along
with all of this hypnobirthing nonsense. He nudged her to follow his lead, and he stood.
“Family emergency,” he said smoothly to the confused instructor. He gripped Hermione’s
hand firmly and pulled her through the door to the classroom and across the hall to a room
that was empty. She immediately started to pace, and Draco pulled her to him.
“Stop. Breathe. Let’s sit down and talk about this.”
Hermione slumped, and they both sat on the floor, though this time Draco made sure to be
facing her.
“Tell me what’s going on, darling.”
“I’m just… I’m scared!”
Draco raised an eyebrow. “You’re scared of what?”
“My natural birth.”
“Hermione, you don’t have to have a natural birth.”
“But I want one! I really do! But I know it’s going to hurt a lot, and the last time something
hurt that much I was being tortured on your drawing room floor!”
Draco felt himself go cold.
“Hermione…” he said, but she wouldn’t look at him.
“Hermione,” he insisted, and he cupped her chin to pull her face up toward him. Her lovely
face looked miserable because she couldn’t do it. She couldn’t visualize well enough to take
her mind off of the pain. He could see her warring with herself: the thing she wanted versus
the thing she was afraid she couldn’t tolerate.
“Darling, if you want to try for a natural birth, you can try. And if it becomes too much, you
should just take the drugs. Absolutely nobody would judge you for it. Hell, hardly any
wizards even know what muggle birth methods are in any event! Most witches request
numbing spells at St. Mungo’s. It’s still uncomfortable, but everything is dulled.”
Hermione bit her lip. “It’s just… I feel like I should be able to do it. I don’t want to flood
my body with drugs just because I’m afraid. I’ve been afraid before, and I’ve never backed
down.”
“Merlin,” he muttered, as he pulled her in for a hug. “Listen, darling. If this is some sort of
latent, Gryffindor, I’m-braver-than-you thing, then I beg you to reconsider. If you want a
natural birth because it excites you and it’s something you want to experience, I’m all for it.
But if you are doing it to prove some point about your strength compared to other women or
your lack of fear… then please don’t.”
She looked so torn.
“I mean it,” he insisted. “You’re one of the bravest women I know. You have nothing to
prove to anybody, least of all me.”
“I’m afraid it’s all going to go wrong,” she whispered.
Draco cupped her face and stared at her intently. “Your birth plan?”
She nodded.
“Hermione, at the end of the day, all that matters is that you and Little Star are safe and
sound. Whatever that looks like, however you get there, that is the goal, right?”
She nodded again.
“Good. Then that is the thing I want you to focus on. You can visualize and plan and
pictogram as much as you want, but I encourage you to prioritize while you do it. Tell me:
what is the worst case scenario in muggle childbirth?”
“That one or both of us could die,” she answered promptly. Draco’s heart seized for a
moment, but he nodded firmly and pressed on.
“Exactly. That’s the very worst case scenario, and we won’t let that happen. So what is the
next worst thing?”
She frowned and thought about it. “Probably that one or both of us is permanently injured.
It’s rare, but it can happen.”
Draco inclined his head. “Yes. And we will take measures to prevent that too. So now I
want you to think about a birth where you both survive and neither of you is injured. What’s
the next worst thing you can imagine?”
She blinked at him, clearly unsure about where he was going with this. “I don’t know…
maybe a C-section?”
“A C-section, alright. And why is that?”
“Because I don’t really fancy being cut open,” she said. “It’s major abdominal surgery, and
it’s never the first choice.”
“Okay,” he said. “But would you have a C-section if Dr. Cock – Cox told you it was
necessary to keep you or Little Star safe?”
“Yes, of course.”
“If he told you that, would you even jump on the chance to have one as quickly as possible?”
“Obviously.”
“Then I rest my case.”
“I’m sorry, but I don’t understand.”
“My point, Hermione, is that we can’t predict how things will go. But the most important
thing – the only important thing – is that you and Little Star get through it and are healthy on
the other side. Whatever that looks like, whether it’s a natural birth where you feel every
twinge or pushing with all of the drugs or a C-section, it's okay because none of them even
approach the true worst-case scenario. Surely you know that no birth is superior to another,
as long as the baby and the mother get through it safely. There are plenty of reasons you
might prefer a natural birth, but equally valid reasons to need or want a C-section. So
prioritize. Rank the things you want the most from top to bottom. But also remember that
you are willing to compromise on all of it, and you will throw the birth plan out of the
fucking window if circumstances warrant it. And if that happens, I want you to do it with a
smile on your face and not feel like you somehow failed because things didn’t go according
to plan.”
Hermione slumped and leaned into him.
“Have I told you recently that I love you?”
Draco smiled into her hair. “I love you too, darling.”
“I’m sorry I’ve gone a bit mad with this.”
“I’m not,” he said simply. “I think it’s a great idea to have a plan and make your preferences
known.”
“But…” she prompted.
“But, just remember that you are married to me, not the birth plan. You can break up with it,
and its feelings won’t be hurt.”
“I’m engaged to you too,” she reminded him with a small smile.
“Of course you are, darling. I have the best wife-slash-fiancée a man could hope for.”
Hermione gave him a wry smile, and he leaned down and kissed her.
“Look, let’s get out of here,” he said. “I don’t know about you, but I can’t visualize those
fucking ribbons at all.”
“No,” she confessed. “Not unless they’re wrapped around Ronald’s neck. I’m afraid he’s
going to say something insensitive at the Burrow tomorrow, and I’ll be tempted to strangle
him.”
Draco found himself grinning. “You should keep your wand at home, then. I’m not keen on
my wife-slash-fiancée going to Azkaban again.”

29 August 2004
“Why do I feel like this is a terrible idea?” asked Hermione nervously as she patted her hair
in the mirror near the floo.
Draco turned to her. “Hermione, if you don’t want to go, we shouldn’t go.”
“No! No, I do want to go, really. It’s been a full year since I’ve been to one of these. The
last time I was at the Burrow without getting shouted at was my wedding day.”
“It’s true we were both almost married a year ago, weren’t we?”
“Yes,” she said. “Up to that point I spent half my life at the Burrow. It was as much a home
to me as my flat was and more than my parents’ house had been for a long time. But now…”
“Now your home is here, with me.”
She just nodded, and Draco sighed as he tried to pull her in for a hug.
“Oomph, Draco, my stomach doesn’t fit anymore.”
He found himself chuckling, and she was giving him a wry smile back.
“Look,” he said. “Let’s go for at least a little while. Nobody is going to shout at us, and we
can stick together. If it gets uncomfortable, just claim to be feeling poorly, and we can
leave.”
He sensed her relax at this. “You’re right. Of course you’re right. I’m being completely
ridiculous.”
“It’s not ridiculous. You haven’t seen them all together since James was born, and that was a
little awkward.”
Hermione nodded in agreement.
“But, as you’ve told me many times, the Burrow is always crammed full of people.
Exchange a few polite words with Molly and Ron, and you won’t have to do anything else.”
“Right,” she said, nodding and straightening up. “Then let’s do this.”
They threw some floo powder into the fireplace and began to spin away. A moment later
they emerged on the other side, and Draco jumped in surprise as something that sounded like
a series of firecrackers went off, followed by high-pitched squeals and then a baby crying.
“GEORGE!” bellowed a bossy female voice that Draco was certain was Molly Weasley. She
came marching around the corner, wearing that same large apron she seemed to favor and
waving a spatula threateningly.
She came to an abrupt halt when she saw Draco’s rather shell-shocked form standing in the
fire.
“Oh hello, dears,” she said brightly. “We’re eating in the garden today. Now if you’ll excuse
me…”
She stomped off toward the next room, and soon Draco heard her shouting something that
sounded like “terrible influence on your nieces and nephews!”
Draco turned to look at Hermione in amazement, who just gave him a slightly apologetic
shrug.
“It’s like the last year never happened.”
Draco glanced down at her stomach. “The last year definitely happened. No need to annul
our marriage before Tuesday, darling.”
Hermione grinned at this and then tugged on his hand. “Come on, I’ll show you around.”
Draco allowed himself to be pulled away, as he looked around the Burrow with more
curiosity than he cared to admit. Something about the name was fitting, he thought. It was
just so… cozy. In fact, it was almost uncomfortably cozy. The sofa and armchairs were
overstuffed with homemade knitted blankets thrown across them. The bookshelves were
crammed full of books and odd muggle knickknacks. There was an entire hallway of family
photographs and another wall of children’s art in bright colors, most of which Draco could
not interpret. Absolutely nothing matched, though there was an undercurrent of red and gold
in the pictures and throws.
Narcissa would have heart palpitations in a place like this.
Then again, Draco finally understood where some of the things in Hermione’s flat had come
from. She too had numerous knit blankets thrown strategically across various pieces of
furniture; but unlike these, which all appeared well-used, Hermione’s had never appeared to
be used at all, in the numerous times he had seen them while using her flat as a waystation en
route to get sushi.
It also very warm. And loud. And rather cramped.
His poor wife – who was admittedly much larger than usual at the moment – made a futile
effort to suck in her belly while she squeezed between two redheads Draco didn’t
immediately recognize to get to Harry Potter in one corner. He was bouncing a black-haired
infant and looking exhausted.
“Jamie!” Hermione said in a high-pitched voice that made Draco’s eyebrows go up.
The baby coo’d and then promptly spit up.
“Oh dear,” she said, but Potter just waved her off.
“Happens all the time. Molly says he has reflux.”
“How are you hanging in there, Harry?” she asked, eyeing him with some concern.
“Surviving, not thriving, but I think that’s to be expected.”
She grimaced at him sympathetically, and Potter just shrugged before yawning.
“Everyone outside!” came a voice, and then a small cheer erupted from the crowd of
redheads, which made Draco wince. Potter chuckled.
“Welcome to the family, Malfoy.”

30 Minutes Later
Molly Weasley was an excellent cook. She might be bossy. She might be interfering. She
might be far too traditional for Hermione’s tastes. But the woman could put together a
Sunday lunch like Draco had never experienced before.
The roast was succulent with ample amounts of gravy. The parsnips and carrots had
precisely the right ratio of crunch to softness. The potatoes were crispy and steamed as
Draco bit into them, and the Yorkshire pudding puffed with all of the perfect imperfections
that Draco had come to expect from the dish over the years.
It was a damned masterpiece of British culinary arts.
To Draco’s surprise, only he and to a lesser extent Prudence, seemed to find it at all
remarkable. Everyone else at the table complimented Mrs. Weasley’s skills offhandedly and
then tucked in as though this was just an average Sunday lunch.
But of course it was.
Draco exchanged impressed looks with Prudence, who was sitting across the table from him.
The two of them were on the very end, both still outsiders to some degree, or perhaps that
was just him. He noticed that Ron was sitting several seats over, so perhaps Prudence was
sitting away from him intentionally.
“Well?” he asked over his roast. “What will you and Weasley be doing after the MLPP
repeal goes into effect next week?”
Prudence sighed and lowered her fork. “Honestly, I’m not sure.”
Draco raised an eyebrow questioningly.
“Well he asked me to marry him…”
Draco heard Hermione’s fork clatter next to him, as she turned to stare at Prudence in
surprise. Potter and Ginny were sitting between Prudence and Ron, and he thought he saw
them go still too to listen.
“...but I said not yet,” she finished.
“I thought you were in love with him!” said Draco under his breath.
“I am,” said Prudence.
“But….?” prompted Hermione.
“But I just want a little more time. I told him I want him to date me properly. Maybe start
over again. Be my boyfriend for a while before we jump right back into marriage.”
“How did he take it?” asked Hermione with a grimace.
Prudence sighed. “I think I hurt him. We’re not not talking, but it’s been awkward for a few
days.”
Draco glanced at Weasley and for the first time ever felt a shot of sympathy. Proposing and
being told no?
Well, to be fair, that had happened to Draco eleven times with his own wife.
Still, he knew it could be disheartening. Then again, Weasley had hurt Prudence in a very
deep way. There was no timeline for healing from that sort of thing.
“There’s no need to rush,” said Hermione. “He will understand that.”
“I hope so,” she said a bit glumly. “I do love him, I told him that. I just think we need to
take things at our own pace instead of trying to match other people.”
“You mean me and Draco,” said Hermione wryly.
Prudence smiled a little. “I expect so, yes.”
“Well you can remind Ronald that I’m due to pop any day now.”
“Darling, you still have seven-and-a-half weeks,” chimed Draco.
“Hush, you know what I mean.”
“Well yes, but you see… that’s the thing…” said Prudence, and then she turned crimson.
All at once Hermione and Ginny both gasped, and Draco looked between them in confusion.
“What? What is it?”
“Oh honestly,” huffed Hermione. “It’s like you can never tell when a woman is pregnant!”
Draco wasn’t sure if that was fair. He had been able to tell within five minutes of
impregnating Hermione.
That's only because I stopped telling you to fuck her all the time.
The sodding family magic of his still liked to insert itself every now and then.
“Well that’s wonderful,” said Draco instead, glaring at Hermione who was still looking at
him like he was utterly dense.
“Yes, it is, rather. But I’m afraid I told him, and then he immediately proposed.”
“Ooooh,” said Hermione and Ginny, again at precisely the same time.
“What?” asked Draco, now confused again.
This time Hermione actually smacked him lightly on the head. “Don’t be such a boy. It was
insensitive! No woman wants to get proposed to just because she happens to be knocked up!
We want true love and romance!”
“Hermione’s right,” said Ginny, while Prudence nodded seriously.
“Ah,” said Draco delicately. “Well I imagine Weasley just thought…”
He trailed off as he realized he was about to defend Ronald Weasley for the first time in his
life. All three witches narrowed their eyes, and he quickly back-pedaled.
“You know what? Nevermind. I agree, he’s an insensitive git.”
“Yes, thank you,” said Prudence. “I’m not saying I won’t marry him, and I might even do it
before the baby is born. I just want a little more time before we take that step to be certain
about each other.”
“You should take all the time you need,” said Hermione.
“Well enough about me,” said Prudence. “What about you? How is the wedding planning
coming?”
At this, Hermione launched into a recitation of all the things that would be happening when
they married each other again the following Saturday. Draco found himself smiling slightly
as her eyes sparkled.
“And have you picked a name yet?” asked Ginny, after the topic of their wedding had been
exhausted.
“Yes, I’m in favor of Leo,” she said promptly.
“And I have vetoed Leo, as I have told Hermione a thousand times,” commented Draco. “So
that means that no, we haven’t picked a name.”
Ginny and Prudence both gave him looks that clearly said, just name the kid Leo, but Draco
shook his head firmly. This was his one and only hill, and he was prepared to die on it. They
both cast him amused smiles, and Draco would not be surprised to learn that bets were being
made among the Weasleys about this development. No doubt every single person would put
their money on Hermione, except for George Weasley, who always seemed to take the long
odds.
Draco would make sure George won if he took that bet because Little Star would not be
named Leo. He wouldn't.
As the meal wrapped up, Draco pulled Prudence aside.
“Well was it everything you dreamed of?”
“Pardon?” she asked in confusion.
“The Sunday lunch. Don’t you remember? When you were in Azkaban, you told me your
dream was a Sunday lunch with all the Weasleys and your friends Hermione and Draco in
attendance, preferably after the MLPP had been repealed.”
Her eyes lit with the memory, and she smiled before surprising him with a hug.
“Yes, Draco. I’m glad you two came around. And don’t wait so long to do it again. Nobody
here hates you anymore.”
Draco blinked in surprise, but he realized she was right. Somehow – and he wasn’t quite sure
how – he had moved from being reviled and mistrusted to an acquaintance who could be
invited in for family gatherings. Perhaps they would never be the closest of friends, but they
didn’t hate each other anymore. It was freeing, and in a strange way it made Draco hope that
perhaps others who had been on the opposite side of the war as him would not hate him so
much either. After all, a year ago he could never have foreseen this.
He was just about to open his mouth to tell Prudence that they would be returning soon, when
a small commotion over her shoulder caught his eye, and he paused.
“What?” asked Prudence in concern, as she spun around to look too.
But Draco didn’t hear her. Every bit of his attention had been pulled to his wife who was
clutching her stomach and doubling over, almost pulling Ginny Potter down with her.
“Draco!” she gasped, as her eyes found his.
She looked terrified. In all the years Draco had known her he had only seen her this scared
one time, and it was the day Bellatrix was torturing her at the Manor. He was moving before
he was even conscious of it, pulling her off of Ginny and into his arms.
“Hermione, darling? Tell me. What is it?”
“Its…” and she cried out again. “It’s too early!”
Little Star. It was Little Star. Their baby who wasn’t supposed to be born for another sevenand-a-half weeks.
“We’re going right now,” he said firmly. “I’ll call Dr. Cox on the way.” It was the first time
Draco had ever wanted to even think about that smarmy bastard, but now he felt as though
Hermione couldn’t get there fast enough.
Hermione just nodded, and the sea of Weasleys parted for them. Ginny and Potter handed
baby James off to Molly, and even Ron and Prudence Weasley were following.
“What are you–” started Draco, but all of them just gave him fierce glares.
“We’re coming with you, Malfoy,” said Weasley sourly. “It’s Hermione. We were always
going to be there.”
Draco swallowed hard, but just nodded. “We’ll floo to her flat and take a cab,” he said.
“She’s been seeing a muggle doctor.”
Weasley's and Prudence’s eyes both widened in surprise at this, but they said nothing more as
they followed Draco, who was still propping up Hermione, to the floo.
He threw some powder in the fireplace, and as they were spinning away, Draco had only one
thought.
This was definitely not part of the birth plan.
Chapter 31: Some Very Inconvenient Timing.
10 Minutes Later.
Draco was clutching his seat with white knuckles, while Hermione was gritting her teeth in
the seat next to him. He didn’t even object when she confunded the cab driver so he would
take a woman who was on the verge of active labor to the hospital.
Hermione’s flat was actually a pleasant walk from the hospital. It was about eight blocks
away, and she had always used her flat as a floo point to reach her appointments from
Hogwarts, opting to walk from there. She had, however, taught Draco how to summon a cab
for precisely this scenario, and given that she had now doubled over twice, Draco knew this
was the right choice.
Thank Merlin for Harry Potter, because he knew quite as much about the muggle world as
Hermione did, and he had no trouble hailing cabs for the others to follow behind. They were
in a small caravan, and Draco was cursing under his breath at every red light and pedestrian
crosswalk that caused them to stop.
Draco had used Hermione’s mobile to call a nurse, who paged Dr. Cox, and evidently they
would be waiting for her. Draco had to admit that he had privately questioned Hermione’s
insistence on muggle methods up to this point, but now he was grateful for it. The nurse
assured him she would be admitted right away, and Draco was fully prepared to use some
magical persuasion if that became required.
“Draco, I’m scared,” she whispered.
Draco turned to glance at her, as he gripped her hand hard.
“I know, darling. Me too.”
Draco didn’t know what else to say. Truthfully, he was terrified. This was one of those
things in the magical world that was rarely talked about, but that he knew had a tendency to
plague pureblood families. While early miscarriage was rather rare, preterm labor was not
that unusual. The magical world was not well-equipped to handle a baby as small as theirs.
There was a reason so many purebloods were only children or had only one sibling.
“This is why I went muggle, you know,” she said, swallowing hard.
Draco frowned and turned to her fully. “What do you mean?”
“I mean that I was born six weeks early. I really hoped he wouldn’t be the same way, but I’ve
always been conscious of it because of my own birth. The wizarding world doesn't always
handle preterm babies very well if they are earlier than thirty-four weeks, but in the muggle
world his odds are excellent. My hospital has one of the best neonatal wards in London.”
Draco raised his eyebrows in surprise, but his spirits lifted. “You’ve never told me that.”
“Well I didn’t want to scare you,” she acknowledged. “I hoped we wouldn’t need it.”
“But we will…” he said.
“We might,” she corrected him. “Sometimes they can slow labor enough to buy weeks and
aaaaahhhhh…..”
She doubled over and groaned again, while she clutched at Draco’s hand. When it finally
passed, she raised her head and was breathing hard.
“God, that hurts…”
“Hermione…” said Draco. He was at a loss. He didn’t know how to help her, and it was a
terrible feeling.
“We just… it will be okay, Draco. Like I said, his odds are excellent.”
“How excellent?” he asked, a bit afraid to ask but knowing that he needed to have this
information to get him through whatever was coming next.
“His odds of survival are ninety-five percent at thirty-two weeks. And I’m thirty-two weeks
and four days.”
Draco blinked and turned to her in amazement. “That high?”
She nodded. “He will be okay, Draco. His APGAR won’t be great, but —”
“Fuck, the WAPGAR.”
“It’s an APGAR in the muggle world.”
“Fuck that too, then. I don’t care about any APGAR score. I just want him to be okay. And
you, obviously.”
She gave him a shaky smile and nodded her head. “He will be. I just… God, I'm not ready.”
Draco gave her a sympathetic look. He wasn’t ready either. It was August for Merlin’s sake.
They were supposed to be getting ready for their wedding in a week, not…
Oh fuck, the wedding.
Draco’s stomach flipped, but there wasn’t anything they could do about it right now. She
said that muggles could slow labor, so perhaps their second wedding would be in a hospital
instead of at Malfoy Manor. Truthfully, Draco didn’t care, just as long as they were married
when Little Star was born.
One thing at a time. We have nearly a week to figure that out.
The cab finally arrived at the entrance to labor and delivery, and Draco jumped out before
racing around to the other side to help out Hermione. To his relief, Potter hopped out of the
cab behind them before moving forward and paying Draco’s cab fare in addition to his own.
“Tell me what I owe you,” he muttered, but Potter just waved him off.
“Just get her inside, Malfoy.”
Draco nodded gratefully and wrapped his arm around Hermione as he strode in toward a desk
to check in.
“This is Hermione Granger,” he said. “We called ahead.”
The woman clicked some keys on something Hermione had once told him was called a
‘computer,’ and then she nodded once. “We’ll have her back shortly. Have a seat if you
wish, but it won’t be long.”
Draco nodded gratefully, and he and Hermione wandered back to the others.
“They said they will be taking her back soon.”
“How is it feeling, Hermione?” asked Ginny with concern.
Hermione was pale. “They aren’t regular yet. But they’re coming often enough…”
Ginny looked grim, and glanced around the hospital warily. “And you’re sure about being
here instead of St. Mungo’s?”
Draco couldn’t help but notice Hermione exchanged a knowing look with Potter. He was
struck by it and suddenly wondered just how much of their friendship was based on the fact
that they were the only ones who had been raised by muggles in their entire extended friends
group.
“This is the best place for me,” said Hermione with surprising patience. “Muggles do an
excellent job with premature babies, and they can even slow labor sometimes.”
Ginny’s eyes widened. “Merlin. Well in that case, I’m glad you’re here.”
Hermione smiled gratefully and then turned to Harry. “Would you mind contacting my
parents? And also Draco’s parents? We can’t exactly send a patronus, and if I call my
mother she’s going to want to talk to me. I just… I can’t. Not until I know.”
Potter was a bit pale, but nodded. “Of course. I’ll reach out to all of them once they call you
back.”
“HERMIONE GRANGER!” bellowed a voice behind them, and Draco turned to find a
woman in those same pajamas holding a clipboard and looking around at the waiting room.
“Come on,” said Hermione, gripping Draco’s hand and pulling him along behind her.
“I’ll let you all know as soon as we have news,” said Draco, as he locked eyes with Potter,
Ginny, and Prudence. He even glanced at Ron, who had said nothing, but was watching
Hermione with fear. He grimaced slightly, but Potter nodded firmly.
“No rush.”
Draco exhaled and put the others out of his mind. Potter had his marching orders to alert the
grandparents, and right now he couldn’t worry about anybody except for Hermione and Little
Star.
Fuck, we still haven’t named him.
There were so many things they still hadn’t done. Draco had been shagging her regularly in
her third trimester, but that phase hadn’t lasted long enough for him. He knew that the cot
Hermione fell in love with was still on order and wouldn’t be arriving for about two more
weeks. Draco hadn’t read any parenting books yet or even learned how to change a nappy
or…
“I never packed my hospital bag!” said Hermione, suddenly turning to him, looking slightly
manic.
Apparently Draco wasn’t the only one thinking of all the things they hadn’t done.
Be strong for her. It’s the only thing you can do.
“That’s alright, darling,” he said firmly. “As soon as we know what’s going on, I’ll have
Patsy pack one for you.”
“Draco, you know I don’t like using elves…” she whispered.
Draco stopped in the hallway and turned to face her fully.
“Hermione, I love you more than anything. But now is really not the time, darling. We have
a lot of help. We need to use it for something like this.”
Hermione closed her eyes. “Right. You’re riiiiiiiiggghharrrrggghhh…”
She doubled over again, and the muggle with the clipboard stopped and turned to look at her
with a critical eye. “Breathe through it, Ms. Granger. We’ll be able to get you settled into a
bed soon, and then we can take a look.”
Hermione nodded and tried to hee and hoo, but Draco sensed it wasn’t working very well.
Eventually it passed, and then she straightened up, though she was already looking drained.
The muggle gave a firm nod and gestured ahead of her.
“Through that room right there. Let’s get you into a gown. We should have a few minutes
before the next one.”
Hermione shuffled forward, and Draco followed her, watching her worriedly. Hermione
quickly undressed and donned a medical gown, and then the muggle pulled a device forward
with numerous tubes and cords and began to attach them to Hermione, including…
“Merlin,” winced Draco, as he watched a large needle be inserted into her hand and taped
into place. Hermione, to her credit, just gritted her teeth.
“Pregnant women have to get used to it, don’t they?” asked the muggle, as she saw Draco’s
look of dismay.
Hermione nodded. “Yes. The amount of poking and prodding is unbelievable.”
The muggle just chuckled, and Draco could tell she was trying to put them both at ease. He
appreciated it, even if it wasn’t working very well.
“When will Dr. Cock – I mean, Cox – arrive?” asked Draco.
The muggle woman shot him a look of barely suppressed mirth at his slip-up, but thankfully
Hermione was so preoccupied by whatever was happening on the screen showing her stats
that she didn’t seem to notice.
“It won’t be long. He’s on call today and is on the way in.”
Draco nodded and sat on the edge of a nearby chair, jostling his leg.
Little Star will be okay. Little Star will be okay.
Maybe if he said it enough times to himself he would actually believe it.
Draco felt the urge to occlude rise up, but he forced it back. He had to stay mentally present
for Hermione and their baby. It didn’t matter how stressed he was, how anxious. It wouldn’t
be fair to either one of them to retreat into his mind.
Hermione experienced one more contraction while waiting for Dr. Cox to arrive. By the time
he finally strolled into her room, Draco had become annoyed with him all over again, though
this time he felt he had a legitimate reason for it.
She’s been in the bed for twenty fucking minutes!
The very small part of Draco’s brain that was still logical recognized that twenty minutes was
really not that long, and Hermione’s contractions did not seem to be speeding up. But the
fact that she was having them at all was concerning, and Draco was strongly tempted to
imperius the man so that he devoted his entire attention – but only appropriate attention,
mind you – to his wife.
“Hermione,” he said in that deep voice that made her sit up as though she was on call in
class. Draco thought he should be congratulated for not scoffing.
“Dr. Cox, I’ve had a few contractions. Not Braxton Hicks this time, real ones. They’ve been
painful.”
He gave a thoughtful nod and then put on some gloves. “Let’s check your cervix, then. If
you could lay down and scoot down to the edge of the bed please?”
She froze. “Cervical checks are not part of my birth plan.”
Dr. Cox raised one eyebrow. “Well it’s up to you, of course. But it’s the easiest way for me
to gauge what’s going on.”
Hermione paused for a full thirty seconds as she seemed to weigh it. Draco was chewing on
his lip nervously as he watched. He didn’t know if he wanted her to stick to her principles on
this point or just open her legs so they could know what the hell was happening.
“Fine,” she sighed. “I suppose I can compromise on that.”
Dr. Cox nodded once and then gestured for her to get into the appropriate position.
Draco watched in some displeasure as his wife scooted down to the edge of the hospital bed
and then opened her legs for the man to give him a perfect, frontal view of her cunt.
Moment’s later he approached her with a very determined look on his face.
Goddammit, why didn’t I get her to switch doctors? Fuck it, I’m tired of being polite. He’s
Dr. Cocky Cock Cox until he stops fingering my wife.
Draco knew that he was being ridiculous – after all, they were here for a very serious reason
– but he couldn’t help it. This cervical check was…
Squelch.
Dr. Cocky Cock Cox had put some jelly on his fingers and then unceremoniously shoved
them inside of her. The sound made Draco wince.
“Holy fucking hell!” hissed Hermione, which was enough to make Draco sit up and take
note. Her face was contorted with pain, and she gritted her teeth as she hissed.
“Sorry,” said Dr. Cocky Cock Cox a bit too casually. “I know it hurts.”
“Christ, it does…” she moaned, and Draco was shocked to see a few tears leaking out. He
started to stand to protest, when the doctor removed his fingers and began stripping off his
gloves. Hermione exhaled and slumped.
“Right,” he said, looking between them both. “Hermione’s at five centimeters. With the
contractions she’s been having, we need to assume the baby will be born soon. We will give
her a steroid shot to help the baby’s lungs, and we’ll try to get a second shot into her twentyfour hours from now. I’ll give her some drugs to slow the labor, but it won’t halt things
completely. We’ll try to keep him in at least long enough to give the shots time to do their
magic.”
Hermione looked tense, and Draco cast her a worried look. She seemed to be struggling to
find anything to say, so Draco jumped in.
“The shots are safe?” he asked hesitantly.
“Yes,” said the Doctor. “It’s medically advised to do it, because it causes the baby’s lungs to
develop faster than they otherwise would. It will help him breathe on his own or with just
some limited assistance when he’s born. And ideally we want to get two shots into her before
she delivers. We need to slow the labor a little bit.”
Hermione closed her eyes, and Draco knew what she was thinking: this wasn’t part of her
birth plan at all.
But it WAS part of the backup plan, he reminded himself. The entire reason she had gone
muggle in the first place was for this very scenario. Draco had never heard of wizards being
able to develop a baby’s lungs within twenty-four hours. It sounded far more magical than
any magic he had ever performed, even if it required the use of drugs which Hermione
preferred to avoid.
When Hermione’s eyes opened, she had a curious look on her face. Draco had only seen it a
handful of times before: when she flipped off Kingsley Shacklebolt during their Matching
Ceremony; when she faced him again right after marrying Draco; when she watched the vote
pass for Shacklebolt to be ousted; when she watched Draco cast the final vote to repeal the
MLPP; and most recently, when she saw Maribelle Marchbanks inaugurated. That look was
one of absolute determination and certainty that she would come out on the other side of this
with the things she wanted.
Draco knew what her top priority was.
“You know what? Fuck the birth plan. I’ll go natural for as long as I can, but please do
whatever you think is best to make sure he’s as healthy as can be when he’s born,” said
Hermione firmly.
Dr. Cocky Cock Cox nodded back, as though he expected nothing less.
“I’ll let the nurses know,” he said, “and I’ll be back to check on you soon.”
Within fifteen minutes, Hermione had her first steroid shot, and they were administering
other drugs to slow her contractions.
“I’ll keep him in for another twenty-four hours, Draco. He’ll get his second shot before he’s
born.”
Draco studied his wife’s resolute face and gripped her hand. “I know you will, darling.”

30 August 2004
Hermione kept Little Star in for another twenty-four hours, exactly as she promised.
When the nurse came around to administer the second shot on Monday evening, Draco could
see a look of sheer relief on her face.
“Good. That’s good,” she said, before falling silent and looking at the clock in her room
nervously.
Hermione had been staring at that clock a lot for the last twenty-four hours, and Draco had
too. It had been made worse the previous night after he left to give their parents the news
that Hermione was in preterm labor, but the muggles had slowed it down.
Draco didn’t think his father had looked this stressed since the war.
“What will you do about the title?”
“I thought you said it wasn’t your problem anymore.”
“Draco…”
“Fine. There’s nothing I can do except hope he stays in until Anthony Goldstein can come to
the hospital and marry us as soon as he’s allowed to do it. Hermione already had Potter
contact him, and he says he will come.”
“Can the baby stay in for that long? The Ministry put in the stay of marriage right after the
repeal goes into effect! You won’t be able to get married for five more days!”
“How am I supposed to know if he can stay in that long? Even the doctors don’t know. They
say they can slow labor, but they can’t stop it.”
“Draco, what will you do if he’s born during the Ministry’s stay of marriage?”
“Then I’m fucked, Father. I don’t know, alright? I can’t worry about the damn title right
now. I’m worried about my son. He’s not due for seven more weeks.”
Telling his mother and mother-in-law to cancel the wedding on Saturday had been almost as
bad.
“Neither of us will be there. Either Hermione is still going to be on bedrest in the hospital or
our son will be born and in the neonatal ward of the hospital. Either way, we will be in the
hospital that day, so we aren’t going to be able to go to the wedding.”
“But everyone is coming…”
“Tell them not to come, Mother. If Hermione is still pregnant on Friday night, Anthony
Goldstein is just going to come to the hospital and marry us at midnight.”
Draco and Hermione had only exchanged a few words about this, but he knew they were in
agreement with the plan. It wasn’t ideal, but what else could they do? Hermione would just
use her considerable determination to hold the baby in as long as possible.
That should work, right?
Draco groaned and ran his hands through his hair. He hated that he had to worry about
something as ridiculous as his title on top of the fact that their baby was early, but he did. He
had spent enough time asking questions about the muggle neonatal ward the previous day
that he was feeling at least moderately optimistic about that part. One of the nurses had even
been kind enough to take Draco on a small tour of the ward so he could see it.
Okay, to be fair, he had confunded her to convince her to take him on the tour. But he and
Hermione both needed for him to do it. It helped them both when he returned and reported
what it looked like, the care their baby would receive, and everything to expect as soon as he
was born. It wouldn't be easy on them, but after the tour Draco felt more confident that the
muggles knew what they were doing. And he and Hermione wouldn’t be completely clueless
about what was coming next.
It helped.
And because it helped it meant he could dwell on the timing issues. What if Little Star was
born on the first of September? Or even the second or third of September? He would be
illegitimate, and it would have nothing at all to do with him or Hermione or any of their
choices about their marriage to each other. It would just be terrible luck.
Draco knew he would love him. That wouldn’t change, not even a little bit. Draco would
marry his mother as soon as he could, so that wouldn’t change either. But Little Star would
not be able to inherit the title or the entailed properties unless Draco and Hermione were
married at his birth. That meant he would need a little brother, who would be the one who
would inherit instead, and what would that be like?
Draco and Hermione had quickly agreed that if Little Star was born with very poor timing,
they would give him the Black surname. At least then he would be entitled to his own
Wizengamot seat, and of course he would someday inherit plenty of gold that wasn’t tied up
with the estate.
It rankled, though. It didn’t feel right.
And then Draco wondered why it would feel acceptable for a second child to be put in that
position and not the first, and somehow that made him feel worse than ever. Draco had no
siblings, so he had never really thought about just how unfair that must be.
Still, Draco knew it was part of his duty to secure the title, as much as he still hated that
word. And securing the title meant having a boy while they were married. Full stop.
Draco tried to reassure himself that regardless of when he was born, Little Star would be
loved and cherished and far wealthier and stable than the vast majority of other children. The
real problem with the timing was the fact that Draco would then have to convince Hermione
to do this again with the marital magic intact to ensure a second boy.
Draco wouldn’t mind a second boy at all, but he really wanted a girl too. He wouldn’t be
able to play the odds unless they did this for a third time.
He somehow doubted Hermione would ever want more than two.
He swallowed hard and alternated between watching the clock and the television in the room
as the hours slowly ticked by.
Just four more days.

31 August 2004, 9:18 AM
“Fuck, that hurts!” gasped Hermione, as Dr. Cocky Cock Cox stuck his fingers up her cunt
again to check her cervix.
“Sorry,” he said distractedly. “Alright, Hermione, we’ve slowed this down, but you’re at a
seven now.”
She looked pale and worried. “How much longer then?”
“We’ll see. Your contractions are coming more regularly. He may be born today, perhaps
tomorrow, or even the day after that.”
“I need it to be today,” she said.
Draco glanced at her. “Darling…”
“No, Draco, we need it to be today. If it’s a choice between today and tomorrow…”
Dr. Cocky Cock Cox just gave her a disapproving look. “We want him to stay inside of you
for as long as possible. I won’t be taking him out early. It’s possible he’ll be there for
another few days, and at his gestational age, every extra day makes a difference. Now then,
I’ll be back to check on you in a few hours.”
He took off his gloves and gave Hermione one last disapproving look as he swept out of the
room. Draco reached over to grab Hermione’s hand.
“It will be alright, Hermione.”
Her eyes welled up, and she choked out a small sob.
“Hey!” said Draco, scooting to sit on the bed with her. “What is it?”
“What if he’s born tomorrow, Draco? He’ll lose the Malfoy title! And then I’ll just be the
mother of your bastard son!”
Draco went cold, and he turned to cup her face.
“Now you listen to me very carefully. If he’s born tomorrow or the next day and loses the
Malfoy title because of it, it’s not going to make a damned bit of difference how we both feel
about him. And you’re still going to marry me because you promised to do it.”
“I just –"
“Listen to me, Hermione. You are my wife-slash-fiancée, and you don’t get to take that back
just because Little Star might decide to arrive at an inconvenient time. You said you would
marry me. That promise was not conditional on our baby having a title. So it doesn’t matter
when he’s born. You’re going to marry me, and we’re going to have our little family and live
happily ever fucking after if it’s the last goddamned thing I do!”
He was breathing hard by the end of it.
“You mean it?” she asked quietly.
“Yes, I mean it.”

31 August, 2004, 1:25 PM
“Fuck!” Hermione hissed.
It occurred to Draco that Hermione’s language had really deteriorated over the last twentyfour hours. Then again, could he really blame her?
“You’re still at a seven,” said Dr. Cox, “but getting close to an eight. We’ll keep checking.”
“I want to be at Level 10,” moaned Hermione.
“Level 10?” he asked in confusion.
“Nevermind.”

31 August 2004, 5:42 PM
“Aren’t we part of the fucking Geneva Convention? Must you continue to torture me with
these damned cervical checks?”
“Sorry, but you’re solidly at an eight now. How are you handling the contractions?”
“They’re… fuck…. Hee… hee… hoo… hee… hee… hoo….”
“Are you sure you don’t want the drugs, darling?”
“Fuck you for doing this to me! The rest of the birth plan might be gone, but you had better
start breathing with me right this fucking minute if you ever want me to shag you again!”

31 August 2004, 11:32 PM
“You’re still at a nine, but close to a ten now! I’d say another hour at most, and you’ll be
able to push!”
Draco was clutching his hair in his hands, as he exchanged a look with his utterly exhausted
wife. She was beautiful. She was brave. She had even stuck to the parts of the birth plan she
could manage in a situation like this.
And yet, they were going to miss the deadline for Little Star to inherit the title. That was
very obvious by now. Their marriage was due to be dissolved in twenty-seven minutes, at
11:59 PM, and there was no way she would be able to keep him in for three more days while
they waited for the Ministry’s stay of marriage to expire.
It shouldn’t matter. Draco knew it shouldn’t matter.
It didn’t, really. It would not make him love his son any less.
Still, if somebody had shoved veritaserum down his throat and asked Draco if he was
disappointed, he would have been forced to say yes. He wanted Little Star to have his
birthright. Draco wanted Hermione to feel like she hadn’t somehow failed him by going into
labor too early. Not that Draco believed that at all, but he could tell from her expression
these thoughts were already haunting her.
Draco forced a smile on his face, but Hermione did not smile back.
She looked disappointed for a moment and then frightened and then that look of
determination lit her face again.
Wait, determination?
Draco sat up and narrowed his eyes.
“Hermione…” he warned.
“I’ve decided it’s time to break up with the sodding birth plan,” she declared.
“Hermione,” Draco scrambled to his feet as he saw her reach for her wand under her pillow.
She turned to cast him a fierce look.
“Draco Lucius Malfoy, you are going to let me do this or so help me God I’m going to stun
you and then write ‘Leo Draco Malfoy’ on this child’s birth certificate when I register him at
the Ministry of Magic! He’s going to end up with a name you despise and he will lose his
chance to hold the Black Wizengamot seat at the same time! Do not test me!”
She looked slightly manic with her sweaty face, tangled hair, and hospital gown that was
threatening to slip off.
Dr. Cocky Cock Cox was staring at them both in confusion.
“Hermione, what–” he started, but Hermione was already moving.
“Confundus,” she whispered, hitting Dr. Cocky Cock Cox directly in the chest. His eyes
went glassy before he gave her a lazy smile that was still somehow blindingly white.
“Well, Hermione, are you ready for your C-section?”
“Yes sir,” she said demurely.
“HERMIONE!” hissed Draco. “You said –”
She turned and scowled at him, cutting him off. “I know what I said, Draco, but Little Star is
going to be born in the next few hours whether I do this or not! I am not letting him lose his
entire birthright because Kingsley fucking Shacklebolt picked the first of September for last
year’s Matching Day! Did you know that part of it was his idea? He wanted it to be
symbolic! That’s why we’re here on the last day of August, waiting for the MLPP repeal to
go into effect! Well fuck him! Kingsley is not going to screw this up for our son!”
Draco exhaled and looked at Hermione’s resolute face. Truthfully, he thought she was
stretching things just a bit to blame Shacklebolt for this problem, but he didn’t dare object to
her reasoning when she was in this state.
He wasn’t above a short negotiation, however.
“Alright,” he said. “But if I let you do this, you’re accepting my veto for 'Leo.'”
“Fine,” she snapped. “Now let’s go.”
She said these last words to Dr. Cocky Cock Cox, and within minutes a different doctor
arrived to place Hermione’s epidural, which made Draco nearly pass out when he saw the
size of the needle. She just gritted her teeth, leaned forward, and breathed through it, and
now she was fighting back nausea as the nurses wheeled her away.
Draco, too, was given a gown, and he was following, checking his watch every few seconds.
11:46 PM
Could muggles really deliver a baby in thirteen minutes? Fuck, he didn’t know.
He entered a room with bright lights and several doctors and nurses, and immediately he was
directed to sit on a stool by her head, along with a doctor who said he was managing her
pain. They were all wearing masks, though Dr. Cocky Cock Cox was clearly the one in
charge.
“You’ll be alright,” he said, as he stepped forward and pulled up Hermione’s gown. “We’re
going to do a pain test first.”
11:47 PM
Dr. Cocky Cock Cox reached down and pinched her abdomen, hard.
“Did you feel that?” he asked.
“Not at all,” confessed Hermione. “Though I'm very nauseous…”
He nodded. “That’s because of the drugs. We had to push a lot through you, very quickly,
and you didn’t have any pain relief to start as a baseline. But you’ll be alright. If you need to
vomit, turn your head to the side so you don’t choke.”
The doctor next to Draco prepared himself with a plastic bag.
“Happens often enough, ma’am,” he said. “Don’t worry about it.”
“I’m not going to throw up. I haven’t done it a single time this entire pregnancy…”
Draco stroked her hair. “Breathe, darling. It will be alright.”
11:48 PM
“Alright, we’re starting,” said Dr. Cocky Cock Cox, and then the nurses in front of him raised
a sheet so Draco couldn’t see what they were doing.
It was probably for the best, he thought. Draco was here, watching his wife give birth. He
did not, however, need to see his wife be actively sliced open. Draco began to sweat.
“Are you alright?” asked the doctor near Hermione’s head, who was looking at Draco with
concern.
Draco just swallowed hard, and nodded. “Yes. Yes, this is all just a lot.”
The doctor hummed sympathetically. “Dr. Cox is the best we have. And the neonatal team is
already standing by.”
He nodded toward a small team of doctors and nurses who were hovering behind Dr. Cocky –
oh, fine – Dr. Cox, with something that was clearly a portable cot hooked up to several
monitors.
“Good,” said Draco, as he swallowed hard. “That’s good.”
11:51 PM
Draco glanced at the clock.
“How long does it take?” he muttered.
“Not long,” said the doctor. “Just a few minutes.”
“Alright, I see him,” came Dr. Cox’s voice from the other side of the sheet. “Hermione,
you’re going to feel some strong tugging, but it shouldn’t hurt at all.”
11:52 PM
“Okay,” she gritted out. “Oh God that feels weird…”
Draco watched in concern and gripped her hand hard.
11:53 PM
“Just a bit more…” came Dr. Cox’s voice.
11:54 PM
“WAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHH!”
Draco’s head shot up so fast, he nearly fell out of his chair. One of the nurses had lowered
the curtain just long enough for Draco to catch a glimpse of a naked, tiny baby, covered head
to toe in blood and slime, before he was ushered into the portable cot, and Draco lost sight of
him with the number of muggles who converged upon him.
“Time of birth, 11:54 PM,” announced a muggle nurse. “He weighs 1.8 kg.”
Draco’s heart seized at this. He was so small. So, so small. But they had done it.
No, Hermione had done it.
“Darling…” he said, looking down at her. She was silently crying, and Draco brushed her
forehead with his lips.
“Is he alright?” she asked in a tiny voice that broke Draco’s heart.
“I think so.”
“Go with him, Draco. I can’t, so I need you to do it. Please go, he needs one of us with
him.”
“But what about you?”
Draco desperately wanted to go with their baby. Hermione was right, he was so little, and
even though Draco had never felt more useless in his life, he needed to know that one of
them was there, watching to make sure Little Star was alright. But then again, Hermione was
his wife, and she had just let herself be cut open so Draco could have his heir.
He could scarcely believe she had done it.
“I’ll be fine,” she said. “They’ll stitch me up.”
“Right you are, Hermione,” said Dr. Cox. “This part takes longer than delivering the baby.
Mr. Malfoy, you can go with your son. We’ll take very good care of Hermione and bring her
in as soon as we are able.”
Draco exchanged one last look with her and leaned down to kiss her.
“Thank you,” he whispered. “Just… thank you.”
Hermione gave him a very tired, watery smile and squeezed his hand. “Go, Draco. I’ll be
there soon.”
“I love you, Hermione.”
“I love you too.”
Draco gave her one more swift kiss before he rose and began to follow the small caravan of
doctors and nurses who were preparing to wheel their son to the neonatal ward. Draco had
just caught another glimpse of that too-small body with tubes and monitors already attached
to him, along with the faintest wisp of pale blond hair, when Draco gasped.
He clutched his heart as his magic seemed to rip through him, and behind him he heard
Hermione cry out too. He looked up at the clock on the wall before his eyes rolled back in
his head, and he hit the floor, unconscious.
11:59 PM.
The Malfoy magic had broken, and Draco’s marriage was over.
Chapter 32: Slaying Monsters.
30 Minutes Later.
“Mr. Malfoy? Mr. Malfoy? Can you sit up for me?”
Draco groaned and stirred, blinking hard against the lights over him.
“Easy now, you’re going to be alright.”
Draco opened his eyes to find himself in a hospital bed, blinking at a muggle he didn’t
recognize. She was wearing those blue pajamas and a white coat.
A doctor, then.
“What happened?” he murmured.
“We think your heart stopped for just a moment. It was about half an hour ago. Do you
remember? You were in the operating room with your wife, and you gasped and clutched
your chest. We’ve been running tests for a heart attack, but they are inconclusive.”
Draco blanched as everything from the last thirty minutes crashed over him. Hermione had
insisted on a C-section. Little Star had been born. And the marital magic had broken so
forcefully that…
“Hermione!” he gasped as he struggled to sit up.
“Wait!” cried the muggle, who pushed him back against the bed with surprising forcefulness.
“She’s alright!”
Draco slumped. “Are you certain? I heard her cry out too just before I blacked out.”
“Yes, she’s okay. She passed out around the same time you did, but we brought her back
around. I’ve been told that she just woke up too.”
“And Little Star?”
“Who?” asked the muggle in confusion.
“Our baby – our very tiny, very early baby!” he gritted.
“Oh, he’s alright as well. He’s on some breathing assistance at the moment, but we’re really
just being cautious. The shots Hermione received helped to develop his lungs. You can go
see him once we’ve had a chance to check you out.”
“I’m going right now,” said Draco, as he started to sit up again, but the muggle shoved his
shoulder hard to make him sit still. He blinked at her in surprise. She was quite petite, with a
blonde pixie cut, but she was much stronger than she looked.
“Not yet,” she said. “It won’t take long, but you collapsed, Mr. Malfoy. We have to be
certain you’re okay first.”
Draco gritted his teeth, but he let her proceed to take his vitals and make some notes on his
chart while he waited. He wished he could confund her to let him go, but his wand was in his
overnight bag that had been left in Hermione’s old room. He couldn’t very well explain to
this woman that he had collapsed because of magic.
“Do you have my bag, by any chance? It was in my wife’s old room.”
“Yes, we moved it to her recovery room before you both collapsed.”
Draco tried not to groan.
“Then can I please go see her? Or the baby? I’m fine, I promise.”
She gave him an irritated look.
“Oh, fine. I can’t find anything wrong with you. But if you feel even the slightest bit
overwhelmed or faint, I want you to let a nurse know immediately alright?”
“Yes, fine, whatever.”
“Alright then,” she said, and Draco hurried to stand up and he glanced back over his
shoulder. “Where is my wife? I need something from my bag.”
Draco was determined to check on her and retrieve his wand, at a minimum, before going to
see their son.
“Room 518. Use the lift to go down two floors. It’s down the hall, on your left.”
Draco nodded and strode out, still pulling some medical tape and an odd bracelet off of his
wrist as he quickly found the lift and jabbed the button to the fifth floor.
Before long he was hurrying down a hall, which he vaguely recognized as being part of the
larger maternity and neonatal ward. He breathed a sigh of relief as he opened the door to
Room 518 without any further ado and found Hermione sitting up and wincing a little.
“Darling?” he asked as he rushed over to her.
“Draco,” she breathed with relief. “Thank goodness.”
“Are you…” he trailed off delicately, as he eyed the muggle nurse who was helping her.
“Fine. Just a little surprised. And sore from my surgery.”
“Of course,” he said.
“Draco, I need you to go see Little Star. They said you collapsed too.”
“Yes, I just needed to retrieve something from my bag and check on you first. I’ll be headed
that way in a moment.”
“Good,” she said with relief. “Give him a kiss for me. It might be a few more hours before
I’m let out to see him. They said I have to be able to get into a wheelchair first.”
Draco nodded and reached down to grip her face. “You’re incredible. I’ll go see him right
now and report back. I want you to rest and recover as quickly as you can.”
She sighed in relief and sank back into the bed. Draco gave her one last kiss before breaking
away to discreetly collect his wand and slip it in his pocket.
“Let our families know too,” she said.
Draco nodded in agreement as he slipped out of her room and retraced the steps he had
learned the previous couple of days to the neonatal ward. He pushed the door open and saw
there were four cots occupied. The cot in the back left corner seemed to beckon to him as
Draco approached slowly. Sure enough, he saw “Baby Malfoy” scribbled on the end, and
Draco peered over to see him.
Surprisingly, he wasn’t wrapped in a blanket, but he had a nappy on and a tiny hat. There
were thin tubes through his nose and mouth and some cords attached to his hands and chest.
He was the most beautiful and fragile thing Draco had ever seen, and he choked back a sob.
A middle-aged nurse turned at the sound and gave him a kind smile.
“He’s doing very well, Mr. Malfoy.”
“But he’s…”
“He’s a fighter. I’m no doctor, but I’ve been a nurse in this ward for twenty years. I’d wager
he’ll be breathing on his own within the next couple of days. We are really just being
cautious and giving his body a chance to rest from the delivery.”
Draco stared at her. She seemed so calm, so confident, so optimistic.
“May I ask your name?” he asked.
She smiled again. “I’m Paula. Barbara and I usually handle this shift.”
Draco turned to find another older nurse adjusting some cords on another cot, and she looked
up at the sound of her name and winked.
Draco couldn’t put his finger on it, but something about these two women made him calm in
a way he hadn’t felt since Hermione went into labor. They seemed all-knowing and
trustworthy, as though they had seen everything there was to see in the world, and yet it
hadn’t jaded them. He got the impression that they had an endless well of optimism and hope
for the babies under their care.
“He’s really doing well then?” he asked.
“Oh yes, baby Malfoy here is going to be one of our stars, I just know it.”
Draco couldn’t help but smile at this, and Paula smiled back.
“May I touch him then?” asked Draco.
She nodded and instructed Draco to put his finger through a hole on the side of the cot.
Draco had watched Theo and Potter do this with both of their children. It was finally his
turn.
He placed one finger on Little Star’s palm, and tears sprang to his eyes as his hand closed
around it. He was so small his hand barely encircled Draco's whole finger. But he was
warm, and he was breathing with a little help, and Paula – who had so much confidence that
Draco was certain she knew everything – had said he was a fighter.
Of course he was a fighter. Hermione Granger was his mother.
“Keep fighting, son,” he whispered. “I love you.”

1 September 2004, 8:03 AM
“Ms. Granger, it’s time to pump. Let’s get you set up.”
Ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk…
*****
1 September 2004, 10:11 AM
“Ms. Granger, we need you to pump again.”
Ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk…
*****
1 September 2004, 12:08 PM
“Ms. Granger, it’s time. Your milk should be coming in soon.”
“It really hurts…”
“I’m sorry. I’ll call lactation and see if they have any suggestions.”
Ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk…
*****
1 September 2004, 2:02 PM
“Let’s get you some different flanges Ms. Granger. We don’t want your nipples to start
bleeding.”
Ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk…
*****
1 September 2004, 4:01 PM
“Again, Ms. Granger.”
“There’s nothing there!”
“But we have to keep trying. It can take a few days.”
Ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk…
*****
1 September 2004, 6:10 PM
“Are the new flanges helping, Ms. Granger?”
“I don’t know…”
“We’ll keep trying. You’re getting a little colostrum with each pump. We’re feeding it to
him. Every drop is important.”
Ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk…
*****
1 September 2004, 8:05 PM
“Again, Ms. Granger.”
“It’s pointless!”
“You have to keep trying.”
Ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk…
*****
1 September 2004, 10:02 PM
“Are you ready to go again, Ms. Granger?”
“I need to sleep.”
“You can rest between pumps. We’ll wake you at midnight.”
Ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk, ca-chunk…
*****
3 September 2004, 11:27 AM
Hermione had never looked worse, and Draco’s heart broke for her.
She was hooked to that fucking machine, every two hours, while tiny bits of milk were
extracted for their son. She was shattered from lack of sleep, and Draco was too. He found
himself napping in a chair next to Little Star or else in Hermione’s room, but every moment
of interruption by the hospital staff woke him up too. Hermione had finally sent him home
the night before for a full night of sleep because she said one of them needed to be conscious,
and it obviously wasn’t going to be her.
The nurses had said it could take a few days for milk to come in, and it had been excruciating
while they waited for it. It was only in the last few hours that things had finally started to
change. The color slowly turned from gold to milky white. The quantity began to increase.
But now there were new problems.
“Fuck, they hurt!” she hissed, as she prodded the sides of her breasts gingerly.
They had swelled up to an enormous size. Even to Draco’s eye they looked comically large.
They were hot to the touch and hard. The nurses kept encouraging her to pump, pump, pump
as though that would solve everything.
“I hate this,” she said miserably.
Draco gave her a soft look. “Let’s go see Little Star, yes? Maybe that will help.”
She nodded and slowly rose. She had only been walking without assistance for a few hours,
and every visit to see him prior to this one had been in a wheelchair. He could tell she
wanted to go on her own two feet this time. Draco held her arm in one hand and rolled that
fucking breast pump along with them as they shuffled toward the neonatal ward.
“Are we still getting married tonight?” she suddenly asked, as she stopped in the middle of
the hallway. “Or should I have Harry tell Anthony not to come?”
Draco glanced at her in surprise and took in her exhausted face and the pain in her stance.
“Whatever you want to do is fine.”
For some reason that made her face fall, and Draco made her turn to face him.
“Hermione, what is it?”
“I do want to marry you, I do…” she insisted.
“But?” he asked, because he sensed there was more.
“But I’m just…”
She trailed off, looking around the hall miserably.
Draco sighed and made her look at him. “Hermione, we have no more deadlines. We don’t
have to avoid the Matching Ceremony. We don’t have to avoid being forcibly wed to other
people. We don’t even have to worry about Little Star’s title. All of that is done.”
“So?” she asked cautiously.
“So I think we should get married whenever we want to get married. It certainly doesn't have
to be tonight or tomorrow or even next week. Tell me when you want to get married, and
we’ll do it then.”
She bit her lip.
“Please tell me, Hermione.”
“I always wanted a spring wedding,” she confessed. “I never dreamed about my wedding
day very much, but whenever I did it was always in the spring. None of the other weddings
I’ve planned timed out that way.”
Draco waited for the disappointment to hit him, but to his slight surprise it didn’t. He wasn’t
disappointed at all. In fact, waiting until the spring suddenly sounded wonderful because it
meant they could focus on their son and getting through the many challenges they were
facing before any wedding planning began in earnest. Whether they were engaged or
married, their relationship wouldn’t change.
“Then let’s get married in the spring.”
She looked at him hopefully. “You’re serious? You’re not upset that it’s not right away or–”
He put his finger to her lips. “Hermione, I’m not upset at all. We’ve been married before.
We’re engaged now, and we will get married again. Let’s just focus on our son, and let’s get
through these first few months with a newborn before setting a date. After everything that's
happened this past week, waiting until the spring actually sounds perfect.”
She gave him a small smile, and it startled him. It was the first time he had seen her smile
since she gave birth.
“Come on,” he said. “Little Star is waiting for us.”
They shuffled into the ward and slowly made their way over to his cot. To their surprise, one
of the nurses – Draco knew her name was Sandra – was removing the device that helped him
breathe.
“Is he ready for that?” asked Hermione in alarm.
Sandra smiled encouragingly. “Oh yes, and he’s going to do great. Now why don’t you have
a seat, and you can hold him once I take it off?”
Hermione clutched at Draco reflexively, but she swallowed hard and nodded before carefully
lowering herself into the chair next to him.
Neither one of them tore their eyes from the nurse while she gently disentangled the cords
and then lifted Little Star out of the cot. Hermione’s breath hitched as Sandra placed him
carefully on her chest and showed her how to hold him so that none of his tubes would be
pulled out. He seemed to nestle into her instinctively and gave a little sigh.
“Oh…” said Hermione softly, and she began to cry.
Draco crouched next to her and covered her hand with his. “He’s perfect, Hermione.”
“He really is,” she agreed with a sniff.
“And it’s just as I suspected,” said Sandra, gesturing toward his vital signs. “He’s
stabilizing. Skin to skin is very important. We’ll let you take it in turns, yes?”
Hermione nodded quickly before lowering her face to the top of his head. “This is the best
smell in the world,” she said softly.
Hermione got to hold him for a few more minutes, until another nurse approached her.
“Ms. Granger, it’s time to pump.”

7 September 2004, 10:18 AM
“We still need to name him,” she said softly, as she watched Draco rock Little Star, while the
ca-chunk of her pump made background noise.
They had been here a week. Hermione had finally been discharged, but Little Star certainly
had not, so for all practical purposes they had simply moved into the neonatal ward together.
Draco had seen his parents, but Hermione had not seen anybody but Draco and the nurses.
They had exchanged messages with their friends and family, but Hermione asked for a little
space and to Draco’s slight surprise everyone gave it to her. She had been taking a late cab to
her flat to catch a few hours of sleep the last several nights before returning at the crack of
dawn. Draco usually joined her, though he continued to stop by the Manor to give daily
reports to the grandparents as well.
The grandparents would be coming that weekend for a first visit, once their son was solidly
past 34 weeks.
Draco glanced at her. “Yes, we do need to name him. Have you given it much thought?”
“Yes, I have.”
Draco raised his eyebrows curiously as Hermione leaned forward to slip a finger into his
hand. He gripped it, and she smiled a little.
“What do you want to name him, darling?”
After everything she had been through the last week, Draco was willing to give her almost
anything she wanted, even ‘Leo’ if she really insisted upon it.
But it seemed that Hermione was willing to uphold her end of the bargain and finally accept
Draco’s veto for that particular name.
“Perseus. Because he’s slaying monsters one challenge at a time. But we won’t shorten it to
Percy. He’ll be Perseus.”
Draco felt a slow smile creep across his face as he closed his eyes and leaned back.
“Perseus Draco Malfoy. I love it.”

11 September 2004, 3:38 PM
“How are you doing, dear?” asked Helen, as she approached Hermione and Draco in the
waiting room.
“Not great.”
It was true. Hermione had become even more down over the last couple of days. Her
pumping was finally going well, and Little Star continued to improve, but Hermione’s mood
had darkened. One of the nurses called it a hormone crash. Another called it the baby blues.
Whatever it was, Draco had never felt so helpless.
“I had a bad crash with you,” said Helen. “It will pass.”
This did not seem to improve Hermione’s mood at all, but she just nodded curtly and
gestured that they should follow. David, Lucius, and Narcissa were all there too. It was time
to meet the baby.
“How long will he be here?” asked Narcissa tentatively, as she threw Hermione a concerned
look.
“At least a few more weeks,” said Draco. “We tried direct nursing this morning, and it…”
He trailed off hesitantly.
“It failed,” said Hermione shortly, as she led them down the hall to the neonatal ward. “He
doesn’t have the suck-swallow-breathe reflex yet. He choked on my milk.”
“The nurses say he just needs a little more time,” said Draco soothingly. “They said it will
click soon.”
“Well until it does, he’s on a feeding tube, and I’m hooked to that damn machine every two to
three hours,” said Hermione stonily. All of the grandparents glanced at each other and then at
Draco, who shook his head slightly in warning not to press her about it.
“Well I can’t wait to meet him,” said David with some forced cheerfulness as Hermione
pushed open the door to the ward.
Draco gestured for them, and they gathered around the small cot.
“Oh Merlin,” breathed Narcissa. She looked both awestruck and very sad as she took in the
size of him.
“He’s doing really well,” said Draco encouragingly. “It was just a little setback in feeding,
but he will get there. He’s still quite young.”
“It took Hermione a couple weeks too,” said Helen. “And she was born a week later than he
was. We just need to be patient.”
David nodded knowingly. “Yes, he looks like a fighter. Perseus you said?”
“Yes. It's a constellation, but he was also a hero in Greek mythology who slayed monsters,”
explained Draco.
“I think it’s perfect,” said Narcissa.
Draco glanced at his father who had not said a single word. Lucius’s face was indescribable
as he stared at his grandson in the small cot. It surprised everyone, even Draco, when he
looked at Lucius first and said, “Would you like to hold him, Father?”
Lucius blinked in shock before clearing his throat. “Is… is it safe?”
“Yes, and he loves it,” said Draco. “Though it’s best if you take your shirt off.”
Lucius looked at him askance, and Draco’s eyes slid to his wife to see her reaction. She
actually snorted a small huff of laughter, and the sound was so wonderful and surprising that
Draco nodded to himself.
“Right. Shirt off, Father, or I will rescind my offer.”
Lucius grumbled, but to everyone’s slight disbelief he began to unbutton his shirt to take it
off before settling into the chair. Draco and the nurse on duty moved Perseus onto Lucius’s
chest, and he immediately began to rock.
They said nothing for a long while, until Lucius’s eyes met Hermione’s with a piercing look.
“I can never thank you enough, Hermione,” he said. “Draco told us what you did to secure
the title.”
Hermione swallowed hard and nodded.
“And…” he hesitated, but then seemed to steel himself to say something difficult. “...and I’m
glad he was born here. He may not have done this well at…. our hospital.” He glanced at
the muggle nurse as he said this last bit.
Draco heard a sniff and turned to find Hermione dissolving into tears. She had been doing
this regularly ever since her hormone crash began in earnest a few days earlier. All of the
grandparents looked slightly alarmed.
“You’re welcome,” she sniffed. “And ignore me. It’s all the bloody hormones.”
“Ms. Granger,” said a nurse, as she gently interrupted them, “it’s time for you to pump.”

16 September 2004, 10:14 PM
“He’s transferring milk! You see? I told you it would click,” said Paula kindly. “We’ll build
up to a full feed over the next couple of weeks.”
Draco looked at Hermione, and her face was pale, while her teeth were gritted.
“Darling?” he asked in concern.
She said nothing, but just shook her head hard, and Draco fell silent, but watched with
concern. After twenty minutes, Perseus fell asleep, and Draco stepped in to take him.
“Let’s change his nappy to wake him up,” said Paula. “Then we’ll try the other side.”
As he pulled Perseus away from Hermione, Draco froze.
“Hermione…” he breathed. The nipple where Perseus had just been was bleeding.
“It’s fine,” she insisted. “He actually ate! He did it, and I…”
She choked back a sob, and Draco quickly handed the baby to Paula, while he crouched
down in front of her.
“Hermione, you don’t have to do this.”
“I do! It’s so important, and I can’t fail him like this, Draco! I already didn’t keep him in
long enough, so now he’s in this ward because of me, and I can’t fail him in this too!”
Draco gave Paula an overwhelmed look, and she nodded encouragingly.
“Hermione, you aren’t failing him. Not at all, darling. You are doing every single thing you
can for him.”
“But I want to breastfeed him! I do! I just… Draco, it really hurts!”
“His latch may be shallow,” said Paula. “Why don’t you pump the other side for now? We
can call lactation in the morning and see if they have any suggestions. We don’t want to
damage your nipples, dear.”
Hermione’s face fell, but she nodded glumly.
Draco stared at her, as he frantically tried to think of something, anything that might help.
The lactation consultants who had visited her had been perfectly nice, but something about
their enthusiasm for breastfeeding seemed to reinforce Hermione’s own guilt every time she
faced a new problem.
An idea struck him, and he looked back up at Paula. “Do you think he can wait fifteen
minutes before trying again? We have a family friend who lives nearby who might be able to
help. I can go fetch her right now.”
Paula looked surprised, but she nodded. “Well he can certainly wait fifteen minutes, but
visiting hours are over so–”
Draco slid his wand out of his sleeve and pointed it at her. “Confundus,” he whispered, and
Hermione turned to look at him in shock as Paula’s eyes slid out of focus for a moment.
“Of course, Draco. Bring her in if you think she would help.”
“Thank you,” he said as he rose to leave.
“Who?” Hermione demanded, as she watched him with narrowed eyes.
Draco shot her a small smile over his shoulder. “You’ll see.”

15 Minutes Later
“Draco’s told me everything, Hermione dear. Let’s give it another go, shall we?”
Hermione looked up in slight disbelief to find the authoritative form of Molly Weasley
standing there with her hands on her hips. Then her gaze slid to Draco, but he just gave her
his most stubborn look back.
It was true Molly hadn’t met their son yet. In fact, their closest friends had only met him the
previous day. Harry, Ginny, Pansy, Theo, and Blaise had all stopped by to see him.
Andromeda and Teddy had come by too. Even Ron and Prudence had dropped in for a few
minutes, where they looked at tiny Perseus in shock. Prudence had run her hand over her
abdomen and swallowed hard, before looking at Ron intently. Draco had a sense something
would be changing in their relationship very soon.
Harry was Hermione’s pick for godfather. And Draco surprised everyone by selecting
Andromeda as godmother. Something about it was perfect though. Both godparents had
been asked and accepted the previous day.
But Molly hadn’t been there because Hermione hadn’t invited her. Draco knew she would
meet their son eventually, but he assumed it would be when they were out of the hospital.
After watching Hermione struggle to feed Perseus though, Draco was struck by the idea, and
he knew that it was a good one.
Draco wasn’t exactly thrilled about involving Molly Weasley, but he knew that she was the
best person to help with this. During James’s birth, he overheard enough to learn that she had
nursed all seven of her children, but she also gave them bottles too. She did both. And that
told Draco she wouldn’t be militant about breastfeeding, but she could surely help Hermione
solve whatever problems they were having so she could do it at least some of the time
without being completely miserable and tearing her nipples to shreds.
Besides, despite the way their relationship had deteriorated over the last year, Draco knew
that these two women cared about each other. Molly had stood in for Helen for years, while
Hermione was estranged from her. And if there was anything Draco had learned in the days
since their son had been born, it was that healing was not linear. There would be setbacks.
There would be hard days. But things could always improve.
Draco knew that Hermione needed her.
Hermione seemed to realize the same thing, because she swallowed hard and nodded.
“Alright,” she said. “Well… it’s just, Paula thinks he might have a shallow latch.”
Molly tutted and bustled over as Paula brought the baby to Hermione’s breast.
“Oh he’s a handsome little thing isn’t he?” cood Molly as she took in the blonde wisps and
cupid's-bow mouth. Perseus already looked very much like Hermione, but his coloring was
all Draco.
Hermione smiled a little and nodded. “Yes, I know I’m biased, but I think he’s beautiful.”
“He most certainly is,” said Molly staunchly. “Now then. I’ve not had a baby this small, but
the twins were obviously early, and they were very difficult to keep awake for the first few
weeks. Fred, in particular, had a horrendous latch. He was a lazy nurser too, and it was very
painful for a time. Let’s see this little love try.”
It took considerable effort to wake Perseus up, but once they did, Hermione guided him to
her other breast. He latched and seemed to purse his lips a bit, and Hermione winced. To
Draco’s surprise, Molly immediately reached forward and used a finger to break the suction
against Hermione’s breast.
“Much too shallow. He’ll tear you to shreds. Try coaxing his mouth open and placing him
on the bottom of your breast like this… then scoop up so he’s forced to open wide …”
Hermione furrowed her brow and tried to follow Molly’s instructions, and the second time he
latched with a more open mouth. Hermione blinked in surprise.
“That… that doesn’t feel terrible…”
Molly smiled a little. “Breastfeeding shouldn’t hurt. If it does, then that means something is
wrong. It could be an issue with the baby’s mouth, but in Perseus’s case, I think he’s still
learning the technique. You don't want him to learn how to do it the wrong way. If it hurts,
unsuction him and try again. Do it as many times as it takes for him to learn the correct
position, my dear.”
“And what if it takes too long for him to get a full feed?” she asked, her eyes fixed on the
baby.
“Then give him a bottle with your milk or formula and try again for the next feed.”
Hermione glanced at her. “You used formula?”
“I did,” she said. “It was all the rage back then, you know. In fact, I was the odd one for
nursing at all. But I found it to be the best of both worlds. I could feed my babies on the go
without having to prepare any bottles, but I didn’t have the pressure of being their only food
source for months.”
Hermione fell silent as Perseus began to fall asleep again. She unlatched him gently, then
roused him before trying once more.
“See?” said Molly, as she watched critically. “He’s getting it.”
“There’s a lot of pressure to exclusively breastfeed,” said Hermione quietly.
“Yes, I’m aware. Ginny told me the same thing. Frankly, that’s the last thing a new mum
needs,” declared Molly.
Hermione quirked an eyebrow. “You think?”
“Merlin, dear, of course I think that. Becoming a mum for the first time is overwhelming.
It’s both wonderful and heartbreaking as you realize just how much your life has changed.
And I’ll tell you a secret: it’s like that for every child you add to your family. The second
time you do it, you know what to expect from the newborn days, but you have the added
wrinkle of an older sibling to manage. Then you add the third, and now you and your partner
are outnumbered. Arthur and I kept going of course and got the twins next. That began my
downward spiral, because twins are a real challenge at the best of times, and my twins were
just… well, I’m sure you can imagine. Poor Ronnie was barely an afterthought when he was
a baby because the twins were toddlers, and my hair was literally on fire most days. Then
Ginny was our caboose, and by then I had so many children that I scarcely knew what day it
was. I’ve never told Ginny this, but I have almost no memories of her first three or four
months. I breastfed all of my children, but after Bill it was purely to keep them attached to
me and away from their older siblings. If I didn’t, I feared I would lose them or they would
get trampled.”
Molly smiled a little, clearly lost in the memory.
“You’re saying I shouldn’t put so much pressure on myself,” said Hermione slowly.
“Because it never really gets easier.”
“Precisely,” said Molly. “Today you’re worried about feeding him. In a few months you’ll
be worried about milestones and sleeping through the night. Then it will be how many words
does he have? And is it time to potty train? And what about school? It never ends, dear.
Starting motherhood by putting expectations on yourself to perform is the worst thing you
can do for your mental state while your body and lives are adjusting to the new baby. If you
want to breastfeed, that's wonderful - but don't feel guilty if it goes poorly and you choose to
supplement or stop altogether. However you feed him, he will be perfectly fine.”
“There are so many books about all the things you’re supposed to do, though,” said
Hermione. “It’s hard not to feel guilty.”
To Draco’s surprise, Molly rolled her eyes at this. “Yes, we are given a lot of unsolicited
advice about the way we are supposed to parent our children, aren’t we? Well if you want
my opinion, a lot of it is hogwash. If you are meeting your children’s physical and emotional
needs and giving them love, then the rest is just details. I am convinced that all children
make their parents break the so-called ‘rules’ at least now and then. You have to make
compromises if you want to keep your sanity. You will also find that children are so different
from each other that what works for one doesn’t necessarily work for the others. Remember,
Arthur and I managed to produce Percy and the twins. They were not at all alike. The way
we had to parent them was completely different. And there was nothing we could do to
change that — they just came out that way.”
Hermione stared at Molly with tears in her eyes, and Draco was looking at her in slight awe
as well, incredibly relieved he had brought her here tonight. She was saying the things
Hermione needed to hear, and unlike everybody else who had tried to tell her these things,
Molly had a long history with Hermione and the experience to back it up.
“Thank you, Mrs. Weasley.”
“Of course, dear. Now let’s try one more time, and then you should get some rest.”

30 September 2004, 8:42 AM
Perseus had been in the neonatal ward for a full month, and he had passed the thirty-seven
week mark the previous day.
After a couple of false starts and a few more setbacks, Hermione and Perseus had finally
settled into a rhythm with his nursing, though she had taken Mrs. Weasley’s advice to heart
and now let Draco give him a couple bottles of formula per day to supplement.
She was much happier for it.
“I think I needed it,” she said simply. “I still feel guilty sometimes, but Mrs. Weasley was
right.”
Her hormones had been leveling out too. She still had the occasional bout of sadness, but
Draco thought she was slowly improving. He had made a fast and furious study of
postpartum depression after seeing how down she was in the early weeks, and he knew to
keep an eye on it. He learned the condition was extremely common and underdiagnosed.
He was sure the neonatal ward had made whatever she was feeling worse, despite the care
from the nurses and the support of their family members and friends, who had continued to
drop by.
In fact, Lucius came by so frequently that he had taken to rocking the other babies now and
then.
“I’m retired,” he said, when Draco caught him with his shirt off, holding a baby he knew
belonged to a couple who had been there even longer than they had. “I have nothing better to
do. Besides, the Brocktons said I could hold Charlotte whenever I wanted.”
“Did you confund them?” asked Draco knowingly.
Lucius refused to respond.
Yes, the neonatal ward was a remarkable place, but it was also a stressful one. Draco knew
that neither he nor Hermione would really feel settled until they could bring Perseus home.
They hoped today was his final day. They had celebrated by bringing in a veritable feast of
pastries for the nurses, compliments of Patsy and the other Malfoy elves. And now Draco,
Hermione, and all four grandparents were watching Perseus with bated breath to see if he
could pass his carseat test.
He had failed the test two days earlier, but only just. Today, Draco just knew he would pass.
“Just ten more minutes!” said Sandra, as she preemptively began to clear out his cot. “He’s
doing great.”
Draco eyed Perseus’s oxygen monitor, barely taking his eyes off of it.
“Come on son,” he whispered. You can do it.”
They were all silent as the clock counted down. He had been in this contraption for nearly an
hour. While Draco truly couldn’t envision a scenario when Perseus would ever be in a
carseat for more than a short drive around the Grangers’ neighborhood – they were wizards
after all – after spending a month in the neonatal ward, he didn’t question it. The muggles
knew what they were about when it came to premature babies, and if they said that Perseus
wasn’t ready to go home, then that was the answer.
“Five more minutes!” chirped Sandra.
Draco felt a hand grip his shoulder, and he turned to find Lucius staring at him. “He’ll do it,”
he said confidently. “He’s a fighter. He’s a Malfoy.”
Draco gave him a swift smile and watched as the final minutes counted down and then…
“Passed!” said Sandra. “Our little star has graduated!”
Draco broke into a broad smile, and tears pricked his eyes as the grandparents cheered, and
he turned to pull Hermione into a hug.
“He did it, darling. We’re bringing him home.”
When he pulled back, he stared down at her. Her eyes were rimmed red and had dark circles
under them. Her hair was wild. She looked pale and utterly exhausted from the last month,
but the smile she was giving him was genuine.
She had never been more beautiful.
“Let’s bring our boy home, Draco.”
It didn’t take long before Hermione was wheeling the pram into the room and settling him
into it, with just a light blanket to protect him from the early autumn air. He stretched out
and gave a contented sigh as she wheeled him toward the door. The nurses who had become
friends of theirs over the last month lined up to give them all congratulatory hugs, and it all
ended with a final question from Lucius.
“Do you know where I can direct a donation to this ward? The Malfoys would like to show
their appreciation for everything you have done for our grandson.”
Draco’s eyebrows flew up, and he exchanged a smile with Hermione. Evidently Lucius
Malfoy had finally gotten on board with the muggle way of doing things, at least when it
came to this.
“Of course, Mr. Malfoy,” said Sandra. “You can inquire at the front desk.”
“Excellent,” said Lucius. “I think ten million pounds and a bonus for each one of you should
be a good start. Perhaps we should make it an annual thing.”
Sandra nearly fainted.
After making a brief stop to inquire about Lucius’s donation – which he insisted would be
used only for the neonatal ward to make this place one of the best facilities for it in Europe –
they made their way into the morning sun and strolled the eight blocks to Hermione’s flat.
“I don’t think you should give this place up, darling,” commented Draco, as they squeezed
into a small lift with the pram and a now-sleeping Perseus.
“Oh?” she asked, as she pressed the button for her floor.
“No,” he said. “It’s the closest floo connection to the hospital. And you just know we’ll be
doing this again someday, right?”
“God, Draco, we left the hospital not even thirty minutes ago.”
“But don’t you want another, darling?”
“Not until my uterus heals from this one first.”
He chuckled as they exited the lift, and Hermione unlocked her flat. The grandparents
followed along moments later.
“Still,” he said under his breath as they arrived. “You know I’m right. We should keep this
place as our personal floo hub for all the babies we’re going to have together. It’s extremely
convenient.”
Hermione quirked an eyebrow at him. “Convenient, huh?”
“Quite,” said Draco. “In fact, I think the floo connection in your flat is the only convenient
thing that’s happened in the last year.”
Hermione laughed as she pulled him in for a brief kiss. “Fair enough, Draco. I would hate
for you to ever be inconvenienced.”
And with that they threw some floo powder into her fireplace and exited moments later on
the other side at Malfoy Manor, with Lucius, Narcissa, Helen, and David following behind.
They said nothing as they all circled the pram and looked down at little Perseus, who was
blissfully unaware that he had arrived on the grounds of his birthright. He just yawned and
smacked his lips a little as he turned his head to the other side.
Draco raised his eyes to find Hermione staring at him, and he smiled.
Their son was finally home.
Chapter 33: Epilogue: Wedding of the Season.
23 April 2005.
It was a Saturday, balmy and unseasonably warm. It was as though the weather knew that
today Hermione Granger would finally get married in the way she had been envisioning since
she was a child.
At the Malfoy estate, the gardens had never looked better – no, really, this time was better
than all the other times Draco had tried to do this. There was no musky scent of roses today,
but instead there were hundreds of tulips surrounding the arbor and grounds, a veritable
rainbow of colors that was bright and cheerful. Their bulbs had been planted in the autumn
and emerged this spring, after Hermione engaged the services of one Neville Longbottom to
predict which weekend in April would feature their peak bloom. To Draco’s great relief,
Neville had nailed it.
This time the lawn was a precise six centimeters high because Hermione preferred it to be a
bit more lush than the five centimeters Narcissa favored, though there was still not a single
weed in sight. It continued to look like velvet from a distance. The three hundred white
chairs were once again lined up in rigid rows, their spacing confirmed not with a ruler this
time, but with Isabella Granger’s walking stick.
Isabella Granger, it transpired, was a goddamned menace when it came to wedding planning.
Draco had not known this the last time he tried to marry Hermione. Isabella had been on an
extended holiday and had arrived back in England the day Perseus was born. This time,
however, she made certain to be at the center of the wedding plans, and Draco privately
believed she was the only woman who could challenge his mother when it came to this sort
of thing.
Even more bizarre was the fact that Lucius had practically fallen in love with the woman.
They hit it off right away, and Draco now attended a standing weekly dinner with his parents,
his wife, and Granny Granger.
Because yes, Draco now called her Granny Granger too. She insisted, and Draco was too
scared of her to tell her no.
Draco was in his son’s nursery as he stared down at his mother and future mother-in-law,
along with Granny Granger. They were standing in a circle and chatting animatedly with one
of the elves. He had the oddest sense of déjà vu, but he couldn’t be certain if he had really
done this before when he nearly married Astoria: after all, he no longer occluded his feelings
and memories away.
Draco had volunteered to help with Perseus’s nap today. As usual, Perseus fell asleep on top
of Draco, and Draco was too reluctant to move, lest the baby be disturbed.
“Mummy and I will be married soon, son,” whispered Draco, as he rocked a sleeping
Perseus. “Do you think she’ll like her wedding gift?”
It took a few months of discussion, but Blaise had finally come around to Draco’s proposal
for the villa. Draco was planning to take her and Perseus there directly after the reception
this evening. It would be their first family vacation, and he planned to tell her the villa was
theirs once they arrived.
He couldn’t wait to see Hermione’s reaction. No doubt she would be exceptionally annoyed
with him, but perhaps she would forgive him for it and give him a very personal thank you
after Perseus fell asleep one night. Draco chuckled to himself as he imagined it.
Perseus gave a little sigh, and Draco shifted him ever so slightly as he stared around the
familiar room. Perseus’s nursery was charming, with dark blue walls, white furniture, and of
course constellations on the ceiling. Hermione had even charmed them to change based on
the stars that were visible in the night sky at any given point.
She was convinced he would have top marks in Astronomy one day.
Perseus’s little puffs of air made Draco smile softly. Bringing this child into the world had
been one challenge after another, but he and his mother were worth every single
inconvenience to get to this place. Draco had never been more in love with either one of
them.
Draco heard a soft knock on the door as it cracked open to reveal Theo, who grinned a little
at the sight.
“It’s time,” he whispered. “Granny Granger is going to have a cow if you’re late.”
Because yes, Theo was required to call Isabella ‘Granny Granger’ too.
Draco just gestured at the baby.
“I’m trapped,” he mouthed.
Theo grimaced in sympathy, but made a gesture that Draco interpreted as, figure it out.
Draco gritted his teeth and slowly, slowly slid his hand to a more secure place and then
shifted the baby to a cradle hold position. He breathed a sigh of relief when Perseus didn’t
wake, and Theo gave him a thumb’s up as Draco tip-toed to his cot.
If he could just transition him, then one of the elves could keep an eye on him through the
rest of his nap.
Draco lowered him and then gritted his teeth again as he realized his hand was trapped
beneath Perseus’s body. Draco exhaled and focused to press his hand down into the mattress
to slowly slide it out, and…
“WAAAAAAHHH!”
“Fuck,” groaned Draco, as Theo winced.
Draco just sighed and lifted Perseus up before popping a dummy into his mouth. “Well let’s
go tell the ladies in charge of our lives that you’ll be attending the wedding after all, yes?
Mummy was in favor, so let’s go convince your grandmothers and great grandmother, shall
we?”
Draco wasted another five minutes with an unexpected nappy change and outfit change to
something Hermione would deem acceptable, before calling Patsy to fetch a bottle. Then he
and Theo made their way down the stairs and out into the late afternoon sun to find Narcissa,
Helen, and Granny Granger all tapping their feet and looking at him with irritation.
“You’re late,” snapped Narcissa.
“Perseus was asleep,” said Draco, rolling his eyes.
At the mention of the baby all three women zeroed in on him and melted at precisely the
same time. It was astonishing, really, how much attention he received.
“Oh he’s adorable in that romper,” said Helen fondly.
“Yes, quite the little gentleman,” agreed Isabella.
Perseus looked at all three of them with a gummy smile before making an odd sound and…
“Eurgh,” said Draco, as he felt it happen. “I think he blew out his nappy.”
At this, the women and Theo all took a collective step back, and Draco groaned. “Really?”
“You’re his father,” said Narcissa with a smile.
Draco just rolled his eyes and called Patsy for a different outfit, which took another five
minutes to attend to. And now Draco was very late.
As he finally handed the baby off to Helen, Narcissa took a critical look at Draco’s cuff and
wrinkled her nose.
“Draco, your sleeve is soiled.”
Draco looked down and saw some familiar yellow-gold residue left behind. He swore softly
and waved his wand to vanish it. It was only partially successful.
“Draco, you’ll need to change,” insisted Narcissa.
“Mother, we’re already late. It’s fine, alright? It’s clean enough. It’s just stained.”
“But Perseus–”
“Spits up on me and shits on me at least four times a day. It would be odd not to wear
something stained at this point.”
“Fine,” she huffed as Isabella stepped forward and yanked Draco’s jacket sleeve down so
hard he nearly stumbled.
“Least you can do is hide it,” declared Isabella. “Now up to the front with you. I’m ready to
marry off my granddaughter.”
Draco tried not to roll his eyes, but he hurried to the front and took a moment to look out into
the crowd. The Weasleys were there of course, along with the Potters, the Parkinsons, and
the Notts. Prudence Avery was due to deliver any day, and she was sitting with the
Weasley’s. Her engagement ring sparkled in the late afternoon sun. There were quite a few
people there for political reasons and others who were family friends on both sides.
Maywood was there with his wife, looking around in bemusement, and even the neonatal
nurses who had helped Perseus right after he was born were in attendance. Hermione had put
the Weasleys in charge of confunding them periodically so the Statute of Secrecy would not
be violated.
Draco took his place next to Theo and Blaise, who both smirked at him.
“Gonna run again, mate?” asked Blaise under his breath.
“Don’t even suggest such a thing,” muttered Draco.
“To be fair, it wouldn’t be the first time,” pointed out Theo.
Draco just rolled his eyes, before they were pulled to the front as the music started.
First down the aisle was Granny Granger, who was being escorted by Ron Weasley. Draco
saw him wince slightly as her cane landed on his toe, and he tried not to laugh. Ron seated
her first and then moved to sit near his parents and the muggles he would be monitoring for
the rest of the wedding. Draco saw with some relief that Perseus was now being bounced by
Molly Weasley. She had been the backup plan if he was actually awake to attend.
Next came Lucius and Narcissa, who were both beaming this time. It was a stark contrast to
the cool, almost professional expressions the last time they walked toward Draco.
After that, Helen was escorted down the aisle by Potter, who joined Draco at the front, but on
Hermione’s side.
Draco was almost certain that Potter was the first bridesman the wizarding world had ever
seen.
Teddy came next, bearing the rings. Draco saw Andromeda giving him a beady look as he
stood next to Harry and tried desperately not to fidget.
Then came Ginny Weasley, the only bridesmaid. Her dress was an odd shade of bright purple
that perfectly matched several of the tulips in her bouquet. She gave a blinding smile to
Dennis Creevey, who was photographing her every step.
This is it. Hermione comes next.
Draco was suddenly struck by the memory of this moment when it was Astoria walking
toward him. He had felt cold and sick with dread as she began to walk toward him. But
this…
Hermione stepped into the aisle with her father, and Draco gasped.
Her dress had a fitted bodice with the sheerest lace sleeves. The skirt billowed out and kissed
the ground with a small train as she began to walk toward him. She had white tulips joyfully
spilling out of her bouquet, and her hair was pinned back to hold an elaborate veil that
cascaded down her back.
She was perfect like this, utterly flawless.
The most beautiful thing I have ever seen.
There would be a lifetime of laughter and stimulating conversation that was punctuated by
heat and love.
I want decades of it.
Draco’s life would be filled with things to do as she crafted a world in her image and gave
her ideas to Draco to execute.
I want to build it for her.
He would never use occlumency again or drown himself in his own mind because his wife
was vibrant and alive and made him feel everything.
I love her so much.
And then tonight he would slip between her legs and…
Fuck.
Draco was getting an erection right there as she approached him, and based on the amused
glance she gave his trousers, he could tell that she noticed. He just cleared his throat and
shifted a little before she kissed her father and stepped toward him.
This part was new.
This was the point at which he had apparated away from Astoria, but he would never run
from Hermione. She was his entire future and everything he could have ever wanted for
himself.
“Ready?” he said under his breath.
“Yes, Draco. I can’t wait to marry you.”
Draco grinned and pulled her in for a quick kiss while Anthony Goldstein cleared his throat
behind them with amusement.
“We generally do that after the ceremony, Draco,” he pointed out as the audience laughed.
Draco pulled away and just shrugged. Who cared if things were out of order? Their entire
relationship had been out of order in some respects.
“Come along then.”
Anthony pulled out his wand and began to read the words from their vows. This time it was
more than a simple sentence crafted by the Ministry of Magic to legally bind them. The
vows for this wedding – their real wedding – spoke of love and devotion and the life they
would spend together. It didn’t take long, but it meant everything.
Once their vows were read, Anthony lifted his wand to perform the binding spell, repeating
the words he had said to them all those months ago in Azkaban.
“I hereby bind you, in matrimony and magic, on this, the twenty-third day of April, 2005.
Take each other in honesty and integrity to grow your lives together from this day forward.”
Draco felt that same tug on his magic, and he held his breath as he waited for it. The marital
magic had been absent since the night Perseus was born. Draco didn’t miss it, exactly, but
feeling it activate again would tell him that their binding spell had been successful.
Sure enough, that rush of magic rolled through Draco, and his attention was pulled fully
toward Hermione.
Your wife must give you an heir. You need to fill her belly with an heir. But you require a boy
for it, and she will not be giving you that.
Draco furrowed his brow, as he tried to make sense of the strange thought. The magic felt
agitated, unsettled, as though there was something very wrong.
“What is it?” whispered Hermione, who must have noticed his odd look.
Draco just shook his head. “Nothing. The magic is acting up.”
“Then let’s break it,” she suggested.
Draco nodded and gestured for Potter to step forward.
The guests all watched curiously as Potter spoke up.
“Most of you know that Hermione and Draco’s last wedding had to be postponed thanks to
the early arrival of my godson Perseus.”
At his name, Perseus gave a helpful coo, and those around him chuckled.
“Hermione and Draco have chosen to break the Malfoy magic today, by adding blood
collected from Perseus at birth. His godparents are in attendance to assist with the
ceremony.”
Potter pulled out the small vial of blood that Hermione and Draco had saved for months.
They collected it from Perseus while he was in the hospital, during a standard blood draw.
They debated about doing this for months, but could not determine how it would affect the
Malfoy magic if the blood was added while Draco was technically unmarried. There were no
family records of it. So they bided their time and decided to wait for the wedding, to make
sure the magic had activated again before trying to break any part of it.
Hermione and Draco stepped back to reveal the ward stone, which was in the center of the
garden. They had intentionally said their vows directly on top of it and now crouched down
near it. Potter and Andromeda stepped forward and kneeled as well. All four of them placed
their wands on the ward stone while Draco unstoppered the small vial with his teeth. He
poured the blood on top of the stone as he began to chant.
“ Sanguis filii additur. Crescant generationes. Magia non obligabit patrem.”
He said it three times, and then the stone glowed gold before the blood disappeared into it.
Draco felt a small snap and blinked in surprise. He could see Hermione was watching him
intently, and he nodded a little as they all rose and Potter and Andromeda returned to their
positions.
He took just a moment to feel it. Now, instead of feeling agitated, the magic felt satisfied. It
was as though it knew that the line had been secured. He waited a moment longer to see if he
received any other nudges, and sure enough…
She should always be filled up just like she is. Good boy, Draco.
Draco’s eyebrows flew up in surprise as he stared at Hermione in disbelief. His eyes were
pulled to her abdomen.
“What?” she asked under her breath. Draco was suddenly aware that they had been doing all
of this in front of an audience, but he didn’t care.
“You were wrong,” he whispered.
She looked at him in confusion.
“Wrong about what?” she whispered back.
“When you said I couldn’t tell when a woman is pregnant. I can tell. Because you are. And
I’m almost positive it’s a girl this time.”
Hermione turned crimson and looked down for a moment as she bit her lip, before looking
back up at Draco shyly.
“Is that alright?” she asked hesitantly. “I know it’s quite soon.”
“More than alright,” he said, as he pulled her in for another kiss. “It’s everything I’ve ever
wanted.”
Somebody cleared their throat behind them, and Draco turned to find Anthony Goldstein
staring at them both with amusement.
“We’re still not done,” he said at a normal volume, and the guests laughed.
Draco rolled his eyes, but released Hermione with a small smile. He felt like he was walking
on air. He had his wife, his little boy, and now Hermione was growing their baby girl.
“Do you have your rings?” asked Anthony, and Draco nodded, looking toward Teddy who
stepped forward.
They both had new rings. They were from the same line as their old wedding bands, but in a
slightly different design because they both still wore their first bands to commemorate their
original marriage. Hermione slipped Draco’s new ring onto his finger and cast a spell that
fused it to his old one. Then Draco placed Hermione’s ring on her finger too, with her
engagement ring nestled between both bands. He cast the same spell to fuse all three.
“I love it,” she whispered happily as she took a brief moment to admire it before turning back
to Anthony.
“And now, it’s actually time to kiss your bride, Draco,” said Goldstein with a smile. The
guests laughed at this as Draco pulled Hermione in for a deep kiss, that was only broken by…
“WAAAAHHH!”
Hermione pulled back and rolled her eyes in slight exasperation, but she was still smiling
broadly as they both turned to find their son wailing in Molly Weasley’s arms.
Hermione started to chuckle as she unceremoniously handed her bouquet to Ginny before
moving to Mrs. Weasley and picking up Perseus and carrying him to the front.
“Well?” she asked, looking at Draco, “shall we?”
Draco held out his arm, and she took it with one hand while holding Perseus on her hip with
the other, and they made their way back down the aisle as a family of three – no, a family of
four. Behind them, their wedding party began to pair off and move down the aisle as well.
“Dr. Cox may place a cerclage this time,” said Hermione under her breath, about halfway
down the aisle.
“Oh? And what is that?”
“It’s where they sew your cervix shut.”
Draco came to a complete halt and looked at her in horror. “Are you saying they stick a
needle up your–”
“Hush, Draco!” Hermione insisted, as Granny Granger made a nose from several rows up
ahead.
“Keep going!” she hissed, as she rapped her cane authoritatively on the ground. Draco
swallowed hard as he began to walk again.
They passed several more rows before Hermione glanced sideways at Draco and saw that his
face was still one of muted horror.
“You’re supposed to be smiling,” she reminded him.
“I’m imagining that wanker with a needle and thread and–”
“Oh stop, it’s not that bad!”
Draco scoffed, but they were nearing the end of the aisle, and he finally noticed Dennis
Creevey taking pictures of all three of them. Draco pulled Hermione to the side to pose.
“Just think of our marriage and our children, Draco,” she said, as she gave Dennis as bright
smile.
Fair enough, darling, thought Draco as his face relaxed into a smile once more.
“Much better,” she said approvingly. “Keep thinking of our little family of four: Draco,
Hermione, Perseus, and Leona.”
Draco’s smile fell from his face, and he turned to scowl at her. “Leona?”
“Yes, it’s a carbonaceous asteroid. It’s perfectly in theme.”
“I’m vetoing Leona,” said Draco instantly.
“You keep telling yourself that,” said Hermione airily as she patted him on the arm.
She stepped away to hand Perseus off to her mother, and Draco found himself smiling again,
despite himself. How could he do anything else in the face of his wedding to Hermione
Granger and their two children?
“There’s that smile,” she said quietly as she came back to him and wrapped her arms around
his neck to kiss him soundly one more time. Out of the corner of his eye Draco saw a flash
go off.
“I love you, Hermione,” said Draco. “And I also love Perseus and Celeste.”
Hermione gave him an amused look as she leaned into him, her eyes golden with mirth and
joy.
“I love you too. You’re always going to be my best boy, Draco.”
*
The End!
